State of California Environmental Protection Agency AIR RESOURCES BOARD AMENDMENTS TO THE CALIFORNIA ZERO EMISSION VEHICLE PROGRAM REGULATIONS FINAL STATEMENT OF REASONS December 2001 Table of Contents I. II.
GENERAL....................................................................................1 MODIFICATIONS TO THE ORIGINA PROPOSAL................................6 A. AN OVERVIEW OF THE ORIGINAL PROPOSAL........................6 1.
The Preexisting ZEV Regulation......................................6 2.
The 2000 Biennial Review..............................................7 3.
The Originally Proposed Amendments Released December 8, 2000........................................................8 (a) Adjustments to the Rate and Timing of ZEV and PZEV Introduction.........................................9 (b) Modifications to the Incentive Structure....................9 4.
Expected Impacts of the Original Staff Proposal................12 MODIFICATIONS TO THE ORIGINAL PROPOSAL.....................14 1.
Description of and Rationale for Modifications ...................14 (a) Making Light-duty Trucks in the "LDT2" Class Subject to the Percentage ZEV Requirements.........14 (b) Doubling the Number of ZEVs Required by the 2012 Model Year Compared to the Modified Staff Proposal, With the Ramp up Beginning in the 2007 Model Year...............................................15 (c) Not Allowing Extended Range HEVs to Be Counted Towards the Core 20 Percent of a Large Manufacturer's Percentage ZEV Requirement, With Other Compensation Modifications.................15 (d) Revising the Credit Relationship Between Fuel Cell Vehicles and Battery Electric Vehicles in the Later Implementation Years.........................................15 (e) Identifying More Specific Criteria For Determining Qualifications For an "Advanced Componentry" Allowance and Providing for Graduated Allowances..16 (f) Expanding the Provisions on ZEV Credits for "Transportation Systems"....................................16 (g) Allowing a Manufacturer the Option of Basing its Percentage ZEV Requirements on Current Rather Than Prior-Year Sales........................................18 (h) Limiting the Use of ZEV Credits Earned from 2001-2005 Model Year NEVs................................18 2.
3.
Projected ZEV Volumes For the 2003 Model Year Resulting From the Adopted Amendments.......................19 Cost ­ Effectiveness....................................................21
B.
III.
SUMMARY OF PUBLIC COMMENTS AND AGENCY RESPONSES.......23 A. COMMENTS PRESENTED PRIOR TO, OR AT THE HEARING... .23 (a) Comments that the Staff Proposal Reduces the ZEV Requirements Too Much..............................................23 (b) Need to Increase ZEV Volumes to Reduce Per-Vehicle Cost.........................................................28 (c) Cost-Effectiveness Issues Related to the ZEV Program......29 (d) Fiscal Impacts to Local Government..............................
40 (e) Treatment of Hybrid Electric Vehicles..............................41 (f) Treatment of Advanced Technology PZEVs.....................43 (g) Treatment of Neighborhood and City Electric Vehicles........46 (h) Inclusion of Sport Utility Vehicles and Light Duty Trucks 2 Within the Scope of the ZEV Program.............................52 (i) Warranty Issues.........................................................54 (j) Miscellaneous Issues...................................................55 (k) General Opposition to the ZEV Program..........................67 (l) Legal Issues...............................................................78 RESPONSES TO COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING THE FIRST 15-DAY COMMENT PERIOD.................................................80 RESPONSES TO COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING THE SECOND 15-DAY COMMENT PERIOD (EMFAC AVAILABILITY) ..............162 RESPONSES TO COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING SECOND 15-DAY COMMENT PERIOD................................................171
B. C. D.
ATTACHMENT A: California Air Resources Board, ARB Staff Review of Report Entitled "Impacts of Alternative ZEV Sales Mandates on California Motor Vehicle Emissions: A Comprehensive Study", October 31, 2001
Table of Acronyms Used AAM ACP AIR ALA APA APCD APU AQMD ATPZEV BAAQMD BMW CAFE CALPIRG (C)ARB CAPCOA CBE CCR CEC CEQA CETC CEV CMPEG CNG CO2 DMV DOE DOT ECD EIR EMFAC EPRI EV FCEV FMT FMVSS FSOR GM GSP GVWR HEV Alliance of Automotive Manufacturers AC Propulsion Air Improvement Resource, Inc.
American Lung Association Administrative Procedures Act Air Pollution Control District Auxiliary Power Unit Air Quality Management District Advanced Technology Partial Zero-Emission Vehicle Bay Area Air Quality Management District Bavarian Motor Works Corporate Average Fuel Economy California Public Interest Research Group California Air Resources Board California Air Pollution Control Officers Association Citizens for a Better Environment California Code of Regulations California Energy Commission California Environmental Quality Act California Electric Transportation Coalition City Electric Vehicles California Miles Per Equivalent Gallon Compressed Natural Gas Carbon Dioxide Department of Motor Vehicles Department of Energy Department of Transportation Energy Conversion Devices, Inc.
(Ovonic) Environmental Impact Report ARB's mobile emissions inventory modeling program Electric Power Research Institute Electric Vehicle Fuel Cell Electric Vehicle Fair Market Test Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards Final Statement of Reasons General Motors Gross State Product Gross Vehicle Weight Rating Hybrid-Electric Vehicle
ICE ILEV ISO ISOR LDT1 LDT2
LEV I LEV II LSV LVW MDV MIL MOA MTBE MVISCA MY NERA NEV NHTSA NiMH NLEV NMOG NOx NRDC OAL OBC OBD OEM PAH PC PCL PEVDC PHEV PUC PZEV R
Internal Combustion Engine Inherently Low Emission Vehicle International Organization for Standardization Initial Statement of Reasons Light Duty Truck with a loaded vehicle weight of 0-3750 pounds.
Light Duty Truck with a loaded vehicle weight of 3751 pounds to a gross vehicle weight of 8500 pounds, or a "LEV I" light-duty truck with a loaded vehicle weight of 3751-5750 pounds.
Low Emission Vehicle, pre-1998 regulations Low Emission Vehicle, post-1998 regulations Low Speed Vehicle Loaded Vehicle Weight Medium-Duty Vehicle Malfunction Indicator Light Memoranda of Agreement Methyl Tertiary Butyl Ether Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act Model Year National Economic Research Association Neighborhood Electric Vehicle National Highway Transportation Safety Association Nickel Metal-Hydride National Low Emission Vehicle Non-Methane Organic Gases Oxides of Nitrogen National Resource Defense Council Office of Administrative Law Ovonics Battery Company On-Board Diagnostic Original Equipment Manufacturer Polycyclic Aromatic Hydrocarbons Passenger Car Planning and Conservation League Production Electric Vehicle Drivers Coalition Plug-in Hybrid Electric Vehicle Public Utilities Commission Partial Zero Emission Vehicle Research and Development Regional Economic Models, Inc.
Reactive Organic Gases South Coast Air Quality Management District Super Ultra-Low Emission Vehicle
SUV Tier 2 UC UCS ULEV I ULEV II USC (US)EPA VMT ZEV ZLSV
Super Utility Vehicle Tier 2 (Federal Requirement) University of California Union of Concerned Scientists Ultra-Low Emission Vehicle, pre-1998 regulations Ultra-Low Emission Vehicle, post-1998 regulations United States Code United States Environmental Protection Agency Vehicle Miles Traveled Zero-Emission Vehicle Zero-Emission Low Speed Vehicle
State of California Environmental Protection Agency AIR RESOURCES BOARD Final Statement of Reasons for Rulemaking, Including Summary of Comments and Agency Responses PROPOSED AMENDMENTS TO THE CALIFORNIA ZERO EMISSION VEHICLE PROGRAM REGULATIONS Public Hearing Date: January 25, 2001 Agenda Item No.: 01-01-1 I. GENERAL
In this rulemaking, the Air Resources Board (ARB or Board) is adopting major amendments to the California Zero Emission Vehicle (ZEV) program regulations.
The amendments are designed to maintain progress towards commercialization of zero emission vehicles while recognizing near term constraints due to cost, lead time, and technical challenges.
The amendments maintain a core ZEV component, but significantly reduce the cost of the program primarily through a reduction in vehicles required in the near-term, and the broadening in scope of vehicle technologies allowed.
The rulemaking was initiated by the December 8, 2000 publication of a Notice of a January 25, 2001 public hearing to consider ZEV program amendments as initially proposed by the staff.
A Staff Report: Initial Statement of Reasons (the Staff Report) was also made available for public review and comment starting December 8, 2000.
The Staff Report, which is incorporated by reference herein, contained an extensive description of the rationale for the proposed amendments.
The text of the proposed amendments was included as appendices to the Staff Report.
These documents were also posted by December 8, 2000 on the ARB's Internet site for the ZEV program rulemaking at http://www.arb.ca.gov/regact/zev2001/zev2001.htm , as was the text of the proposed amendments to the Standards and Test Procedures document which is incorporated by reference by the regulation being amended.
The proposed regulatory action consisted primarily of amendments to section 1962, title 13, California Code of Regulations (CCR), and to the "California Exhaust Emission Standards and Test Procedures for 2003 and Subsequent Model Zero-Emission Vehicles, and 2001 and Subsequent Model Hybrid Electric Vehicles, in the Passenger Car, Light-Duty Truck and Medium-Duty Vehicle Classes" (the ZEV Standards and Test Procedures), which is incorporated by reference in section 1962.
Staff also proposed related amendments to section 1900 (Definitions), title 13, CCR, and to references to the Standards and Test Procedures document in section 1961, title 13, CCR.
1
On January 25, 2001, the Board conducted the public hearing, at which the staff presented suggested modifications to the originally proposed amendments, developed in response to comments received subsequent to release of the Notice and Staff Report.
The Board received written and oral comments at the hearing.
At the conclusion of the hearing, the Board adopted Resolution 01-01, in which it approved the originally proposed amendments with a number of significant modifications.
Many of the modifications were reflected in the suggested modifications staff had presented at the hearing ("Staff's Suggested Modifications to the Original Proposal," Attachment C to the Resolution).
Other modifications were initiated by the Board itself and were described on pages 7-8 of the Resolution.
In accordance with section 11346.8 of the Government Code, the Board's Resolution directed the Executive Officer to make the text of the modified amendments, with appropriate additional conforming modifications, available to the public for a supplemental written comment period of at least 15 days.
He was then directed either to adopt the amendments with such additional modifications as may be appropriate in light of the comments received, or to present the regulations to the Board for further consideration if warranted.
In preparing the modified regulatory language after the hearing, the staff identified various additional modifications that were appropriate to best reflect the intent of the Board at the hearing.
The staff has also identified several additional revisions ­ mostly technical ­ that are appropriate in order to make the amended regulations work as effectively as possible.
These supplemental modifications were incorporated into the text of the proposed amendments, along with the modifications specifically approved at the hearing.
The text of the proposed modifications to the amendments was made available for a supplemental 15-day comment period ending November 15, 2001 by issuance of a Notice of Public Availability of Modified Text and Supporting Documents (the "first 15day notice").
This Notice and its three attachments were mailed on October 31, 2001 to all parties identified in section 44(a), title 1, CCR, along with various other interested parties.
They were also posted October 31, 2001 on the ARB's Internet site for the rulemaking.
Resolution 01-01 was appended to the 15-day notice as Attachment I. Attachment II contained the proposed title 13, CCR regulatory text showing the proposed modifications, along with commentaries explaining the modified language and its rationale.
Modifications developed after the hearing were specifically identified.
Most of the amendments to the incorporated ZEV Standards and Test Procedures document were identical to the amendments to section 1962, and were therefore not separately shown in Attachment II.
However, Attachment II did show the proposed amendments to the incorporated document that were supplemental to the section 1962 language.
The complete text of the incorporated document with the proposed modifications clearly shown was available online at the ARB's Internet site for the rulemaking.
The Notice's Attachment III listed for comment additional documents that the ARB was adding to the rulemaking record in accordance with Government Code section 11347.1.
The most significant additional document was a staff response to a study entitled "Impacts of Alternative ZEV Sales Mandates on California Motor Vehicle Emissions" submitted by General Motors Corp. during the comment period just prior to
2
the January hearing.
Forty-one comments were received during the October 31 November 15, 2001 supplemental comment period.
In light of the supplemental comments received, the Executive Officer determined that additional modifications were appropriate.
A Second Notice of Public Availability of Modified Text (the "second 15-day notice") and an attachment identifying the additional modifications were mailed on November 19, 2001 to all parties identified in section 44(a), title 1, CCR, along with various other interested parties and posted on the Internet.
The comment period ended December 4, 2001, by which time 9 comments had been received.1 One of the commenters during the first 15-day comment period urged that the deadline for comment on the additional material added to the record be extended until at least November 30, 2001, because some of the material was premised on use of the emissions inventory model EMFAC 2001; this model had not been available to the public on October 31.
In response, the ARB issued a Second Notice of Public Availability of Supporting Documents and Information, announcing that EMFAC 2001 ver. 2.07 was being added to the rulemaking file, along with relevant source codes and a fleet implementation schedule, and identifying a November 30 deadline for comment on the newly identified material.
On November 15 the supplemental notice was posted on the Internet ­ along with electronic files containing the newly added materials ­ and was mailed to some of the parties identified in section 44(a), title 1, CCR; it was mailed to the remaining parties November 19.
The supplemental notice announced a November 30 deadline for comment on the newly identified material.
Three sets of additional comments pertaining to the materials were received during the supplemental comment period.
After considering all of the comments received, the Executive Officer issued Executive Order G-01-58, adopting the amendments to title 13, CCR, and the incorporated ZEV Standards and Test Procedures.
2 Incorporated Documents The ZEV Standards and Test Procedures are incorporated by reference in relettered section 1962(h), title 13, CCR.
The ZEV Standards and Test Procedures in turn incorporate certification test procedures adopted by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (U.S. EPA) and contained in 40 Code of Federal Regulations (CFR) Part 86.
1
Two of the comments, each two pages long, were from automobile manufacturers who designated the contents confidential business information.
These are not included in the rulemaking file transmitted to the Office of Administrative Law, and are not summarized in this FSOR, to avoid disclosure.
2
The adopted amendments contained a few nonsubstantial modifications to the text made available for supplemental comment.
In the Final Regulation Order, in section 1962(d)(3)(C)3.
(p. 12), the reference to section 1962(e)(4) was corrected to 1962(e)(6); in section 1962(c)(4)(B), the extra period after the first sentence was deleted; and the title of the table in section 1962(e)(6)(A) (p. 16) was italicized.
Comparable changes were made to the Test Procedures, and in the second line of section C.4.4 (p. C-11) an extraneous "and" was omitted.
3
Relettered section 1962(h), title 13, CCR identifies the incorporated ZEV Standards and Test Procedures by title and date.
The ARB document is readily available from the ARB upon request and was made available in the context of this rulemaking in the manner specified in Government Code section 11346.5(b).
The CFR is published by the Office of the Federal Registrar, National Archives and Records Administration, and is therefore reasonably available to the affected public from a commonly known source.
The ZEV Standards and Test Procedures are incorporated by reference because it would be impractical to print them in the CCR.
Existing ARB administrative practice has been to have the motor vehicle emissions test procedures incorporated by reference rather than printed in the CCR as these procedures are highly technical and complex.
They include the "nuts and bolts" engineering protocols required for certification of motor vehicles and have a very limited audience.
Because the ARB has never printed complete test procedures in the CCR, the affected public is accustomed to the incorporation format.
The ARB's test procedures as a whole are extensive and it would be both cumbersome and expensive to print these lengthy, technically complex procedures with a limited audience in the CCR.
Printing portions of the ARB's test procedures that are incorporated by reference would be unnecessarily confusing to the affected public.
The test procedures incorporate portions of the CFR because some of the ARB requirements are substantially based on the federal emission regulations.
Manufacturers typically certify vehicles and engines to a version of the federal emission standards and test procedures which has been modified by state requirements.
Incorporation of the federal regulations by reference makes it easier for manufacturers to know when the two sets of requirements are identical and when they differ.
Each of the incorporated CFR provisions are identified by date in the ARB test procedure documents.
Fiscal Impacts The ARB has determined that this regulatory action will not create costs or savings, as defined in Government Code section 11346.5(a)(6), to any state agency or in federal funding to the state, costs or mandate to any local agency or school district whether or not reimbursable by the state pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with section 17500), Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, or other non-discretionary costs or savings to local agencies.
Consideration of Alternatives The amendments proposed in this rulemaking were the result of extensive discussions and meetings involving ARB staff and motor vehicle manufacturers, environmental groups, and others.
The Staff Report, released and made available to the public on December 8, 2000, identified two potential alternatives to the staff proposal: 1) do not amend the program and 2) delay program implementation until such time as the Board believes that improved ZEV technology will be available.
The alternative of not
4
amending the ZEV program was rejected as posing too great a cost burden on manufacturers.
The adopted amendments offer substantially increased flexibility to manufacturers, which reduces their compliance burden while continuing to further the goals of the program ­ namely air quality improvement and automotive technology advancement.
The alternative of delaying program implementation was not chosen because it would remove all regulatory pressure to improve ZEV technology and slow the pace of commercialization of a variety of advanced vehicle technologies.
Staff's biennial review of the program showed that zero emission vehicle technology has been demonstrated and is feasible.
The primary difficulty is cost.
In that environment, continuing the regulation, in a modified form creates the necessary market forces to push technology improvement and reductions in cost.
The Alliance of Automobile Manufacturers (the Alliance) and various manufacturers urged that the Board suspend the ZEV program in favor of a "Fair Market Test" the Alliance had proposed.
It would be implemented through a limited liability corporation that would obtain contributions of electric vehicles and funds from large and intermediate volume automobile manufacturers.
It would then sell to the public the EVs it had obtained through these manufacturer contributions.
The goal of the Fair Market Test would be to assess whether there is any realistic prospect for a mass market in battery-powered EVs, by comparing the price customers are willing to pay for vehicles sold during the program to the cost of producing and selling a higher volume of EVs under a ZEV mandate.
These would be determined by a blue-ribbon panel.
The program would last for three years and involve 2500 EVs per year (500 full function EVs, 750 city vehicles and 1250 NEVs.)
We believe that the Fair Market Test proposal is based on a false premise ­ that high volume cost at this early stage of technology development is relevant to the long-term cost of battery electric vehicles.
Industry has stated that volume should not be increased until several evolutions of technology occur.
Yet the fair market test proposes to determine the fate of ZEVs based on the cost of producing today's vehicles in volume.
This approach does not allow for or take into consideration cost reductions due to improvements in technology.
Moreover, by its structure the fair market test would remove any incentive for manufacturers to pursue such technological improvements.
Also, the manufacturers' proposed alternative would suspend not only the ZEV requirements for pure ZEVs, but also the requirements for PZEVs and AT PZEVs.
There is no need for a market test of these technologies because they are being sold now.
As proposed, the test would severely limit the size and scope of the ZEV program, create additional uncertainty, fail to encourage further technical progress, and limit the Board's authority.
General Motors (GM) urged that as an alternative means of obtaining the emission reductions attributed to the ZEV requirements by staff, the Board should consider adopting amendments that extend the useful life of several specific types of conventional vehicles (LEV I, ULEV I, LEV II and ULEV II vehicles), and vehicles meeting the enhanced and "near-zero" evaporative emissions standards, to 150,000 miles.
GM asserted that this alternative was also far more cost-effective than the ZEV
5
requirements.
However, such an approach would not achieve the long-term goals that are at the foundation of the ZEV program.
It is questionable, given California's vehicle population and vehicle mile traveled per year, whether air quality standards can be met without zero emission vehicles in our future vehicle fleet mix.
As such, it would be inappropriate to allow manufacturers to substitute alternative emission reduction programs for the ZEV requirement that moves the vehicle fleet so significantly in the direction it needs to go in order to meet our goals for vehicle emissions.
Other alternatives raised by manufacturers are addressed in the comments and responses section of this Final Statement.
The ARB has accordingly determined that none of the alternatives considered by the ARB would be more effective in carrying out the purpose for which this regulatory action is designed, or would be as effective and less burdensome to affected private parties than the action taken.
II.
MODIFICATIONS TO THE ORIGINAL PROPOSAL A. 1.
AN OVERVIEW OF THE ORIGINAL PROPOSAL The Preexisting ZEV Regulation
The California ZEV regulation was originally adopted in 1990, as part of the first ARB Low-Emission Vehicle (LEV I) regulations.
The ZEV program is an integral part of California's mobile source control efforts, and is intended to encourage the development of advanced technologies that will secure increasing air quality benefits for California now and into the future.
As originally adopted, the ZEV regulation required that specified percentages of the passenger cars and lightest light-duty trucks produced by each of the seven largest auto manufacturers be ZEVs, starting in 1998.
The percentages were 2 percent for the 1998-2000 model years and 5 percent for the 2001-2002 model years.
A requirement of 10 percent ZEVs applied to all but small-volume manufacturers starting in model-year 2003.
The ZEV program also includes a marketable credits system.
In 1996 the ARB modified the regulations to allow additional time for the technology to develop.
The requirement for 10 percent ZEVs in model years 2003 and beyond was maintained, but the sales requirement for model years 1998 through 2002 was eliminated.
At that same time, the ARB entered into Memoranda of Agreement (MOAs) with the seven largest auto manufacturers.
Under the MOAs the manufacturers agreed to place more than 1,800 advanced-battery electric vehicles (EVs) in California in the years 1998 through 2000, and the ARB agreed to work with state and local governments to help develop ZEV infrastructure and remove barriers to ZEV introduction.
As part of the 1998 "LEV II" rulemaking, the ARB provided additional flexibility in the ZEV program by allowing additional types of vehicles to be used to meet program requirements.
Under the 1998 amendments, manufacturers may use partial credits of 0.2 or more
6
generated from vehicles with extremely low emissions (referred to as partial ZEV allowance vehicles or PZEVs) to meet the 10 percent ZEV requirement.
However, large-volume manufacturers must, at a minimum, have 4 percent of their California fleet of passenger cars and lightest trucks be vehicles classified as "full" ZEVs.
Other aspects of the program provide additional options to manufacturers.
Auto companies can earn extra ZEV allowances by introducing vehicles before the 2003 model year, thereby reducing their total ZEV obligation.
Extra allowance is also available for battery electric vehicles with more than a 100-mile range per charge.
Manufacturers may also delay compliance by one year provided they produce two years' worth of ZEVs by the end of the 2004 model year.
If no change were made to the preexisting ZEV regulation, ARB staff estimates that approximately 22,000 full function electric vehicles would need to be offered for sale in 2003 to meet a four percent ZEV requirement.
However, this total could change significantly, up or down, based on each manufacturer's actual production decisions and their chosen compliance path.
As noted above, early ZEV introduction or the use of additional vehicles with extended range would decrease the 2003 obligation.
Reduced reliance on PZEVs, on the other hand, would increase the number of ZEVs needed.
Widespread use of City EVs or Neighborhood Electric Vehicles (NEVs) also would increase the required number of EVs, because such vehicles earn fewer credits per vehicle than the full function EVs that are the basis of the 22,000 estimate.
Staff estimates that, if the current regulation continued to apply, ZEV production of full function vehicles at the 4 percent level would reach 31,000 in the 2006 model year, and 39,000 in 2008 and beyond.
2.
The 2000 Biennial Review
When the Board adopted the LEV I regulations in 1990, it directed staff to report biennially on the status of technological progress towards meeting the LEV and ZEV requirements.
As part of the 2000 Biennial Review, in August 2000 the staff released a Staff Report assessing the technical and economic issues related to ZEVs.
In the 2000 Biennial Review, the staff presented to the Board its assessment of the current status of ZEV technology and the prospects for improvement in the near- and long-term.
To help assess the current status of technology and environmental impact of the program, ARB funded two research projects, one to examine the performance, cost and availability of advanced batteries, and the other to examine fuel cycle emissions from various automotive fuels.
ARB also jointly funded, with the California Energy Commission, an analysis of the fuel-cycle energy conversion efficiency for various fuel types.
The findings of these research efforts indicated that several battery technologies have demonstrated promise to meet the power requirements for electric vehicle propulsion.
However, the cost of these batteries will likely be high, even in volume production.
This finding, when incorporated into per vehicle cost analysis and lifecycle cost analysis, shows electric vehicles to be significantly more costly than conventional vehicles in the 2003
7
timeframe.
The Battery Panel study also found that energy density, which impacts vehicle range, remains an issue.
Significant improvements in energy density were not forecasted with currently available battery chemistries.
Consequently, significant improvements in vehicle range are not expected of near-term electric vehicles.
While current electric vehicle consumers have not found range to be an issue, manufacturers are concerned about wider market acceptance of vehicles with limited range.
The marginal fuel cycle emissions of nonmethane organic gases (NMOG), oxides of nitrogen (NOx), and toxics are significantly lower in California for electricity than for the other fuels considered.
When considering both upstream and tailpipe emissions, battery EVs contribute less CO2 emissions compared to other vehicle technologies.
As electric vehicle technology has advanced and vehicle makers have adapted to current circumstances, it appears that EVs in a wide range of vehicle types could be available in 2003.
Staff identified several potential applications in which these vehicles could be employed.
However, manufacturers expressed concern that adequate market interest does not exist to absorb the required volume of EVs in 2003 and beyond for reasons related to cost, range, and recharging time.
On September 7-8, 2000, the Board met to consider the Staff Report and to hear public comment on the status of the ZEV program and whether changes to the regulations were needed.
After receiving extensive oral and written comments, the Board adopted a resolution affirming that the ZEV program is an essential component of the State's long-term air quality strategy and resolving that the basic ZEV requirements be retained and implemented in California.
At the same time, the Board directed staff to develop and propose regulatory modifications and other steps that address the challenges associated with the successful long-term implementation of the ZEV program, and that result in a sustainable market for ZEVs.
In particular, the Board identified the need for near-term product availability and market stability, the need to greatly enhance public education regarding the attributes and benefits of ZEV technologies, and the need to reduce or mitigate the high initial costs of vehicles and batteries in low-volume production.
3.
The Originally Proposed Amendments Released December 8, 2000
In preparing proposed amendments in response to the Board's directions, the staff pursued the following objectives: · · · · Provide incentives for ongoing technology advancement, across a wide variety of vehicle types (both ZEVs and PZEVs), Maintain the visibility and momentum of the ZEV program during this period of further development, Ensure that an adequate number of battery EVs is available in the near term to explore many different possible market applications, Take advantage of the air quality benefits afforded by available PZEV technology,
8
·
Adjust the near term production requirements to better correspond to PZEV availability and the emerging market for ZEVs.
The staff proposed two basic types of amendments.
The first was adjustments to the rate and timing of ZEV and PZEV introduction to better reflect the near-term realities of cost and availability.
The second was adjustments to the credit and allowance calculation mechanism and the incentives that it provides.
The staff also proposed several miscellaneous administrative and cleanup changes.
The principal proposed amendments were as follows.
(a) Adjustments to the Rate and Timing of ZEV and PZEV Introduction Introduction of PZEVs.
The staff proposed the establishment of multipliers for the introduction of PZEVs that would provide extra allowances for PZEVs in the early years.
The proposed phase-in level is 25 percent of the current requirement in 2003, 50 percent in 2004, 75 percent in 2005, and 100 percent in 2006.
In addition, the existing SULEV intermediate compliance standards would apply to all 2005 and earlier model-year PZEVs.
Manufacturers would also be provided two years to make up a PZEV shortfall rather than one year allowed under the current regulation.
Introduction of ZEVs.
Several proposed changes would have the overall effect of reducing the number of ZEVs required, especially in the early years of the program.
First, the range and phase-in multipliers would be decoupled; the replacement range multiplier is discussed below.
ZEVs introduced before the 2006 model year would receive the following multipliers: 2.0 for the 1999-2001 model year, 1.5 for the 2002 model year, and 1.25 for the 2003-2005 model years.
This would incentivize early vehicle placements and create a smoother volume ramp-up to alleviate the compliance cost burden.
The credits earned by NEVs, which have a top speed of no more than 25 miles per hour, would be reduced to 0.625 for the 2004-2005 model years.
For 2006 and subsequent years the credit would be further reduced to 0.15.
The staff concluded it was inappropriate for NEVs to receive the same credits as other ZEVs, given their lesser functionality and cost.
Staff also proposed that the 10 percent ZEV requirement for large and medium volume manufacturers be ramped up to 11 percent for the 2009-2011 model years, 12 percent for the 2012-2014 model years, 14 percent for the 2015-2017 model years, and 16 percent for 2018 and subsequent model years.
This ramp up will further encourage the commercialization of a number of emerging zero emission and near zero emission technologies now under development.
(b) Modifications to the Incentive Structure Classifying hybrid-electric vehicles (HEVs) with an all-electric range of 20 miles or more as ZEVs.
Staff proposed that "extended range HEVs" ­ which must have an all electric
9
range of 20 miles or more and also meet the basic PZEV requirements ­ be allowed to satisfy the 4 percent ZEV requirement.
The credits earned by such vehicles would be calculated according to their zero emission range, adjusted to reflect the fact that the effective range of such vehicles is greater than that of pure battery electric vehicles due to their hybrid power train.
This proposal was made in order to create incentive for manufacturers to develop this type of vehicle which has significant market acceptance and zero emission miles traveled (and therefore air quality benefit) potential.
Allowing advanced technologies to satisfy part of the 4 percent ZEV requirement.
Staff proposed that certain other advanced technologies that are not ZEVs be allowed to satisfy up to one half of the 4 percent portion of the ZEV requirement.
The advanced technologies would be any PZEV qualifying for an allowance of 0.4 or more (before any multipliers), and allowances earned by manufacturers due to placing vehicles as part of an innovative "transportation system."
Since other proposed amendments would enable a power-assist HEV to earn an allowance of 0.45, this type of vehicle would be eligible to take advantage of the "transportation system" option.
The preexistent mechanism under which a PZEV earning a score of 1.0 is considered a full ZEV allowance vehicle, not subject to the 60 percent limit for PZEV allowances, would be eliminated.
As implementation of the ZEV requirements approached, it became clear that little incentive existed in the preexisting mandate to produce PZEVs other than gasoline PZEVs.
In order to distinguish more between gasoline PZEVs and other advanced technology PZEVs (hybrids, alternative fuel vehicles and fuel cells running on a carbonbased fuel) while also providing a further option to reduce the pure ZEV obligation, this strategy of creating the AT PZEV category was proposed.
Staff also proposed that manufacturers that meet an accelerated PZEV phase-in schedule (50 percent of the preexisting requirement in 2003 and 100 percent of the preexisting requirement in 2004) be granted an additional 2 years to make up any shortfall in their use of the advanced technology PZEV option in 2003 and 2004.
This would reward manufacturers who over-comply with the regulation by providing them with an element of compliance flexibility in return.
As the ZEV requirement increases over time starting in the 2009 model year, staff proposed that the portion that can be satisfied by 0.2 allowance PZEVs be held at 6 percent.
Thus the "ZEV" portion would gradually increase from 4 percent in the 2003 through 2008 model years to 10 percent by 2018.
Staff proposed that up to one half of this ZEV portion could be satisfied by advanced technologies.
Thus the amount that could be offset would be 2 percent in the 2003 model year, increasing to 5 percent in 2018.
This element would help grow the pure ZEV technology and increase the emissions benefit of the program over time, thus making up any short term emissions benefit loses by decreasing the number of required vehicles in the early years of the program.
Modifying the ZEV range credit.
The proposal would modify the ZEV range credit to reduce the minimum range needed for multiple credits to 50 miles.
As range increases from 50 miles to 275 miles the credit would increase from 1 to 10.
Because vehicles
10
with a refueling time of less than 10 minutes earn the maximum credit regardless of range, a hydrogen fuel cell vehicle would earn 10 credits, not including any phase-in multiplier.
A longer sliding scale for range multiplier provides appropriate relative credit for the full range of vehicles expected to meet market needs.
Additional credits for a vehicle in California service for more than three years with an extended battery/fuel cell stack warranty.
Under the proposal a manufacturer would receive a credit of 0.1 times the original credit value of the vehicle for each year that a vehicle remains in service in California past three years with extended warranty coverage on the battery or fuel cell stack.
The credit would be earned at the end of the year of service, and would be available for use in the following year.
This was designed to encourage long term placement of vehicles in California, thus increasing the air quality benefit of the vehicles.
Additionally, the inclusion of a warranty offers consumers with economic certainty over an unfamiliar technology.
Increasing the Advanced ZEV Componentry Allowance for PZEVs.
The preexisting regulation provided an allowance of 0.1 for vehicles that do not qualify for a zeroemission VMT allowance but are equipped with advanced ZEV componentry.
The proposal would increase the advanced ZEV componentry allowance to 0.25.
Thus a PZEV power assist hybrid vehicle would earn an allowance of 0.45, before any phase-in multipliers.
This would encourage the production of these clean-air, highly efficient vehicles over gasoline PZEVs, thus rewarding reductions in not only ozone precursor emissions, but also green house gas emissions and dependence on carbon-based fuels.
Credit multiplier based on vehicle efficiency, phased in beginning in 2005.
The preexisting regulation did not address vehicle energy efficiency directly, but did so indirectly with the range multiplier.
The staff's original proposal would establish an efficiency multiplier that would partially replace the range multiplier on a phased-in basis beginning in 2005.
The efficiency multiplier would be limited to ZEVs and advanced technology PZEVs (PZEVs qualifying for an allowance of 0.4 or more, before any multipliers).
All vehicle efficiencies (gasoline, CNG, electric) would be converted into the common units of miles per gallon equivalent (mpeg).
In order to earn any credit, a vehicle would have to have an efficiency that is at greater than a baseline level.
The multiplier earned would be the larger of 1.0 or the vehicle mpeg divided by the baseline.
For ZEVs, as the efficiency multiplier is phased in, the range multiplier would be reduced to one half of its initial value.
For PZEVs, the efficiency multiplier would be in addition to the current scores earned.
Similar to the immediately preceding amendment, this change would reward vehicles that achieve high efficiency.
Allowances for vehicles placed in an approved demonstration program.
Staff proposed that vehicles placed in advanced technology demonstration programs (e.g. Fuel Cell Partnership vehicles) earn ZEV allowances even if they are not "delivered for sale".
This would provide a mechanism for recognizing early demonstration vehicles used in California that further the development of ZEVs.
11
ZEV credits for innovative transportation systems.
The original staff proposal provided additional credit for ZEVs used as part of an innovative transportation system that effectively links homes, transit systems and cars (e.g. a station car).
The credits could be used in the same manner as credits from advanced technology PZEVs.
Requiring vehicle placement in order to earn multiple allowances.
Under the original proposal, vehicles that are "delivered for sale" but not actually placed in service would earn only one allowance.
Multiple allowances would only be available to vehicles that are actually placed in service in California.
To earn multiple allowances, manufacturers would be required to certify to the Executive Officer the number of vehicles placed in service during the course of the model year.
This approach ensures maximum air quality benefit by only awarding multiple credits to vehicles in service, actually replacing polluting vehicle miles traveled and it protects against ZEVs being produced but parked or not actively marketed.
Sales volume number used to determine the ZEV obligation.
Under the preexisting regulation, the ZEV obligation for a manufacturer in a given model year is based upon the number of passenger cars and light duty trucks sold by the manufacturer in that same model year.
As a result the exact obligation is not known in advance, which complicates compliance planning.
In order to provide greater certainty, the proposed amendments would make the sales volume used to determine manufacturers' ZEV obligation in a given year a function of vehicle sales in a prior year, and freeze the volume number for three years at a time.
This change would be limited only to the determination of the sales volume against which the ZEV percentage requirements are assessed in a given year.
It would not affect the determination of manufacturer status (large vs. intermediate vs. small) , which is handled separately.
It would provide increased certainty to manufacturers for compliance planning purposes.
Amendments pertaining to manufacturer categories.
The original proposal would increase the maximum size cut-off for an intermediate volume manufacturer from 35,000 to 60,000 new light- and medium-duty vehicles per model year.
When a manufacturer transitions from intermediate to large volume manufacturer, there would be no "pure" ZEV obligation for the manufacturer until the sixth model year after three consecutive model years over the large manufacturer threshold.
An independently owned manufacturer with California sales of light- and medium-duty vehicles not exceeding 10,000 per year would not be subject to the ZEV requirement.
Since the industry as a whole has grown over the last ten years, yet the relative size between manufacturers has remained fairly stable, it was appropriate to adjust the manufacturer size definitions to affect the manufacturers according to their size as intended when the regulation was initially adopted.
4.
Expected Impacts of the Original Staff Proposal
Under the preexisting regulation, for model year 2003 roughly 22,000 ZEVs would have to be produced assuming 100 percent full function vehicles, and about 38,600 ZEVs would have to be produced if the manufacturers built 100 percent City EVs or NEVs.
In
12
addition, large manufacturers would produce about 290,000 PZEVs, and intermediate manufacturers would produce another 90,000 PZEVs.
The total near-term incremental cost for full function ZEVs was estimated to range between $13,000 and $24,000, depending on the type of vehicle and the battery employed.
For City EVs the estimated near term incremental cost ranges from $7,500 to $10,000.
PZEV SULEVs were estimated at $500 incremental cost (the estimate has subsequently been revised), and PZEV HEVs at $3,300.
In analyzing the cost impact of the proposed amendments, staff assumed an incremental cost of $17,000 for full function EVs (between the low and high staff estimates), $8,000 for City EVs, $1,000 for NEVs, $500 for PZEV SULEVs, and $3,300 for PZEV HEVs.
Using these estimates and assumptions, the total cost of the preexisting regulation for model-year 2003 was estimated to be roughly $39 million to $374 million for the 4 percent ZEV component (100 percent NEVs at the low end and 100 percent full function EVs at the high end), and roughly $190 million for the 6 percent PZEV component.
Staff estimated the number of vehicles that would be required by the originally proposed amendments under two alternative scenarios.
The first assumed full 4 percent ZEV production (no use of the 2 percent advanced technology PZEV option).
Under this scenario, the number of ZEVs in 2003 would be roughly 9,300 for full-function EVs, 23,500 for City EVs, or 77,200 for NEVs.
The number of PZEVs in 2003 is roughly 72,000 for large manufacturers plus 22,500 for intermediate manufacturers.
These vehicle totals result in a 2003 cost for 4 percent ZEV production of $78 million assuming NEVs, $188 million assuming City EVs, and $158 million assuming full function EVs.
The cost of PZEV production was estimated at approximately $47 million.
The second alternative scenario assumed that manufacturers take full advantage of the option to offset 2 percent of the ZEV requirement using advanced technology PZEVs.
For purposes of this scenario it was assumed that the advanced technology PZEVs offered for sale in 2003 would primarily be PZEV versions of power-assist hybrid-electric vehicles such as the Prius or Insight.
Under this scenario the number of ZEVs is 4,650 assuming full function, 11,750 assuming City EVs, and 38,600 assuming NEVs.
It assumes 0 .2 allowance PZEV production of about 72,000 for large manufacturers plus 22,500 for intermediate manufacturers.
Finally, it assumes production of 10,700 advanced technology PZEVs.
These vehicle totals result in a 2003 cost for ZEV production of $39 million for NEVs, $94 million for City EVs, or $79 million for full function EVs.
The cost for regular (0.2 allowance) PZEVs was estimated to be about $47 million, and the cost for advanced technology PZEVs about $35 million.
Adding up the total cost of the program (ZEV, PZEV and advanced-technology PZEV production), the savings resulting from the originally proposed amendments in model year 2003 was estimated to range from about $107 million (for a manufacturer that meets its ZEV obligation with 100 percent NEVs under both the current and amended regulation) to more than $400 million (for a manufacturer that meets its ZEV obligation with 100 percent full function EVs under both scenarios).
The savings in model year
13
2004 would be less than in 2003, due to the increased volume of PZEV production required as the PZEV phase-in multiplier is reduced.
B. MODIFICATIONS TO THE ORIGINAL PROPOSAL
1.
Description of and Rationale for Modifications As finally adopted, the amendments in this rulemaking reflect a number of significant modifications to the originally proposed regulatory text.
The regulatory language made available by the Notice of Availability of Modified Text identified all of the modifications and provided the rationale for each.
The document showing the modified regulatory text is appended hereto as Attachment 2.
The most significant modifications are described below.
(a) Making Light-duty Trucks in the "LDT2" Class Subject to the Percentage ZEV Requirements The only light-duty trucks that are subject to the percentage ZEV requirements in the preexisting ZEV regulation are those with a loaded vehicle weight of 0-3750 pounds ­ often referred to as the "LDT1" class and including small trucks such as the Ford Ranger.
This limitation was criticized by a number of commenters ­ Natural Resources Defense Council, Planning and Conservation League, American Lung Association, Kirsch Foundation, CALPIRG, Coalition for Clean Air, Union of Concerned Scientists, California Electric Transportation Coalition and Sierra Club ­ who argued that the requirements should apply to sport-utility vehicles (SUVs), minivans, and other heavier light trucks as well.
In response to these comments, one of the principal modifications made by the Board was to expand the percentage ZEV requirement to apply to the "LDT2" class as well ­ a "LEV I" light-duty truck with a loaded vehicle weight of 3751-5750 pounds, and a "LEV II" light-duty truck with a loaded vehicle weight of 3751 pounds to a gross vehicle weight of 8500 pounds.
Application to the LDT2 category is phased in over the 2007 to 2012 model years, with the inclusion of an additional 17 percent of these vehicles each year until the last 15 percent is added in 2012.
Based on current sales figures, adding LDT2 vehicles to the base will increase the base by about 70 percent when the phase-in is complete.
The Board was motivated by two primary considerations.
First, while a large percentage of vehicles in the LDT2 category have traditionally been used for work purposes, it is now very common for the SUVs, pick-up trucks and minivans making up the category to be used primarily for personal transportation, i.e. as passenger cars.
In recognition of this phenomenon, a key element of the LEV II rulemaking in 1998 was to make these vehicles subject to the same exhaust emission standards as passenger cars.
This requirement is being phased in during the 2004 ­ 2007 model years.
For the same reason it is appropriate for these vehicles to trigger the same ZEV obligations as passenger cars.
Secondly, the current regulation encourages a
14
manufacturer to sell more large, inefficient vehicles in order to reduce the number of zero and near zero emission vehicles it must produce.
(b) Doubling the Number of ZEVs Required by the 2012 Model Year Compared to the Modified Staff Proposal, With the Ramp up Beginning in the 2007 Model Year At the conclusion of the January 25, 2001 hearing, the Board directed staff to make further adjustments to increase the number of ZEVs to about twice the level called for under the original staff proposal.
The modified amendments revise some of the internal calculation factors to achieve this result.
This change applies to ZEVs only, and does not affect the required number of AT PZEVs or PZEVs.
The increase in the number of ZEVs required as a result of including the LDT2 category in the base was included in determining the necessary modifications to result in the overall increase directed by the Board.
As part of this modification, staff revised its assumptions regarding the typical efficiency of ZEVs in 2007 and beyond, in a manner that slightly increases the required number of vehicles.
Overall, this increase is designed to preserve the technologyforcing nature of the ZEV regulation, spur more rapid investment in ZEV technologies and development of fuel cell technologies, and maintain sufficient volumes to achieve cost reductions.
(c) Not Allowing Extended Range HEVs to Be Counted Towards the Core 20 Percent of a Large Volume Manufacturer's Percentage ZEV Requirement, With Other Compensating Modifications At the hearing the Board concluded it was inappropriate to adopt the element of the staff proposal that would allow extended range HEVs to be counted towards the requirement that at least 20 percent of a large volume manufacturer's percentage ZEV requirement be actual ZEVs.
The fundamental distinctions between a true ZEV and an HEV with an all-electric range of 20 miles or more are sufficiently great ­ particularly with regard to the potential for emissions degradation ­ that a large volume manufacturer should not be allowed meet its core 20 percent ZEV requirement with extended range HEVs.
In order to provide substitute incentives for extended-range HEVs, the modifications allow these vehicles to earn a zero-emission VMT PZEV allowance beginning with 10 miles of electric range rather than 20 miles (§ 1962(c)(3)(A)), and provide additional phase-in credit for vehicles introduced through 2011 (§ 1962(c)(7)(C)). (d) Revising the Credit Relationship Between Fuel Cell Vehicles and Battery Electric Vehicles in the Later Implementation Years The original proposal provided permanent additional credits for fast refueling.
We have concluded that while these provisions are appropriate in the early years, in later years they would result in too few vehicles being required under compliance scenarios that rely on hydrogen fuel cell vehicles.
This would be counter to the Board's objective of equalizing in the long term the credits earned by battery EVs and hydrogen fuel cell
15
EVs.
Accordingly, we have sunsetted the fast fueling multipliers in section 1962(d)(3)(C )2 after the 2008 model year.
(e) Identifying More Specific Criteria For Determining Qualification For an "Advanced Componentry" Allowance and Providing for Graduated Allowances Under the original proposal, all PZEVs qualifying for an advanced ZEV componentry allowance would receive an allowance of 0.25.
However, this approach made no distinction between different kinds of advanced ZEV componentry that made varying kinds of contributions towards ZEV technologies.
The modifications provide an advanced ZEV componentry allowance of 0.1 for high-pressure gaseous fuel or hydrogen storage systems, which may not have qualified at all under the original proposal.
This expressly recognizes that such storage systems can help provide a pathway towards hydrogen fuel cell vehicles.
For other componentry, we have replaced the uniform 0.25 allowance with three alternative means of calculating the allowance, the last of which is available through the 2007 model year only.
Providing these options recognizes that manufacturers might use a variety of approaches in incorporating advanced ZEV componentry on PZEVs.
The first option ­ the CO2 reduction method -- is based on the CO2 savings that a vehicle achieves versus the average for its class.
This metric was chosen because of the effect of global warming on ground level ozone production, and the emerging importance of CO2 savings as a vehicle technology goal.
The second option ­ the efficiency method ­ is based on "best in class" efficiency performance within each size and weight classification.
Since energy storage and range present the greatest challenges for today's ZEVs, efficiency is a useful measure of the extent to which new technologies will contribute towards a zero emission future.
The near-term third alternative bases the allowance on the percentage of maximum available power from electric storage.
This characteristic is beneficial as a transition to pure ZEVs. (f) Expanding the Provisions on ZEV Credits for "Transportation Systems" The original staff proposal provided additional credit for vehicles placed in innovative transportation systems that will effectively link home, transit, and work.
Such systems have the potential to reduce emissions, encourage transit use, reduce vehicle miles traveled and congestion, and relieve parking problems.
At the public hearing, the Board directed staff to pursue an implementation partnership and other measures to further encourage the introduction of such innovative transportation systems in California.
In following up on the Board's directive, staff prepared modifications to section 1962(g)(5) intended to encourage the development of a few such systems, which then can be evaluated in terms of their air quality and transportation impact.
Under the original staff proposal, this credit was only available to ZEVs and range extended hybrid vehicles; was capped at twice the base value of the vehicle excluding any early introduction multipliers; and could only be used within the middle two percent.
16
In order to provide additional incentives for such projects, the following modifications were made.
Allowing other vehicle types to earn transportation system credit.
AT PZEVs and PZEVs will be able to earn additional credit if placed in transportation system programs.
NEVs are excluded from qualification for such credits, reflecting the Board's intent that NEVs not earn additional credit other than the early introduction multiplier.
Allowing transportation system credit earned by ZEVs to satisfy the top 2 percent.
The transportation system credit earned by a vehicle will be available for use in the same manner as other credits earned by that vehicle.
For example, transportation system credit earned by a ZEV can be used to satisfy the top 2 percent, credit e arned by AT PZEVs can be used towards the middle 2 percent, and credit earned by PZEVs can be used towards the 6 percent.
Increasing the transportation system credits available.
The additional credits available for vehicles placed in a transportation system are increased to a maximum of 9 for a ZEV, 6 for an AT PZEV, or 3 for a PZEV.
Capping the maximum allowable use of such credits in any given year.
Credits earned by ZEVs, AT PZEVs, or PZEVs, including the credits earned by the vehicle itself, can only be used to satisfy a portion of the manufacturers obligation (one tenth each for ZEVs, one twentieth for AT PZEVs, and one fiftieth for PZEVs), and could only be used in the same manner as credits earned by other vehicles of that category.
Incorporating a credit allocation process.
It is likely that many transportation system projects will involve more than one vehicle manufacturer.
In such projects, manufacturers may make different contributions ­ for instance, one may provide vehicles only, while another may provide vehicles, system software, and technical assistance.
To accommodate the variety of possible approaches and provide maximum flexibility, the "generation" of credits is separated from the "allocation" of credits: § Credits will be "generated" by vehicles placed in a project, according to the characteristics of the project.
For example, a hypothetical project may involve 50 ZEVs (25 from manufacturer A and 25 from Manufacturer B).
If the project meets all criteria, then all ZEVs placed in the project would earn the maximum credit level available (9 per vehicle), resulting in a total of 450 credits.
These credits would be assigned to the project manager.
Credits will be "allocated" by the project manager, in keeping with the contributions of each manufacturer.
Using the example given above, if Manufacturer A provided software and in-kind contributions, and Manufacturer B only provided vehicles, the project manager could decide to award 300 credits to Manufacturer A and 150 to Manufacturer B. Alternatively, the project manager and manufacturers could agree to allocate 400 credits to participating manufacturers and reserve 50 credits to be marketed by the project manager.
All parties to the project would need to agree on
§
17
the proposed allocation.
ARB then would assign credits to individual manufacturers based upon a written proposed allocation from the project manager, signed by the manufacturers involved.
Sunsetting the credit mechanism after the 2007 model year.
The modifications are designed to encourage experimentation with transportation system projects.
The modifications sunset the enhanced credits after the 2007 model year, such that a future Board action will be needed to continue them at the appropriate level.
This makes clear that the near-term credit levels are not intended to continue indefinitely, but rather should be reviewed when we have real-world data regarding VMT, trip reduction, transit substitution patterns, and other relevant factors.
(g) Allowing a Manufacturer the Option of Basing its Percentage ZEV Requirements on Current Rather Than Prior-Year Sales Under the original staff proposal, sales from prior years are used to determine the base against which the ZEV percentage requirement is assessed.
This was done in order to provide manufacturers with a firm target.
Manufacturers pointed out, however, that if sales decline they could have trouble meeting an obligation based on higher past year sales.
In response to this concern section 1962(b)(1)(B) has been revised to give a manufacturer the option to base its ZEV obligation on current rather than prior sales.
(h) Limiting the Use of ZEV Credits Earned from 2001-2005 Model Year NEVs Throughout the Biennial Review process and the consideration of the ZEV regulation, one fundamental underlying objective of the Board has been to encourage a smooth, orderly progression in ZEV development and availability.
That philosophy accounts for many features of the modified regulation, which in general provides considerable flexibility and aggressive incentives in the early years, many of which are phased out in the 2007-2012 timeframe as the technology matures.
The Board recognized that NEVs could play a role in this overall progression, providing a low-cost alternative to manufacturers in the near term while introducing the public to electric transportation and satisfying various specialized applications.
Thus the Board adopted the staff recommendation that NEVs be granted early introduction credits, which then phased down to the 0.15 level by model year 2006.
Public comments on the October 31, 2001 staff proposed modifications pointed out , however, that the NEV early introduction incentives could in some scenarios jeopardize the attainment of the "red line" as directed by the Board.
Specifically, the introduction of large numbers of NEVs in the 2001-2002 model years could allow manufacturers to earn sufficient credits to completely "walk away" from the ZEV program for a number of years; plausibly through 2008 and beyond.
The possibility of such a significant blackout period in ZEV availability is of concern and is contrary to the overall objectives of this rulemaking.
At the same time, we recognize
18
that manufacturers have made product planning decisions based on the regulatory structure as proposed.
Therefore it is necessary to provide sufficient lead-time prior to any changes.
Accordingly, the final amendments provide that credits earned from NEVs offered for sale or placed in service in model years 2001-2005 cannot be used for more than 75% of any program category (ZEV, AT PZEV and PZEV) in the 2006 model year, or 50 percent of any program category in the 2007 and subsequent model years.
This should not affect any strategy that is based on an ongoing, sustainable introduction of ZEV and near ZEV vehicles.
Rather, it only constrains approaches that would use large numbers of banked NEV credits to avoid any meaningful participation in the ZEV and near-ZEV market in the 2006 model years and beyond.
2.
Projected ZEV Volumes For the 2003 Model Year Resulting From the Adopted Amendments Given the significant differences between the initial staff proposal and the adopted amendments, the staff has prepared revised projections of the 2003 model year ZEV volumes resulting from the final amendments.
California sales of passenger cars plus light duty trucks by the large automobile manufacturers total approximately one million vehicles per year.
As a rule of thumb, therefore, each one percent of PC plus LDT1 vehicle sales equals about ten thousand vehicles per year.
At current sales levels, LDT2 sales in California are about 700,000 per year.
Thus when LDT2 vehicles are fully phased in, each one percent of sales will be about 17,000 vehicles per year.
The calculation of the actual number of vehicles needed to meet the ZEV requirement in any given year is considerably more complex, however, due to several factors: · Different vehicle types (full function EVs, City EVs, Neighborhood Electric Vehicles, hydrogen fuel cell vehicles) earn different credit levels.
· Manufacturers earn "multipliers" for vehicles with extended range, with additional allowances for vehicles delivered prior to 2003.
Taken together these two factors can result in some 20 allowances per vehicle for full function electric vehicles delivered in MY 2000 and 2001, or up to 40 allowances per vehicle for hydrogen fuel cell vehicles delivered in those years.
These credits can be saved for use in subsequent years.
· In addition to the multipliers discussed above, ZEV credits "banked" in a prior year have greater value when "cashed" in a subsequent year, based on the relative values for the NMOG fleet average for the years in question.
Under this provision, for example, ZEV credits earned in 1999 are multiplied by 1.82 if used in 2003, and credits earned in 2000, 2001 and 2002 are multiplied by 1.18, 1.13, and 1.1 respectively.
· Manufacturers are given one additional model year to make up any shortfall in ZEV production.
Thus, a manufacturer could choose to satisfy both its 2003 and 2004 obligation with vehicles delivered in 2004.
19
· ·
In order to meet their obligation, large manufacturers must offer for sale a minimum of 2 percent pure ZEVs.
They may, however, choose to meet the entire 10 percent requirement using pure ZEVs.
Overall vehicle sales will vary according to external economic conditions.
To provide a context for adoption of the final amendments, staff have developed a "base case" estimate of the number of ZEVs that the large manufacturers must produce in order to satisfy a 2 percent ZEV requirement.
This base case is not a prediction of actual production, but rather an estimate based on a consistent set of assumptions that can be used to track the effect of various program changes.
Due to trade secret considerations this estimate does not rely on any confidential information provided in the manufacturer product plans.
Instead, it is calculated using publicly available information, with the following assumptions: · The vehicles offered for sale in 2003 through 2007are identical in performance to the vehicles currently or most recently offered by the manufacturers.
Full function EVs offered for sale in 2008 and beyond have the performance characteristics of today's RAV4 EV. Manufacturers do not take advantage of the multipliers available for early introduction; the entire obligation is met with vehicles produced in 2003 and beyond.
Each manufacturer's obligation for 2003 through 2006 is based on its average production volume for 1997-1999.
The obligation for 2007 and beyond is based on production volume for 2000.
Manufacturers meet 60 percent of their ZEV obligation using partial ZEV allowances, 20 percent of their obligation using AT PZEVs, and 20 percent of their obligation using pure ZEVs.
· · ·
With these assumptions, and further assuming that manufacturers rely upon full function EVs to meet the ZEV portion of the requirement, vehicle production would be as follows:
20
Model Year 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020
Number of New Vehicles, by Technology Type PZEV 94015 193706 302267 393788 442658 497196 551380 609895 662305 708932 716056 724792 736281 735538 747522 760848 772728 785145 ATPZEV 10073 22171 26494 35799 40787 46082 63857 69702 76084 97697 98679 99883 133751 133616 135793 173103 175806 178631 ZEV 4477 4668 4817 5966 7198 7276 11052 12447 12473 17535 17712 17928 24673 24648 25049 32205 32708 33234
As noted above, however, actual production may vary significantly from these totals.
3.
Cost-Effectiveness State law requires that the motor vehicle emission standards adopted by the ARB be "cost-effective."
(Health 
Cost-effectiveness is typically expressed as the cost in dollars for each pound or ton of emissions reduced for a particular pollutant or pollutants.
In this way the "cost-effectiveness" of various emissions control measures can be compared.
Calculated in this traditional way, the "cost-effectiveness" value of the ZEV program as amended in this rulemaking is very costly compared to other adopted measures .
Analyses conducted by the private firm Air Improvement Resource, Inc. has identified cost effectiveness values ranging from $405,000 per ton initially to $115,000 per ton in later years.
Using AIR's cost assumptions (with one modification), but calculating cost effectiveness on an annual basis, staff has estimated values ranging from $227,000 per ton initially, to $58,200 per ton in later years.
Emission control measures implemented in the state have typically not exceeded $20,000 per ton.
But the ZEV program is not a traditional emission control measure, and the traditional way of comparing cost-effectiveness is not appropriate for this program.
Typically, any 21
given pound of emissions reduced for a pollutant is seen as just as "valuable" as any other pound of emissions reduced, at least where the time and place are comparable.
However, we believe that the value of a pound of emissions reduced from 2003 model year vehicles on account of the ZEV program is substantially greater than the value of a pound of emissions reduced by other control measures applicable to 2003 model year vehicles.
The Board seeks to achieve not only the maximum feasible emission reductions from on-road and off-road mobile sources in the near term, but also to take a quantum step forward in introducing zero-emission technologies for the long term.
In that sense, the ZEV program reflects the Board's vision of the future consisting of zero and near zeroemission vehicles.
Conventional technologies and fuels are not enough.
If we are to meet regional, state, and global environmental goals, we must drastically depart from today's vehicle designs.
The costs for zero emission technologies will be higher than other less dramatic departures, but the ultimate long-term pay-off is worth those greater costs.
Quite simply, the Board has concluded that zero-emission technology is necessary to achieve the State's public health protection goals.
Health-based state and federal air quality standards continue to be exceeded in regions throughout California.
California's burgeoning population and robust economy mean continued upward pressure on statewide emissions.
The number of vehicle miles traveled each day continues to grow even faster than population.
Manufacturing, power generation, petroleum refining, goods transport, home heating and cooling, personal mobility and a wide range of human activities all have direct air pollution consequences.
Accomplishing zero emissions in any of these source categories (or portion thereof) mitigates their adverse impacts and protects human health.
The ZEV program is a cornerstone of the Board's long-term vision.
It is not just another control program that makes incremental improvements to some small segment of the inventory.
Rather, the ZEV program involves a transformation of our vehicle pollution control strategy, towards vehicles with lifetime durability.
This has implications not just for ozone but for air toxics, global warming, energy supply, water pollution, and other issues.
The Board pursues zero-emission technologies so aggressively because they transcend some of the persistent problems with conventional air pollution sources.
Combustionbased engines are inherently higher emitting and prone to deterioration over time.
Catastrophic failures are also a concern.
Older gasoline-powered vehicles, for example, become gross emitters if their emission control systems fail.
Combustible fuels also have significant "upstream" impacts.
Refining, fuel storage and delivery all have associated emissions from both routine operations, accidents (breakdowns, fuel spills), and ongoing compliance problems (e.g., leaking underground tanks).
Apart from upset conditions that may occur during electric power generation, zero emission vehicles have none of these vulnerabilities.
Battery powered electric vehicles, and hydrogen fueled fuel cell vehicles, will remain emission-free throughout their useful
22
lives.
And the Board needs to maintain a core zero emission requirement to provide an incentive for further development.
The tremendous progress in vehicle pollution control technology that has been seen over the past decade can at least in part be attributed to the existence of the ZEV requirement.
This technological innovation has in many respects outstripped expectations, resulting in emissions reductions at lower costs than had previously been anticipated.
This may well occur in the future as well.
The Board views the cost-effectiveness of the ZEV program in the context of its long term vision, and accordingly places substantially greater value on the nearer term emission reductions achieved by the ZEV program.
It is with this view that we find the ZEV program as amended in this rulemaking to be cost-effective.
III.
SUMMARY OF PUBLIC COMMENTS AND AGENCY RESPONSES The Board received numerous written and oral comments, in connection with January 25, 2001 hearing and during the two subsequent 15-day comment periods.
Set forth below is a summary of each objection or recommendation specifically directed at the proposed amendments or to the procedures followed by the ARB in proposing or adopting the amendments, together with an agency response.
The comments have been grouped by topic whenever possible.
Comments not involving objections or recommendations specifically directed towards the rulemaking are not summarized below.
A. COMMENTS PRESENTED PRIOR TO, OR AT THE HEARING
(a) Comments that the Staff Proposal Reduces the ZEV Requirements T oo Much 1.
Comment: Do not make any changes to the current mandate, keep the mandate strong, as currently written.
(103 individuals, Wedaa, Joffe, Kirsch Foundation, Clean Air Now, Hodge, Dunlap, Huestis, Pohorsky, Hastrup) Agency Response: The Air Resources Board continues to believe in a strong ZEV mandate and remains committed to achieving zero emissions from vehicles.
At its September 7 and 8, 2000 hearing, the Board directed staff to develop and propose regulatory modifications and other steps to address the challenges associated with the successful long-term implementation of the ZEV program.
One of the Board's concerns in particular was to address near-term constraints due to cost, lead-time and technical challenges.
The alternative to not modify the ZEV mandate poses a great cost burden on manufacturers.
Batteries are the single most expensive component of electric vehicles.
For that reason, affordable battery packs--both today and when produced in volume-- are crucial to achieving a sustainable electric vehicle market.
ARB established an independent battery panel that concluded battery costs are indeed high and will not
23
meet cost-competitive targets for some time.
Although volume production will help, a breakthrough is needed to achieve truly affordable batteries for electric vehicles.
ARB staff believes a more gradual ramp of ZEV requirements is necessary to adjust for the realities of high cost and the development of battery technology.
At the hearing in January, the Board proposed a scenario that increases the number of ZEVs from Staff's proposal.
In addition, it is important to note that the Board's proposal when compared with the current mandate will eventually surpass the number of ZEVs required under a scenario where half the vehicles are full function EVs and half are city EVs.
The ARB believes that allowing a more gradual ramp of the ZEV requirements along with the Board's increase of ZEVs will ensure the long-term success of a sustainable market for ZEVs. 2.
Comment: The staff proposal is a significant weakening of the ZEV mandate.
It would dramatically reduce the number of ZEVs in both the near-term and long-term.
It is unfair to public agencies that have invested significant money and time into electric vehicle programs.
Maintain the current mandate, which is balanced and fair, and gives generous credit for an array of advanced technology vehicles.
(City of San Francisco) Agency Response: The rationale for reducing the number of vehicles in the near-term is described in the response to the comment above.
At the Board's direction, the number of required vehicles will double beginning in 2007.
The Board is committed to the ZEV program and placement of vehicles and infrastructure.
State agencies including the ARB have also invested funds into the program along with other public agencies.
These funds have helped, and will continue to aid in the development of ZEVs. 3.
Comment: We recommend that we make a smaller decrease in the number of short-term pure ZEV targets so that people can use the available incentive packages.
(CAPCOA, BAAQMD, SCAQMD) Agency Response: Please see response to Comment (a) 1.
4.
Comment: Continue program in California.
(The Chino, Coachella, Fontana, Redlands, and the Western to maintain your strong support of an aggressive ZEV cities of Santa Clarita, Twenty Nine Palms, Palm Springs, Montclair, Calabasas, El Segundo, Davis, San Bernardino, Riverside Council of Governments).
Agency Response : Please see response to Comment (a) 1.
5.
Comment: If the ARB compromises the numbers any more there will not be any credits left for ZEVs and the mandate will become ineffective.
The ZEV numbers should be kept at the current 4% or increased.
Starting now build ZEVs in the specified numbers to fulfill the mandate by 2003, deliver enough cars to fill the back log of orders, and offer more of these cars to the public as leases and purchase so there is no back log.
Open up sales to the rest of the United States.
Leave the numbers the same and get automakers to fill the back orders.
(Chapman)
24
Agency Response: Please see response (a) 1.
6.
Comment: Reinstate the 6 percent ZEV standard.
(Coffin)
Agency Response: In 1998, one of the amendments to the ZEV regulation was to decrease the number of battery electric vehicles from 10% to 4%.
Battery electric vehicle technology had not progressed as much as hoped then, nor has it now.
Thus, in 1998 an adjustment was made to allow partial ZEV (PZEV) credit for extremely clean vehicles that are not pure ZEVs.
In addition, there are other promising low emitting vehicle technologies on the horizon that ARB wants to encourage such as compressed natural gas, hybrid-electrics, and methanol fuel cells.
These vehicles are included in the staff proposal and can be used to satisfy up to half of the 4% ZEV requirement.
ARB staff believes that both of these adjustments in 1998 and now to the pure ZEV requirement are in keeping with the state of the technology development.
Please see also response (a) 1.
7.
Comment: The Board should require even larger fractions to meet the ZEV standards (e.g. 50% ZEV in 2010, 75 % in 2015) (Withycombe) Agency Response: The Board doubled the number of required ZEVs in the out years.
However, this increase is modest compared to the levels proposed by the commenter.
ARB staff believes that larger volumes of ZEVs than adopted by the Board are not technologically or economically feasible.
Please see also response (a) 1.
8.
Comment: Thank you for taking strong action in your September 2000 Board hearing to uphold the Zero-Emission Vehicle (ZEV) program and to affirm its importance for achieving California's air quality goals.
Now that you will be considering regulatory changes later this month, I am writing to urge you to demonstrate this same level of support for ZEVs by strengthening the program included in the staff proposal.
ZEVs are a proven and viable technology, and are essential to meet our air quality goals.
I believe that CARB must do everything possible to promote this technology instead of cutting back the program before it has a chance to succeed.
In order to keep the ZEV program strong, your leadership is needed to dramatically increase the numbers of zero-pollution vehicles required to be produced by auto makers in the staff proposal, as well as to ensure that the number of zero-pollution vehicles grows significantly over the next ten years.
Taking these actions will put the ZEV program back on track for 2003 and beyond.
Maintaining a strong ZEV program is critical to improving air quality and public health in my community, and other communities throughout California.
(96 individuals) Agency Response: Per the Board's directive at the January 2001 hearing, ARB staff is strengthening the original staff proposal by doubling the number of ZEVs required beginning in 2007.
The Board proposal also includes, beginning in 2007, the addition of sport utility vehicles, larger pickup trucks and vans in the sales figures used to calculate
25
each manufacturers ZEV requirement.
The Board believes that these changes will strengthen the ZEV program.
9.
Comment : Increase the percentage requirement for pure ZEVs to a larger percentage in 2006 and increase this through 2010 and beyond.
(ZEV Alliance, ALA, NRDC, Finney, Slawson) Agency Response: ARB staff believes that increasing the percentage requirement for pure ZEVs to a larger percentage is not technologically or economically feasible.
Please see responses to (a) 1 and (a) 8.
10.
Comment: The number successful commercial market.
include reducing the multipliers.
Coalition, ZEV Alliance, NRDC, Shapin, Zaitlin) of pure ZEVs should be increased over time to ensure a Ways to increase the long-term number of pure ZEVs (Joffe, Avestor, ALA, CBE, Environmental Health Cal ETC, Korthof, L'Amoureux, Slawson, PCL Johnson,
Agency Response: Please see responses to (a) 8.
Staff achieved a doubling in the ZEV requirement by including light-duty trucks 2 (LDT2s) and by reducing multipliers as suggested.
11.
Comment : Increase number of vehicles in out years.
(Joffe) Agency Response: Please see response (a) 8.
12.
Comment: Make changes to the ARB staff proposal to increase the total number of ZEVs yearly through 2008.
(Yolo-Solano AQMD) The Board should increase the number of fuel cell vehicles, hybrid vehicles as well as other better electrical system vehicles.
(Denneen, Gurdin, Gausling, LaFleur, Weisz) Agency Response: Please see response (a) 8.
13.
Comment : Too much of the mandate can be met with PZEVs and non-vehicle ZEV credits.
(International Fuel Cells) Agency Response: ARB staff believes it is important to allow vehicle manufacturers flexibility in meeting the ZEV regulation with vehicles such as PZEVs and non-vehicle ZEV credits.
Allowing partial credits for PZEVs which are extremely clean vehicles that are not pure ZEVs will give manufacturers flexibility while still decreasing emissions and meeting ARB's clean air goals.
In addition, ARB staff believes that it is important to encourage other non-vehicle developments such as shared use, application of "intelligent" new technologies and linkage to transit.
ARB staff believes that the amount of credit given to PZEVs and other non-vehicle developments is appropriate when compared to the "gold standard" of pure ZEVs.
26
14.
Comment: We would like to see an increase in the number of zero-emission vehicles recommended in the staff proposal and see a much steeper ramp of pure ZEVs in the 2006 to 2010 timeframe.
We urge a goal of at least 40,000 full-function vehicles by 2010 through the phase out of credit multipliers allowed in the staff proposal by 2010 or by the increase in percentage requirements for pure ZEVs between 2006 and 2010.
(Bonnie Holmes- Gen, ZEV, UCS) Agency Response: In response to such comments, the Board directed staff to double the requirement for ZEVs beginning in 2007.
See the response to comment (a) 8.
15.
Comment: The ARB should dramatically reduce the amount of credits that serve to reduce the number of clean vehicles automakers must produce.
The ZEV requirements should be increased significantly over time starting in 2005.
(Wright, Matousek, Khalsa, Askren, Renzetti, Kohr, Dearborn, Markwith, Brinkman) Agency Response: The ZEV mandate includes several multipliers, which have the effect of reducing the number of ZEVs that manufacturers are required to produce.
These multipliers include: a Phase-In to encourage vehicle production in earlier years, a Range multiplier to encourage increased range of vehicles and rapid refueling, an Efficiency multiplier to increase vehicle efficiency and a Neighborhood Electric Vehicle (NEV) multiplier.
Further, the regulation also includes credits for transportation developments such as shared use, application of "intelligent" new technologies and linkage to transit, and lastly a battery warranty credit.
ARB staff believes that is important to encourage all of these aspects in order to achieve the long-term sustainability of ZEVs.
The majority of the multipliers is phased out by 2012 to one or a fraction thereof.
This reflects ARB's commitment to increase the actual number of ZEVs in the long term when the market is established.
16.
Comment : Phase-out credit multipliers so that by the end of the decade there is a one-to-one ratio between each ZEV produced and the credit it receives (ZEV Alliance, NRDC, Cal ETC, ALA) Agency Response: Please see response (a) 16.
17.
Comment: We urge you to get as close to the real four percent in the 2010 timeframe and start in 2006 to preserve a path to zero emissions.
(UCS) Agency Response: Please see response (a) 16 and (a) 8.
18.
Comment: The reduction in the number of ZEVs due to the combined phase-in multipliers is unacceptable.
Over the almost 20 year time period annual ZEV volumes need to be achieved that are consistent with competitive life cycle costs of conventional vehicles.
The staff proposal is unacceptable in that it does not exceed 20,000 true ZEVs until 2015.
The proposal delays the original ZEV vision by 15 years.
If the ZEV volume is cut to 4600-9300 ZEVs in the near-term, there is a danger that the fleet demand will overwhelm available supply, as has already happened during the MOA
27
period (1998-2000); this is especially true if some automakers would continue to not make their EVs available to the public.
Retail customers would find it very difficult, if not impossible, to lease or buy an EV. (Mason) Agency Response: Please see response (a) 16 and (a) 1.
(b) Need to Increase ZEV Volumes to Reduce Per-Vehicle Cost
19.
Comment: According to proposed requirements, the number of battery packs needed is about 5,000 per year.
This is too low to sustain battery business and needs to be at least doubled.
(Avestor, Joffe, ECD, PEVDC, Mason, AAM, BMW) Agency Response: In response to public input both prior to, and at the Board hearing, the Board directed that the number of ZEVs be doubled by 2012 with a ramp beginning in 2007, in comparison to the modified staff proposal.
This change is intended to help reduce cost through greater volume and continue a steady increase in vehicles to full commercialization in the future years.
More time is needed for battery makers to develop, refine, and reduce the cost of advanced batteries.
Thus, the number of vehicles prior to 2007 will remain as proposed.
20.
Comment: We urge you to require the use of ZEVs in sufficient volume both to drive down their production cost as well as to have a significant impact on California's air quality.
We also support the sale of HEVs that offer significant all-electric ranges.
(Warden) Agency Response: Batteries are the single most expensive component of electric vehicles.
For that reason, affordable battery packs--both today and when produced in volume--are crucial to achieving a sustainable electric vehicle market.
ARB contracted with a team of outside experts to obtain the best available information on battery advances, costs and future trends.
The Battery Panel concluded that nickel metal hydride batteries were the most promising advanced technology, having both high performance and the longest useful life.
Unfortunately, the Panel also concluded that battery costs are high and will not meet cost-competitive targets for some time.
Although volume production will help somewhat, a breakthrough is needed to achieve truly affordable NiMH packs.
The amendments reflect these findings and provide for a limited market in the near term as battery makers continue research into the development of cost-effective advanced batteries.
21.
Comment: Battery leasing should be incorporated to reduce costs.
(Avestor) Agency Response: The ARB does not regulate sales or lease terms of motor vehicles.
While battery leasing may be an attractive tool to help with the high initial capital costs of advanced batteries, the overall cost of current advanced batteries will still severely limit the market for the technology.
28
22.
Comment: The regulation is becoming way too complex.
We need a massive ZEV deployment to bring down costs and to make a big impact on air quality.
(Pohorsky) Agency Response: The regulation has become more complex as staff has tried to provide flexibility to automakers in meeting the ZEV program requirements.
Given the wide variety of technologies and vehicle designs being pursued, it is not possible to adequately acknowledge and incentivize the various technologies being developed with a simple regulation.
The number of pure ZEVs required is limited in the near term to allow the needed time for continued development of these vehicles.
The number of AT PZEVs and PZEVs is much greater and represents the initial market necessary for broad commercialization.
(c) Cost-Effectiveness Issues Related to the ZEV program
23.
Comment: State law also requires the ARB to implement regulations in a costeffective manner and to fully consider alternatives.
The ZEV program is far more expensive than any other air quality improvement regulation previously adopted by the ARB and is clearly not cost-effective.
This rule is not cost-effective and should be made optional.
The ARB process should be changed to review old cost-effectiveness calculations in the presence of new data.
(Toyota) Each of the three ZEV program elements (AEV, AT PZEV and PZEV) far exceeds any previous regulation on a cost-effectiveness basis.
This conclusion is based on staff's data for both costs and benefits.
Using staff's $5 per pound criterion for vehicle control measures, the least expensive ZEV program element, PZEV, is more than 20 times more expensive than the criterion.
The most expensive ZEV program element, battery electric vehicles, is about 140 times more expensive than the criterion.
Since the [LEV II] proposed zero fuel evaporative emission requirement was much less expensive on a cost-effectiveness basis than any of the proposed ZEV program elements, it is not clear why staff is pursuing the ZEV requirements apparently without that same regard to cost.
Clearly the ZEV program elements should be made optional for the same valid reasons that the zero fuel evaporative emissions standards were made optional.
With more cost-effective measures available, technical feasibility alone does not justify the ZEV program.
(Toyota) California law also requires that the ARB adopt regulations that are cost-effective and to fully consider alternatives.
In fact, cost-effectiveness is conscientiously ignored in the December ARB Staff Report, which states "...near term cost-effectiveness is not a deciding factor in the Board's consideration of the ZEV program and staff's proposed changes".
The December ARB Staff Report acknowledges, however, at least in the early years of the program the dollars spent per ton of pollutant reduced under the ZEV program will be much higher than for any other ARB regulatory measure.
(AAM) At the September 7-8 Meeting, the Alliance and automakers presented an analysis that estimated that near-term cost effectiveness for the ZEV mandate is well in excess of a
29
million dollars per ton.
Significantly, this fact is not disputed in the December ARB Staff Report.
(AAM) Neither the August ARB Staff Report nor the December ARB Staff Report contains any estimate of the long-term cost effectiveness of the ZEV mandate.
The August report did contain a comparison of potential long-term total operating costs for both ZEVs and PZEVs, which showed similar total operating costs when maintenance and fuel costs were included.
However, the fact that long-term cost may be similar between PZEVs and ZEVs does not mean either of these technologies are "cost effective".
Cost effectiveness estimation requires the estimate of incremental costs and incremental emission reductions, and the division of the two.
(AAM) The ZEV program is very different than most mobile source regulations, in that it its clear to everyone that short-term incremental costs are extremely high, and there is widespread debate about whether these costs will be significantly lower under volume production scenarios.
Therefore, at the outset it is inappropriate to estimate per vehicle cost effectiveness for either the short term or the long term, since the short term cost effectiveness figures ignore the cost reductions that could hypothetically be achieved in the long run, and the long term cost effectiveness figures will ignore the very high short term cost.
What is needed is an approach that takes both the short and long term into consideration simultaneously.
(AAM) [F]or the proposal in the December ARB Staff Report with either FFEVs and CEVs, cost effectiveness starts at $700,000 per ton, increases to almost 1.6 million dollars per ton, and declines to about $150,000 per ton. ...
[W]hen the cost effectiveness values ... are discounted to the net present value (NPV) in 2003, the cost effectiveness of the staff proposal with either the full function ZEVs or CEVs is between $263,000 and $283,000 per ton of ROG + NOx--well over 10 times the cost effectiveness of any regulation previously adopted by the ARB. ...The ARB staff uses an internal guideline of $11.00 per po
On average, the staff proposal is 13-15 times greater than this internal guideline.
(AAM) The EV portion of the ZEV mandate is projected to cost over $1.7 million per ton of hydrocarbon and oxides of nitrogen, using ARB staff's assumptions regarding the emission benefits.
That's more than 100 times more expensive than almost all other control measures adopted by ARB.
(Sierra Research) The results of this analysis show that over the 27-year period from 2003-2020, the cost effectiveness of the ZEV mandate as modified by ARB's recently proposed changes is between $263,000 and $283,000 per ton of ozone precursor.
This is in the range of $132 - $142 per pound.
To compare the cost effectiveness levels above to other measures adopted by the ARB, AIR examined information on the cost effectiveness of other measures using available ARB estimates for cost-effectiveness.
The cost effectiveness of the ZEV mandate is on the order of 25 to 27 times as expensive on a
30
cost per pound basis as the most expensive mobile source control measure adopted in the 1990s by ARB. (Darlington) Agency Response: Resolution 01-01, adopted by the Board at the January 25, 2001 hearing, specifically noted that the ZEV requirements "will result in a higher cost per ton of pollution reduced than any other ARB regulatory measure; nevertheless, the amended ZEV regulations remain an essential component of the State's long-term air quality strategy because of the promise and ultimate necessity of zero-emission technologies."
Throughout the regulatory process the Board has looked towards the long-term potential of zero- and near-zero technologies.
The August 7, 2000 Staff Report noted that with volume production and improved technology, battery electric vehicles could ultimately become competitive on a lifecycle cost basis.
In addition, the significant resources devoted to fuel cell development indicate that manufacturers believe that there is a business case that fuel cell vehicles could be competitive with conventional vehicles.
Thus, the Board views this regulation in a different light, not directly comparable to the other regulations that it adopts.
Unlike other regulations, the ZEV program is seen as a way to bring about a transformation of our vehicle pollution control strategy.
This transformation is an essential component of the Board's vision of zero- and near-zero technologies applied wherever possible.
With regard to the specific estimates provided by commenters, staff believes that they do not, for the most part, adequately take into account likely future cost reductions.
They generally are based on cost estimates derived from the ARB August 7, 2000 Staff Report.
These Staff Report cost estimates were near-term in nature, and were not intended to be used as a projection of costs over a 20 year timeframe.
Using them in that fashion essentially assumes that there will be no technical improvement in ZEV and near-ZEV technology over the next 20 years.
Staff believes that this is an extreme assumption not supported by the history of vehicle pollution controls.
This point was discussed in detail in the October 31, 2001 ARB Staff Review of Report Entitled "Impacts of Alternative ZEV Sales Mandates on California Motor Vehicle Emissions : A Comprehensive Study ( NERA-Sierra).
In that review, staff noted that: · Staff's estimate of the incremental cost for PZEVs has been reduced from $500 to $200.
The revised cost reflects a reevaluation of the likely technology to be used by PZEVs and the durability of that technology in use.
In addition, the PZEV extended warranty (15 years or 150,000 miles) has additional value to the customer above and beyond the normal emission warranty.
The NERA-Sierra report, by using a $2,500 estimated incremental cost for AT PZEVs throughout the 2020 study period, in essence assumes that there will be no technical improvement in future years that will reduce the cost of HEV production.
Although AT PZEVs will carry an increased initial purchase price, because of their fuel efficiency they will recoup a savings over the life of the vehicle in terms of reduced fuel expenditures.
This benefit can be substantial.
Using the methodology outlined in the August 7 Staff Report, the net present value of the fuel savings for
· ·
31
·
·
HEVs was estimated to be about $1,600 per vehicle using an after-tax gasoline price of $1.75.
With regard to future ZEV costs, the NERA-Sierra study takes the ARB near term estimates and assumes that these cost levels will continue on in perpetuity, except for changes due to increased production volume.
Specifically, the NERA-Sierra Report estimates that the incremental cost for a ZEV decreases gradually over time from $45,715 in 2003 to $32,215 in 2020.
It is important to note, however, that this cost decrease is related solely to increased production volume, and does not include any allowance for technical improvement over time.
To provide a more reasonable view of long term ZEV costs, staff reviewed recent published studies.
The most recent and comprehensive analysis that staff was able to identify was prepared by Arthur D. Little for the California Energy Commission (Projected Automotive Fuel Cell Use in California, Arthur D. Little Inc., October 2001).
This report looks as the status of fuel cell technology and projects cost trends and market penetration scenarios.
With regard to cost, the A.D. Little study concluded that, "[T]otal incremental vehicle prices above current average mid-size vehicle costs ($18,900) are estimated to be about $9,300 higher for a direct hydrogen mid-size FCV, $10,000 for a steam reformed methanol mid-size FCV and around $11,200 higher for a gasoline or ethanol autothermal reformer-based midsize FCV in the near-term (2010 to 2020).
For aggressive hybridization strategies, incremental costs of $9,000 for a direct hydrogen FCV, $9,700 for a steam reformed methanol FCV and $10,400 for an autothermal reformer gasoline or ethanol FCV are calculated.
Further cost reductions are possible as fuel cells become more reliable and warranty issues are less of a concern to automobile manufacturers.
Additional savings could occur from larger production volumes through the learning curve phenomena."
The effect of these modifications on the assumed long-term cost of the ZEV program is substantial.
For example, the Toyota comments, using near term ARB numbers, derived a cost effectiveness of $111 per pound for PZEVs, $412 per pound for AT PZEVs, and $698 per pound for ZEVs.
Using the modified ARB cost assumptions discussed above, these totals are reduced to $44 per pound for PZEVs, $136 per pound for AT PZEVs, and $297 per pound for ZEVs--reductions of roughly 60 percent from the Toyota estimates.
Additional discussion of the long-term cost-effectiveness using the most recent ARB cost assumptions is provided in the agency responses to Comment 292.
24.
Comment : As currently written, it is difficult to see how the proposed amendments effectuate the purposes of the Health and Safety Code and other applicable environmental statutes, which require actual emission reductions without substantial adverse economic impact to California businesses or its economy.
(Honda) Moreover, qualifying economic effects on the combination of this lack of demand with the high costs of producing battery electric vehicles has resulted, and will continue to result, in substantial losses for the California automotive industry and corresponding adverse the California economy.
(Honda)
32
The Staff Proposal Mandate would result in negative impacts on the California economy in terms of employment, gross state product, and personal income according to the results of the regional economic analysis.
The results show that over time, the net negative impacts become larger.
The Staff Proposal Mandate would result in a loss of about 10,000 jobs, about $854 million in GSP, and about $1.1 billion in personal income by 2020 relative to the baseline forecast for California.
(Pekelney) The proposed amendments would impose substantial costs on the regulated community for little or no corresponding environmental benefit.
The combination of insufficient consumer demand with mandatory levels of production at substantial cost will continue to result in guaranteed economic loss in the production of battery electric vehicles.
Moreover, by forcing the California automotive industry to produce thousands of highcost battery electric vehicles without corresponding market demand to offset those costs, the ZEV regulation and the proposed amendments have and will continue to substantially injure the economic well-being of the California automobile industry.
(Honda) Agency Response: The commenters inappropriately refer to the impact of the entire ZEV program on manufacturers, as opposed to the effect of the proposed modifications.
In fact, the proposed modifications significantly reduce the impact of the ZEV program on California businesses.
Staff prepared an estimate of these savings as part of the December 8, 2000 Initial Statement of Reasons.
Adding up the total cost of the program (ZEV, PZEV and advanced technology PZEV production), the estimated savings due to the December 2000 staff proposal in model year 2003 were estimated to range from about $130 million (for a manufacturer that meets its ZEV obligation with 100 percent NEVs under both the current and the amended regulation) to more than $400 million (for a manufacturer that meets its ZEV obligation with 100 percent full function EVs under both scenarios.).
The distribution of such savings among manufacturers, dealerships, vehicle purchasers and subsidy providers was not estimated.
The savings due to the staff proposal would continue on in future years.
The savings in 2004 would be less than in 2003, due to the increased volume of PZEV production required as the PZEV phase-in multiplier is reduced.
Although the impact of the overall program is not relevant for this rulemaking, as part of the October 31, 2001 ARB Staff Review of the NERA-Sierra report staff collected data on manufacturers' annual net income.
This was done in order to place in context the manufacturers' ability to absorb a cost increase within their own operations.
For the five most recent fiscal years for which data was available (2000-1996 for domestic automakers and 2001-1997 for Japanese automakers), the average annual combined net income for the six large manufacturers subject to the ZEV requirement was about $26 billion.
In the December 7, 2000 Staff Report staff estimated that the incremental cost of the ZEV program for 2006, when the PZEV option is fully phased in, would be
33
about $450 million.
This amount represents about 1.7 percent of the annual average net income for the six large automakers over the recent five-year period reviewed.
Staff recognizes that automaker net income fluctuates over time, and that current trends are negative relative to the most recent five years.
Over the long term, however, such fluctuations will average out.
25.
Comment: Emissions estimates ignore the economic reality of decreased sales due to higher costs and the resultant increase in fleet age and emissions.
The modest benefit calculated by staff assumes no change in sales.
The most likely result will be an air quality disbenefit.
(Toyota, Salisbury, Dunbar) [W]e strongly believe, and have conclusive data to indicate, that the ZEV mandate will increase emissions in California for many years to come.
(AAM) This "disbenefit" occurs because the cost of compliance with the ZEV mandate will drive up the cost of new non-electric cars throughout California.
The resulting price jump will lead to motorists keeping their older, higher-polluting vehicles longer.
Even under the revisions proposed in the December ARB Staff Report, this effect would result in a net increase in air pollution over the next 20 years.
The Alliance commissioned Sierra Research and National Economic Research Associates (NERA) to conduct a study to investigate the possible environmental impacts due to the changes proposed in the December ARB Staff Report.
(AAM) The impact of these higher costs is more specifically detailed in a study commissioned by the Alliance and conducted by Sierra Research and NERA.
This report concludes that it is unreasonable to assume that auto manufacturers will simply absorb the increased costs of regulatory compliance in California.
Sierra Research and NERA conclude that it is more rational to assume that increased costs will be passed on to California new vehicle purchasers.
A total incremental cost of several hundred million dollars each year will drive up the cost of a new California vehicle by several hundred dollars.
(AAM) Using the approach utilized in the December ARB Staff Report, the direct benefit of pure ZEVs is very small.
When market effects are properly accounted for, there is a net disbenefit associated with the ZEV mandate.
(AAM) The evidence demonstrates that implementation of the ZEV mandate beginning in the 2003 MY will increase fleet wide emissions substantially and for a long period of time, and thus set back the State's efforts to reduce air pollution.
(AAM) Of course any notion that the mandate is "necessary" for the control of vehicle emissions is indefensible if, in fact, the mandate actually has the effect of increasing overall emissions from the California motor vehicle fleet.
There is substantial evidence that, contrary to the estimates in the December ARB Staff Report, either form of the mandate would be counterproductive to the objectives of the law, resulting in increases
34
in vehicle emission over the next 20 years or more.
The promulgation of regulations that would have this effect is not consistent with ARB's statutory authority.
The NERASierra analysis reveals the mandate's negative impacts on air quality and confirms that the mandate should not be considered valid or effective under California law.
(AAM) Instead of addressing and analyzing these issues, the ISOR's brief "Environmental Impacts" section adopts the erroneous assumption that 100% of cars produced will be purchased by the market and placed into service, then estimates emission reductions based on that false assumption.
The ISOR completely fails to address or analyze the potential for higher net emissions or other environmental issues which may arise as a result of the adoption of the amendment in their current form, and Honda has serious concerns that this failure may amount to a violation of Section 60005.
Moreover, the ISOR has not addressed feasible alternatives to the amendments which would reduce these potential adverse impacts to the environment, and Honda believes that such alternatives must be analyzed and explored to ensure compliance with Section 60005.
(Honda) The staff's emission reduction estimates are based on two assumptions that are clearly wrong.
First, the staff assumes that the increased cost associated with the ZEV mandate will have absolutely no effect on the sale of new vehicles in California.
Second, the staff assumes that every EV will fully replace a conventional gasoline vehicle.
(Sierra Research) The slight loss in new car sales, which results in older vehicles staying on the road longer, combined with the fact that EVs can't fully replace gasoline vehicles, results in an increase in emissions due to the mandate.
By 2010, instead of a 1.3 ton per day reduction in hydrocarbon and oxides of nitrogen calculated using the ARB staff assumptions, there is a 4.3 tons per day increase.
(Sierra Research) Even though the ARB staff's estimate of the emissions benefits of the ZEV mandate are modest, the estimates still grossly overestimate the emission reductions that will result from the ZEV mandate.
There are three problems with ARB's analysis of the benefits of the ZEV mandate.
First, ARB fails to account for the impact of limited vehicle range of ZEVs and its effect on the resulting emission s performance.
Second, ARB fails to account for the impact of increased new car prices resulting from the ZEV mandate and the resultant slowdown in vehicle fleet turnover.
Lastly, ARB ignores non-fuel background emissions from ZEVs.
(Darlington) This declaration ... highlights two major issues that CARB staff has not accounted for in evaluating the impact of the ZEV mandate.
The first issue concerns the limited range and relatively long recharging times of battery electric vehicles.
Battery electric vehicles will not, in general be capable of satisfying all of their owners' travel needs.
By failing to recognize and account for this fact, CARB has overestimated the emission benefits of ZEVs.
The second issue relates to the delay s and decreases in new vehicle sales resulting form the increased cost of vehicles under the ZEV mandate.
This will lead to
35
greater numbers and usage older vehicles, thereby increasing emissions of air pollutants.
(Lyons) As recently as 1996, ARB expected the mandate to reduce vehicle emissions by 14 tons per day in 2010.
Today, those reductions--under the current mandate or the December ARB Staff Report--are less than 1.5 tons per day.
Furthermore, this figure does not account for the higher emissions that will result as motorists, faced with new vehicle price increases, keep their older, higher-polluting vehicles on the road longer.
(Toyota) Honda believes that the proposed amendments do not suggest a "necessary and technologically feasible" way to reduce vehicular air emissions in California, but instead would require the production of battery electric vehicles that, while zero-emitting, would not be purchased by California consumers on a statewide basis, promoting the continued use of California's older, higher-polluting vehicles.
(Honda) The mandate's requirement that manufacturers produce and offer for sale ZEVs will result in significant increases in the prices of new PCs and LDT1s in California.
The price increases will reduce the number of new PCs and LDT1s sold in California and increase somewhat the number of other new vehicles sold.
More importantly, the price increase for new vehicles will lead vehicle owners to keep their existing vehicles longer.
The net effect will be a decrease in the scrappage rates for existing vehicles due to the ZEV mandate.
Because many existing vehicles have significantly greater emissions than new vehicles, these changes in the turnover of the existing fleet will have the unintended effect of increasing overall fleetwide emissions compared to the levels that would prevail in the absence of the ZEV mandate.
(Harrison) Agency Response: The above arguments are set forth in detailed fashion in a report entitled " Impacts of Alternative ZEV Sales Mandates on California Motor Vehicle Emissions: A Comprehensive Study".
This report was prepared by National Economic Research Associates (NERA) and Sierra Research, and was submitted as part of written comments filed by General Motors Corporation on January 23, 2001.
On October 31, 2001 ARB staff released for public comment a comprehensive review of the NERA-Sierra report.
In that review, ARB staff concluded that the NERA-Sierra report significantly overstates the impact of the California ZEV program on vehicle prices, vehicle sales, and fleet turnover-related changes to vehicle emissions.
Major considerations include: · · · · The cost increases assumed by NERA-Sierra are overstated.
Manufacturers will not necessarily be able to pass along all increased costs.
Small price increases can be addressed by a variety of manufacturer marketing practices and will not necessarily reduce sales.
The NERA-Sierra emission modeling failed to take into account recent changes to the LEV II program.
36
Using reasonable ARB staff assumptions, rather than the assumptions used by NERASierra, the NERA-Sierra model predicts a "ZEV tax" of only $36 in 2007 and $26 in 2020, even if the entire increased cost is spread only to vehicles sold in California.
When the Board's January expansion of the ZEV program is taken into account, the estimated "ZEV tax" is about $50.
Staff concludes that at these modest levels, such cost increases, if they occur at all, will have an insignificant effect on vehicle sales.
Although staff does not accept the purported effect on vehicle sales, in order to fully investigate the NERA-Sierra arguments staff conducted additional analyses, using to the extent possible the NERA-Sierra methodology.
Staff has determined that the significant reductions in the "ZEV tax" noted above lead to equally significant reductions in the effect on vehicle sales.
Looking at passenger car sales, the NERA-Sierra base case predicts a reduction in new vehicle sales in 2012 of 25,735 vehicles as compared to the sales level used in the ARB Staff Report emission analysis.
Using more realistic ARB assumptions, the sales decrease in 2012 is 4,824 vehicles, a reduction of 81 percent from the NERA-Sierra base case.
Finally, the reduced impact on vehicle sales results in a reduced impact on vehicle emissions.
Rather than the emission increase reported in the NERA-Sierra base case, staff estimates that the ZEV program results in an emission decrease of 0.32 tons per day in 2010 and 1.57 tons per day in 2020 using the NERA-Sierra methodology with more reasonable ARB assumptions.
Thus the basic conclusion of the NERA-Sierra report--that the ZEV program results in an emission increase due to reduced fleet turnover--does not hold.
26.
Comment : The ZEV regulations and the proposed amendments would increasingly divert automobile manufacturers' resources away from the production of workable, lowemission vehicles such as ULEVs, SULEVs and HEVs, and toward the production of technologically limited battery electric vehicles which will not be purchased by the general public and will not end up on California's roads.
In the long run, this would almost certainly impede the efforts of Honda and other manufacturers to develop and market currently available, ultra- and super ultra-low emitting vehicles and replacements for older, higher polluting cars, denying the public of emission reductions.
(Honda) Honda respectfully disagrees with the staff's assessment, and submits that its experience developing emission control technologies and the research regarding the consumer market suggests the contrary--that the premature imposition of mandated BEV production levels without any evidence of market demand and in the face of substantial technological limitation will itself slow the pace of commercialization of a variety of advanced vehicle technologies.
(Honda) If, on the other hand, automakers can free up the resources required by the mandate to focus on the areas that promise future breakthroughs--such as fuel cells and other advanced technologies--automakers can develop new vehicles that will deliver even cleaner air while meeting consumer needs.
But they cannot achieve these goals if
37
automakers are obligated to devote research and development efforts to a technology that has already been shown to have considerable shortcomings.
(AAM) There is no substantial factual basis for ARB's conclusion that the mandate is an appropriate means to provide incentives for technology development.
To the contrary, the ZEV mandate has caused and is causing limited resources to be diverted to wasteful uses; namely, to the development of EV technology for which there is no reasonable prospect of market success.
(Austin) Agency Response: At the September 7, 2000 Biennial Review, the Board recognized the difficulty manufacturers face in meeting the program requirements, particularly in the early years.
The Board directed staff to develop regulatory modifications and other steps that address the challenges associated with the successful long-term implementation of the ZEV program, including the need to reduce or mitigate the high initial costs of vehicles and batteries in low-volume production.
In response to the Board's directive, the proposed staff modifications include a number of significant measures that reduce the impact of the program on manufacturers in the early years: · The number of ZEVs needed to comply is reduced by roughly 50 percent.
· A further 50 percent reduction in the number of ZEVs is possible if manufacturers backfill with advanced technology PZEVs.
· Fuel cell vehicles receive aggressive incentives of up to 40 credits each in the early years.
· Vehicles placed in demonstration programs such as the California Fuel Cell Partnership earn credit even if they are not certified for sale or placed in service.
· Significant additional credits are allowed for vehicles placed in innovative transportation system programs.
· Neighborhood electric vehicles earn significant early introduction credits.
· Additional credits are provided for vehicles in service beyond three years.
· Specialty versions of vehicles, such as U.S. Postal Service ZEVs, can earn the same credits as the base vehicle would earn, even if they have reduced range.
The impact of the program in the early years thus has been significantly reduced.
Moreover, although staff recognizes that battery vehicles are the only production ZEVs available in the near term, the program does not require manufacturers to pursue any particular technology.
As noted above, large incentives are provided for fuel cell vehicle development.
The manufacturers argue that complete elimination of the program would free up additional resources that could be applied to more promising areas.
Staff believes, to the contrary, that retention of some level of pure ZEV requirement is essential in order to provide an incentive for ongoing technology development.
Many ARB regulations are "technology forcing" in that they lead manufacturers to find less expensive ways to provide the necessary technology.
Elimination of the pure ZEV requirement would reduce the pressure on manufacturers to achieve cost-effective ZEV solutions and in 38
staff's view, based on the long history of ARB mobile source controls, would slow the pace of research and development.
27.
Comment: The Staff Proposal Mandate has an increasingly negative impact on the California economy.
Relative to the baseline forecast for 2020, the Staff Proposal Mandate is projected to result in an employment decrease of over 10,000 jobs, a decrease in Gross State product ("GSP") of about $854 million, and a decrease in personal income of about $1.1 billion.
(All results are in second quarter 2000 dollars.)
(NERA) Agency Response: The above economic impacts are estimated based on the incremental cost of the ZEV program provided by the NERA-Sierra report.
The report estimates that the ZEV program will increase cost to manufacturers, resulting in an increase in prices of new vehicles in California.
The increase in an average vehicle price is estimated to be $247 in 2002, rising to $411 in 2020.
As indicated in ARB Staff review of the NERA/ Sierra report, the cost and resulting price increases are significantly overstated in the report.
To the extent the incremental cost of the ZEV program, especially in the long run, is overstated, the resulting economic impacts on the California economy are also overstated.
The economic impacts are also overstated because it fails to account for the secondary benefits of the ZEV mandate.
In a recent study by the University of California at Davis, the investigators concluded that the ZEV mandate has stimulated significant technological advances resulting from increased R
These advancements not only contribute significantly to the California economy, but also promote emission prevention beyond what is expected from the ZEV mandate.
Since these positive effects of the ZEV mandate were not considered by NERA, the overall impact of the ZEV program on the California economy was overstated.
The NERA economic impact estimates represent a negligible change in the California economy even if we accept the NERA analysis as reported.
According to the REMI Forecast, California real gross state product (GSP) and personal income are expected to reach $3 and $2.5 trillion in 2020, respectively.
In 2020, California would have about 23.5 million jobs.
Even if we accept the NERA's results as reported, the ZEV mandate would reduce California GSP by 0.03 percent and personal income and employment by 0.04 percent in 2020.
These changes would have only a negligible impact on the California economy.
28.
Comment: The Staff Proposal Mandate would lead to a reduction in new vehicle dealer profits that would grow somewhat over time.
By 2020, the ZEV Mandate would lead to profit losses of about $48 million for California dealers.
(NERA) Agency Response: The NERA estimated the potential dealer losses by multiplying its estimate of the decrease in total new vehicle sales by an average dealer gross profit of 8 percent.
As indicated in ARB Staff review of the NERA/ Sierra report, the price
39
increases of new vehicles are significantly overstated, resulting in an overestimation of the decrease in total new vehicle sales.
This in turn has led to an overestimation of the potential losses to dealers.
The NERA report also does not account for the potential dealer gains resulting from the increase sales of ZEVs.
Furthermore, the NERA argues the ZEV mandate will result in an increase in average age of motor vehicle fleets in California, leading to an increase in repair costs.
This implies that the motor vehicle dealers would potentially experience an increase in demand for their repair businesses, resulting in an increase in profitability of their businesses.
The increase in the repair business profitability is not accounted for in the NERA analysis.
As a result, ARB staff believes that the NERA has significantly overstated the potential dealer losses.
(d) Fiscal Impacts to Local Government
29.
Comment: Significant costs of supporting the ZEV mandate, including the installation and maintenance of charging stations, the costs of supporting electric vehicle fleets, and increased costs of conventional vehicles and other unforeseen costs, will fall upon cities as unfunded mandates.
(City of Santa Ana) Agency Response: ARB took a significant step earlier this year to reduce these infrastructure costs by standardizing BEV charging stations.
The recent proliferation of multiple types of charge connection standards was dramatically increasing the costs of charging infrastructure deployment.
This action to standardize on one charge connection type will result in a significant long-term reduction in charging station installation and maintenance costs.
The benefits accrued from a city's EV fleet will eventually outweigh the cost to deploy charging stations.
Existing gasoline and diesel vehicles and their distribution, spillage, emissions, and health-related consequences also have a cost impact on communities as unfunded mandates.
It is more appropriate to consider ZEV-associated costs against the existing-but-hidden costs of gasoline and other fuel types.
ARB has incentive programs in place to help with costs.
Furthermore, the Board committed staff to work on implementation issues such as infrastructure.
30.
Comment: CARB should further study the costs to local government of the ZEV mandate, and work cooperatively with local governments on how to reduce any fiscal impacts that might result from the mandate.
(City of Santa Ana) Agency Response: ARB has formed Infrastructure, Incentive and Outreach Working Groups to address these infrastructure deployment issues.
We invite communities with concerns to join this group and help take on the challenges associated with developing and maintaining ZEV infrastructure and implementation.
40
(e)
Treatment of Hybrid Electric Vehicles
31.
Comment : Do not allow extended-range hybrids to qualify in the top two percent because these vehicles will not provide the necessary air quality benefits.
(ALA, Bonnie Holmes-Gen, ZEV Alliance, NRDC, UCS, Ballard, Cal ETC, Hekeroth, Joffe) Grid-rechargeable hybrids should not be included in the four percent.
(Thompson, Pohorsky) Disallow credit for extended-range (or plug-in) hybrids in the full 4% ZEV requirement.
These vehicles are already primed for the market with price, range, and fuel economy without additional manufacturer incentives being needed.
(Yolo-Solano AQMD) The credit for plug-in hybrids should not come from the top 2 percent.
(CAPCOA, BAAQMD, SCAQMD) HEVs should qualify for PZEV credits not ZEV credits.
(Chapman,Navas) Agency Response: The proposed regulation has removed extended-range hybrid electric vehicles from the top two percent ZEV category and moved them to the ATPZEV category.
32.
Comment: Decrease the credit for grid-connected hybrids.
(Borys)
Agency Response: Hybrid electric vehicles with part-time ZEV capability have large potential emissions reduction benefits since many miles will be driven exclusively in ZEV mode.
Although the Board has chosen to distinguish between extended-range hybrid EVs and full-time ZEVs by restricting the top 2% to full-time ZEVs, the benefits of extended-range hybrids still merit substantial ZEV allowance credit relative to other ATPZEVs.
33.
Comment: Less credit should be given for HEVs with conventional emission control equipment and lead-acid batteries.
(ECD) Agency Response: ARB believes that it is important to maintain flexibility in the ZEV regulation, particularly with regard to specific ZEV-related technology choices.
Although some battery electric vehicles may be equipped with more conventional electric drive technologies such as lead-acid batteries, these are still important steps in building a component supplier base in the electric-drive industry.
It should also be noted that recent advances in lead-acid battery technology that enable their use in hybrid electric vehicles are not yet considered to be conventional.
The proposed regulation does increase credit allowance for hybrids with higher powerratio systems or bottom-line vehicle fuel economy.
If alternative technology hybridelectric componentry such as nickel-metal hydride batteries result in improved vehicle
41
performance, then they will earn increased credit allowance under our performancebased regulation.
34.
Comment: Extended-range hybrid electric vehicles should be included in the top two percent category.
(Grahm, Frank, UC Davis HEV Center) Agency Response: Although the potential emission-reduction benefits of extendedrange HEVs are impressive, the Board believes that there should be an important distinction between full-time ZEVs in the top 2% category which have no tailpipe emissions, and vehicles that do produce emissions.
Board directed staff to increase credit allowance to extended-range hybrid EVs to better recognize their large benefits, but to move them to the AT PZEV category.
35.
Comment : Extended-range hybrids can produce enough energy to take care of any rolling blackouts that we have had in the past.
If they are equipped with a bidirectional charger, each vehicle has a minimum of ten-kilowatt hours stored in the car, and ten percent of all the vehicles are extended-range hybrids.
This would result under utility company control after five years with a million cars out there.
Use HEVs to address vehicle to grid issues (Brooks, UC Davis HEV Center, Frank) Agency Response: Both extended-range hybrids and battery EVs have the potential to augment the electric power grid, and ARB has funded 3 research projects to further investigate the electric-grid related benefits of electric-drive vehicles.
In June 2001, the Board chose to standardize on the conductive connection protocol for electric vehicles, in part, because the conductive standard was better suited to this prospective vehicleto-grid application.
The regulation increases the credit allowance for extended-range hybrid EVs in order to incentivize their introduction, but many challenges remain before vehicle-to-grid concepts can be implemented on a wide scale.
Therefore, the regulation does not require this capability.
36.
Comment : Charger installation with the plug-in hybrids ought to be included specifically in the mandate.(Casner) The chargers and their installation need to be included with grid chargeable hybrids at the time of purchase.
(Thompson) There needs to be language that states that extended range hybrids need to be designed with and should in fact have a charger that is included with the purchase of the car.
If no charger is included, then the charger should be built into the car.
(Proudfoot) Agency Response: Amendments to the ZEV regulation (Section 1962.1) approved in June to standardize charging infrastructure also apply to extended range HEVs.
These amendments now require battery EVs and extended range HEVs to be equipped with an on-board charger.
For either type, the regulation requires an on-board charger of at
42
least 3.3 kW power capability unless the vehicle model exclusively uses Level I (1.44 kW) charging.
One of the advantages of extended-range hybrid EVs is that their smaller battery packs will not require higher-power Level II charging for most users, so it is not necessary to require manufacturers to provide and install Level II chargers with this class of vehicles.
According to a recent ARB-sponsored EPRI study of extended-range hybrid EVs, most of these proposed hybrids will be able to accumulate significant zero emission mileage by plugging into a standard 120 VAC outlet when not in use.
37.
Comment: Regarding including extended range hybrids in the four percent--there is a problem.
This problem is that there is a loophole in the current definition of all electric range, and it is not sufficient for defining extended range hybrids.
The proper definition for an extended range hybrid should be that when it is operated in a normal mode, the range is calculated when the APU kicks in.
Right now, the emissions requirement is that the APU is turned off when the test is run.
This can result in a vehicle with a larger battery pack like the Prius would test like any advanced technology PZEV.
(Proudfoot) Agency Response: Since extended-range hybrids are still under development, it is very difficult to develop and finalize test procedures that can accommodate all possible variations of hybrids that are under consideration by hybrid researchers.
ARB will work with interested vehicle manufactures and consider appropriate changes in our test procedures as these hybrids get closer to market introduction.
There are several proposed and prototype extended-range hybrid EVs that make use of a strategy that allows the engine to start under some operating conditions even though battery state-of-charge remains high.
Range-extended HEVs can be driven many more ZEV miles between charges than the commenter's proposed test procedure would indicate.
It is difficult to determine what a "proper definition" for test procedures should be until we receive further input from manufacturers and can begin to examine actual prototype extended-range hybrid EVs. 38.
Comment : We should include SUVs in the grid-connected hybrid category.
(Frank) Agency Response: The regulatory changes in Section 1963 (g) (3) now allow PC/ LDT1 ZEV credit to be earned by PZEVs in a wider range of vehicle size classes that now includes MDVs and LDTs other than LDT1.
This means that large extended-range SUVs which meet all ATPZEV requirements can now earn ZEV credit.
(f) Treatment of Advanced Technology PZEVs
39.
Comment : I object to any modifications that would allow automakers to receive credits for "advanced technology" vehicles such as those powered by natural gas, hybrid electric, or fuel cell engines.
(Hopkins)
43
Agency Response: The commenter is opposed to allowing automakers to meet up to half their pure 4 percent obligation with AT PZEVs.
The AT PZEV category was established to provide incentives for the continued development and commercialization of technologies that not only produce extremely low ozone precursor emissions, but also significantly reduce global greenhouse gas emissions.
The category also provides incentives to gaseous fuels and key components that are necessary for the widespread commercialization of pure ZEV technologies.
The Board believes that the reduction in numbers of pure ZEVs in the near-term will be more than offset by the increased longterm benefits that result from the development of technologies and alternative fuels used as AT PZEVs to meet a portion of the pure ZEV requirement.
40.
Comment: The proposal to permit up to half the 4 percent to be met with AT PZEVs is unacceptable.
If they are to be incentivized, they should be included in the 6 percent ZEV side.
(Mason, Slawson) Agency Response: The rational for allowing this category to meet up to one-half of the ZEV program is discussed in the comment above.
If these technologies were included in the 6 percent side of the ZEV requirement as suggest by the commenter, automakers would have no incentive for producing these vehicles.
Instead, to reduce cost and maximize profit, they would choose to produce more gasoline SULEVs to meet the ZEV requirements.
These vehicles are already being commercialized and will be placed in large numbers, and while important to our clean air goals, do not lead to zero-emitting technologies.
41.
Comment : I support having extended-range hybrids in the four percent, but advanced technology PZEVs do not belong there.
There is a fundamental difference between the two types of vehicles.
A range-extended HEV results in true electric miles.
(Proudfoot) Agency Response: The rational for allowing AT PZEVs to meet half of the pure ZEV requirement is discussed in the responses to the two previous questions.
42.
Comment : Do not allow vehicles in the next two percent of the mandate that do not influence the development of alternative fuels infrastructure.
This can be done by either excluding vehicles using gasoline or diesel fuel, or by raising the requirement to 0.5 credits from 0.45 credits for vehicles to be counted in this two percent (Ballard) Agency Response: The AT PZEV category provides incentives for technologies that will lead to true zero-emission vehicles while improving the overall efficiency and global impacts from the vehicle fleet.
Current HEVs using gasoline employ electronics and advanced batteries that will lead to improvements in future pure ZEV technologies.
Excluding the use of gasoline in this category would compromise the tremendous research and development of advanced components and eliminate the incentives for automakers to make more efficient vehicles.
44
43.
Comment : Allow AT PZEVs to meet the entire 4 percent pure requirement.
Make all elements optional.
(Toyota) Agency Response: At a review of the program in September 2000 and again at the January 25, 2001 Board hearing, the Board clearly articulated the need to maintain a core zero emission requirement to provide an incentive for further development.
The rationale for the Board's commitment is simple.
Over the long term, zero emission technology is necessary to achieve the State's public health protection goals.
If AT PZEVs are allowed to meet the entire 4 percent pure requirement, the continued research and development of pure ZEV technologies would be seriously compromised.
44.
Comment : Delete the zero evaporative emissions requirement from the PZEV requirement.
(Toyota) Agency Response: To receive PZEV credit, an automaker must certify the vehicle to the 150,000-mile SULEV exhaust emission standards for PCs and LDTs; certify the vehicle to the "zero" evaporative emission standards; certify that the vehicle will meet the applicable on-board diagnostic requirements, and extend the performance and defects warranty period for 15 years or 150,000 miles, whichever occurs first.
These requirements are strict and necessary to ensure that the environmental benefits of a vehicle receiving ZEV credit provides close to the same environmental benefits as pure ZEVs.
A significant advantage of pure ZEVs is that they have no evaporative emissions.
Evaporative emissions from conventional technologies account for an increasing percentage of the total vehicle emissions as tailpipe emissions are reduced.
Thus, requiring zero evaporative emissions is critical to achieving the necessary environmental benefits.
45.
Comment : The amount of ZEV credit should be variable for hybrid electric vehicles depending on the amount of advanced electronics and batteries used in the vehicle.
(Toyota) Agency Response: The adopted regulations provide that the ZEV credit earned by HEVs varies according to the characteristics of the vehicle.
Under the proposed modifications one long-term advanced componentry scoring method is based on the CO2 savings that a vehicle achieves versus the average for its class.
This metric was chosen because of the effect of global warming on ground level ozone production, and the emerging importance of CO2 savings as a vehicle technology goal.
A second long-term method provides incentives based on vehicle efficiency performance within each size and weight classification.
A third method provides, as requested by the commenter, a credit that varies according to the degree to which electric drive is used.
This credit is based on the percentage of the maximum system power output available from the electrical storage device divided by the sum of the power from the electrical storage device and the net power of the heat engine.
In more simple terms, this credit is based on the amount of advanced electronics and batteries used in the vehicle.
45
46.
Comment : The ZEV program should p hase out the 0.25 credit bonus for vehicles displaying advanced technology componentry between 2006 and 2008, as it is not necessary to encourage the development of such components after that date.
(Ballard) Agency Response: As noted in the response to the comment above, ZEV credit based strictly on advanced electronics and componentry is phased out after 2007 per changes in the 15-day notice.
The remaining methods are performance-based.
47.
Comment : The regulations should phase out the entire AT PZEV category beginning in 2008 to increase the number of pure ZEVs.
(Ballard) Agency Response: The AT PZEV category provides incentives for technologies that will lead to true zero-emission vehicles.
At this same time, the long-term purpose of this category is to continue the push for the cleanest vehicles that also have the greatest positive impact on global emissions.
The number of pure ZEVs will increase in the future as various credit schemes are phased out and the overall ZEV requirement increases beginning in 2009.
48.
Comment : The definition of advanced technology componentry needs to be clarified to include only components that will lead to true zero emission vehicles.
(Ballard) Agency Response: Staff believes that the current requirements for AT PZEV provide incentives for technologies that will lead to true zero-emission vehicles.
Hybrid vehicles using gasoline employ electronics and advanced batteries that will lead to improvements in future pure ZEV technologies.
The gaseous storage and distribution of natural gas for vehicle use will lead to improvements in technology for hydrogen fuel cell vehicles.
(g) Treatment of Neighborhood and City Electric Vehicles
49.
Comment: We have real concerns about neighborhood electric vehicles being in this program and especially being able to qualify for four times credit in the early years.
These are clearly the cheapest technology to make in order to comply with the mandate.
Therefore, we urge you to eliminate the multipliers for NEVs and to phase out all the ZEV program credits for neighborhood electric vehicles by 2005.
We are worried that NEVs distort the credit system, because they are cheaper than continuing with a full-function battery electric technology program, or a fuel cell technology program, which is what we really need for the state.
We don't believe these types of low-speed vehicles were intended to play a major role in the program and giving them multiple credits in especially in the early years seems really inconsistent with the goals of the ZEV program in our minds.
(ALA, UCS, ZEV, ZEV Alliance, NRDC) I urge the ARB to maintain pure 4% requirement and ensure automakers produce fullsize, full function electric vehicles in 2003 by capping number of City EVs and NEVs
46
they produce.
(Wright, Matousek, Khalsa, Askren, Renzetti, Kohr, Dearborn, Markwith, Brinkman, Slawson) Agency Response: Neighborhood electric vehicles are electric low speed vehicles (LSVs).
A LSV is a legal classification adopted by the National Highway Transportation Safety Association (NHTSA) to refer to highway approved vehicles with a top speed of 25 miles per hour.
These vehicles are permitted on roads where the posted speed limit is 35 miles per hour or less.
NEVs were not anticipated when the ZEV regulation was first crafted so under current state law and ARB regulation, LSVs and City EVs qualify as "passenger cars" and therefore are eligible to earn full ZEV allowances.
Under the amendments, any ZEV introduced before the 2006 model year receives a multiplier of 4.0 credits for the 2001 and 2002 model years and 1.25 for the 2003-2005 model years.
Some companies are relying on this credit scheme to put together their compliance plans for the ZEV mandate.
With only two years away from the commercial introduction, it would be unfair to the automakers to change the credit scheme.
The placement of NEVs are a legal compliance strategy given the regulation as it exists, and they do offer the potential to displace conventional vehicle trips.
Staff understands the concern that a large number of NEVs may be produced to meet the ZEV mandate.
Given this, the credits earned by NEVs, will be reduced to 0.5 for the 2004 and 2005 model years and 0.15 in 2006 and beyond.
The final value of 0.15 could be adjusted in the future based on additional information regarding how such vehicles are used, the number of trips they replace, and the number of zero emission miles that they accumulate.
This credit scheme should encourage manufacturers to produce a variety of vehicle types, rather than all NEVs or all City EVs.
This is because, by 2006 the credit value of City EVs and full function EVs as compared to NEVs would increase greatly.
50.
Comment : The flexibility provided so far by the staff could result in a very disastrous picture.
Let me point out that it could end up that there are only two percent neighborhood EVs, two percent hybrids and six percent gasoline, SULEVs.
If that's allowed in the staff proposal and turns out being the case, then that is really short of what we want to achieve.
There's actually nothing there to promote technology advancement, which is originally the purpose, one of major reason for the ZEV programs.
Therefore, we want to decrease or totally eliminate early introduction credit for low-speed neighborhood vehicles.
(SCAQMD) Agency Response: The ARB wants to encourage a diverse production of electric vehicles that meet all segments and niches in the market while encouraging advances in technology.
Therefore, as stated in the previous comment, the credits earned by NEVs will be reduced to 0.5 for the 2004 and 2005 model years.
For 2006 and subsequent years the credit would be further reduced to 0.15.
The final value of 0.15 could be adjusted in the future based on additional information regarding how such vehicles are used, the number of trips they replace, and the number of zero emission
47
miles that they accumulate.
This credit scheme should encourage manufacturers to produce more full function electric vehicles in the long term.
51.
Comment: I'm concerned that there will be too many neighborhood electric vehicles.
They may have a role to play, but I'd really like to see more full-function electric vehicles over the next few years.
Part of the reason is, that they project the wrong image to the public.
It's taken us so many years to get away from the golf cart low-power image that it would be shame to go back to that.
They truly would reinforce the impression -- the misimpression that many people have that electric vehicles are nothing more than golf carts, because these truly are golf carts.
In addition, these would not be safe because on most streets people do not only go at 30 miles per hour.
For many applications they will simply not suffice as an alternative to gasoline transportation.
(Chestnut, NRDC) Agency Response: See response to Comment 50.
The ARB recognizes that there are a wide range of potential applications that are well suited to NEVs and CEVs.
These vehicles meet safety standards established by NHTSA when they are driven on roads with posted speed limits under 35 miles per hour and are therefore passenger cars, not golf carts.
52.
Comment : We would like you to promote more diversity in available pure ZEVs, to ensure adequate production of full-function EVs by either, one, adjusting the multiplier for full-function EVs, or by capping the credit that is available for neighborhood and city EVs.
We recommend that you make a smaller decrease in the short-term pure ZEV targets so consumers will be able to take advantage of the many incentive packages that are available today.
(CAPCOA, BAAQMD, SCAQMD Northern Sonoma APCD) Agency Response: In order to promote more diversity in available pure ZEVs, the ARB created a discount multiplier for NEVs in order to bring down their value starting in 2004 and 2005 to 0.5 credits and then to 0.15 in 2006 and beyond.
City EVs can not be given a separate credit scheme from full function EVs, because these vehicles are not distinguishable from full function EVs.
They have very similar characteristics and may have similar air quality benefits as well.
However, the air quality benefits of CEVs and NEVs will be further assessed once there are more CEVs and NEVs in the market.
53.
Comment: My concern about neighborhood vehicles is that there's an unspoken strategy of the auto manufacturers to put out only neighborhood vehicles in the early years, to have those not be successful in the market, and then to use legislative or legal means to try to overturn this mandate.
So my concern is that we should include fullfunction vehicles as a requirement, not just through credits.
(Casner) Agency Response: The discount multiplier for NEVs should encourage production of full function ZEVs for meeting the ZEV mandate in the long term because in 2004 and 2005 NEVs are only worth 0.5 ZEV credits and then in 2006 and beyond, they are only worth 0.15 credits.
In the near-term, it would be unfair to manufacturers to change the credit
48
scheme for 2003 since most have already developed compliance plans for the 2003 timeframe.
The ARB will continue to pursue zero emission transportation technologies.
NEVs are a specific type of vehicle that may fulfill a certain niche in the market.
The ZEV mandate encourages the production of a variety of vehicle types by awarding significantly more credit to vehicles with increased functionality and efficiency.
54.
Comment: I oppose including ZEVs that cannot be driven on freeways in the number of ZEV and hybrid cars that must be sold in California in 2003.
(Dunning) Agency Response: The ZEV regulation encourages a variety of electric vehicle types.
NEVs will not take the place or be mistaken for vehicles that can go on the freeway and do not fill the same consumer needs that full function and City EVs fill.
However, to the extent that NEVs are used to make zero emission trips, they benefit air quality and are an appropriate participant in the ZEV program.
In addition, the NEV credit system will be further evaluated once the Board has additional information regarding how NEVs are used, the number of trips they replace, and the number of zero emission miles that they accumulate.
55.
Comment: Regarding neighborhood electric vehicles, I think they should be completely phased out of the program no later than 2005, and don't see any reason why they should get multiple credits in the near-term.
(Finney) Agency Response: The Board agrees with this comment, however it would be unfair to change the credit scheme at this time without providing appropriate lead-time.
Although they may not serve the same function as full function or City EVs, they are still ZEVs that may fill a niche market.
Once these vehicles are in the market, the ARB will evaluate their air quality benefits and may reevaluate the current credit scheme.
56.
Comment: I have concerns with the mix of vehicles being proposed.
Why do we think we are going to find markets for 10,000-30,000 smaller electric vehicles like City or Neighborhood Electric Vehicles? (Joffe) Agency Response: The ARB's approach provides manufacturers with the flexibility to produce a variety of vehicle types.
Therefore, manufacturers can choose different options that they believe will be successful.
57.
Comment: City and neighborhood electric vehicles should receive less than a full credit after the multipliers are phased out (ZEV Alliance, ALA) Agency Response: NEVS do receive less than a full credit after the multipliers are phased out.
As stated above, in 2005 and 2006, NEVs receive 0.5 credits and in 2006 and beyond they receive 0.15 credits.
This comment also refers to City EVs which should not be given less credits than full function EVs because there is no way to distinguish between the two types of vehicles; they all are in one category with same credits and requirements.
In addition, CEVs may be a valuable part of the ZEV
49
program.
Staff will know more about their air quality and transportation benefits once they are released into the market.
58.
Comment: Sparrows should get ZEV credit.
(Sweet, Bierman) Agency Response: Although the Corbin Sparrow, a three-wheeled, enclosed electric motorcycle, may fill an important niche in the transportation market, they are not included in section 1962, title 13, California Code of Regulations.
This is because the Corbin Sparrow is certified with the ARB as a zero emission motorcycle, not a passenger car.
Currently, motorcycles are subject to different, less stringent, emission standards and are not required to meet more stringent passenger car and truck safety standards.
If the Sparrow were to be certified as a passenger car, it would immediately qualify in ARB's ZEV program.
59.
Comment: Fully enclosed, three-wheel, single passenger, freeway worthy vehicles should be included in the ZEV program.
So that on page one of the proposed regulation, zero emission standards section A would say that the Executive Officer shall certify new 2003 and subsequent model passenger cars, light duty trucks, medium duty vehicles, and fully enclosed three wheel single passenger freeway worthy vehicles as EVs. (Corbin Motors) Agency Response: See agency response to the previous comment.
60.
Comment: NEVs don't receive enough credit (Rush) Agency Response: Under the current regulation, the credit value for NEVs, given their cost and functionality, is high relative to that for other vehicle categories.
In order to correct the disparity it is necessary to reduce the credit earned by NEVs.
To allow for a transition period, while moving towards a lower credit value for NEVs, the Board established a ZEV discount multiplier for NEVs.
Thus the credit value for a NEV (not including the phase-in multipliers) would be 1.0 through 2003, 0.5 in 2004-2005, and 0.15 in 2006 and beyond.
With the phase-in multiplier a NEV can receive 4 credits through 2003.
The final value of 0.15 could be adjusted in the future based on additional information regarding how such vehicles are used, the number of trips they replace, and the number of zero emission miles that they accumulate.
61.
Comment: The regulations should distinguish between NEVs placed in service and offered for sale.
(Rush) Agency Response: The ARB agrees with this comment.
Therefore, in the near term, NEVs do not receive any advanced credit multipliers unless the car is placed in service.
62.
Comment: The regulations should incorporate range and efficiency multipliers with NEVs, just as it does with full function electric vehicles.
(Rush)
50
Agency Response: The range and efficiency multipliers are intended to encourage extended range and increased efficiency in ZEVs.
NEVs are not eligible for these multipliers because these vehicles serve a small niche in the market where range and efficiency do not play a significant role and would not enhance the use of these vehicles in any way.
63.
Comment: By reducing NEV credits too early in the ZEV program, we are reducing a reliable mode incentive.
NEVs need to be a mainstay for a pedestrian-friendly area where they are most accepted.
They also represent a potential for significant use in transportation hubs, inter-modal facilities, and car sharing applications.
Therefore, we are opposed to the NEV discount multiplier (Dynasty Motor Cars) Agency Response: NEVs receive multiple credits for model years 2003 and 2004.
This is a sufficient amount of time to test the market with these vehicles.
In addition, these vehicles fill a niche.
NEV credits will be further evaluated once additional information is available regarding how such vehicles are used, the number of trips they replace, and the number of zero emission miles that they accumulate.
64.
Comment: City EVs and NEVs should be counted as AT PZEVs, not pure ZEVs (Clean Fuel Connection (Joffe)) Agency Response: CEVs and NEVs are ZEVs because they have no tailpipe emissions, no gasoline refueling emissions and they share the same air quality advantages as full function EVs.
Therefore they deserve to be in the same category with ZEVs.
However, we realize that NEVs do not have the same air quality benefits as full function ZEVs, therefore, they have a discounted multiplier over time.
CEVs are not distinguishable from full function ZEVs, so they must remain in the same category with the same credit scheme.
65.
Comment: The proposal will result in a dramatic reduction in the number of vehicles required.
It seems risky to allow City EVs and NEVs to meet the ZEV requirements.
We should not ignore the investment made into public charging.
I urge the ARB to raise the number of full sized EVs to at least 2%.
Until market potential is known, City EVs and NEVs should not be part of top 2% (Clean Fuel Connection) Agency Response: As stated in the response to the previous comment, CEVs and NEVs are ZEVs because they have no tailpipe emissions, no gasoline refueling emissions and they share the same air quality advantages as full function EVs.
Therefore they deserve to be in the same category with ZEVs.
However, we realize that NEVs may not have the same air quality benefits as full function EVs, therefore, over time a discount multiplier is applied to these vehicles.
CEVs are not distinguishable from full function ZEVs, so they must remain in the same category with the same credit scheme.
In addition, CEVs also need public charging.
The use of these vehicles does not ignore the investment made in pubic charging.
Also, NEVs too may need public charging
51
infrastructure although it may be level 1 charging rather than level 2 required by for full function EVs and CEVs. 66.
Comment: The regulations should change NEV terminology to Zero Emission Low Speed Vehicle or ZLSV.
(Rush) Agency Response: The term NEV refers to a zero emission LSV.
This terminology is already in common use in the industry to describe a zero emission LSV and any change in this terminology would be confusing.
(h) Inclusion of Sport Utility Vehicles a nd Light Duty Trucks 2 Within the Scope of the ZEV Program 67.
Comment: Recognize the reality of the marketplace in California and include all SUVs and other light trucks up to 8500 pounds in the total number of vehicles from which percentages are calculated.
Unfortunately, the current program encourages manufacturers to sell more large, inefficient vehicles in order to reduce the number of zero and near-zero emission vehicles it must produce.
(ALA, Coalition for Clean Air, UCS, Cal ETC, ZEV Alliance, NRDC, Heckeroth, Pohorsky and Thompson) Agency Response: The Board agreed with this recommendation and directed staff to address this in the modifications issued for 15-day comment.
Resolution 01-01 states "Add light-duty trucks with a loaded vehicle weight of 3750 pounds or more (the LDT2 class, which includes most sport utility vehicles) to the current passenger car and LDT1 classes that form the baseline of vehicles against which the ZEV percentage requirements are applied, phasing in this additional element during the 2007 through 2012 model years."
The modifications issued October 31, 2001 for public comment add LDT2 vehicles to the base against which the ZEV requirement is assessed.
As directed by the Board the inclusion of LDT2 vehicles is phased in beginning in MY 2007 and concluded in 2012.
While these vehicles were traditionally used primarily for work purposes, it is now very common for pick-up trucks and sport utility vehicles (SUVs) to be used primarily for personal transportation, i.e. as passenger cars.
As such, it is appropriate for LDT2 vehicles to ultimately trigger the same ZEV obligations as passenger cars ­ just as they will be subject to the same emission standards under the LEV II program.
One million seven hundred thousand vehicles are sold in California each year of which almost half are SUVs and LDT2s trucks.
It is important to avoid situations in which a manufacturer increases its proportional production of LDT2 vehicles in order to reduce its potential ZEV obligations.
68.
Comment: Inclusion of SUVs and large trucks in the baseline in combination with a phase out of the credit multipliers will come close to the volume ramp-up needed for a successful program.
(Cal ETC, ALA, UCS, NRDC, Anuvu)
52
Agency Response: This comment was addressed by two actions by the Board described in Resolution 01-1.
The first addressed the need for increased total volume of ZEVs in later years of the program and the second addressed the relationship between credits earned by different ZEV types, effectively dropping the credit multipliers as requested.
Resolution 01-1 states "Compared to the modified staff proposal and accounting for increased numbers of ZEVs resulting from other modifications listed below, approximately double the number of ZEVs required by the 2012 model year, with the ramp up beginning in the 2007 model year;" and " Revise the credit relationship between fuel cell vehicles and battery electric vehicles in the later implementation years, to address the current disparity under which a manufacturer could comply with far fewer fuel cell vehicles than would be the case with battery electric vehicles."
One of the Board's directives at the January 25 hearing was to double, by 2012, the number of ZEVs required as compared to the original staff proposal.
In implementing this directive, staff has accounted for the increased number of required ZEVs that results from phasing in the LDT2 category.
Thus the LDT2 phase-in does not increase the number of required ZEVs beyond the number needed to achieve a doubling of the original staff proposal.
However, the LDT2 phase-in will increase the overall number of PZEVs or AT PZEVs needed to take full advantage of those options.
The original staff proposal provided permanent additional credits for fast refueling.
Upon further consideration staff concluded that while these provisions are appropriate in the early years, in later years they would result in too few vehicles being required under compliance scenarios that rely on hydrogen fuel cell vehicles.
This would be counter to the Board's directive to equalize in the long term the credits earned by battery EVs and hydrogen fuel cell EVs.
In order to accomplish the remainder of the necessary increase in the number of vehicles required, the modifications now reflect further adjustments to the phasing of the efficiency and range multipliers.
The MY 2008 values for these multipliers are 0.3 for range and 0.600 for efficiency, compared to 0.5 and 1.0 respectively in the 2008 and subsequent model years under the original proposal.
The modifications also incrementally adjust the phase-in factors after MY 2008 until they reach 0.15 and 0.825 for range and efficiency respectively in the 2012 and subsequent model years.
While developing these modifications, staff also made an internal calculation change with respect to the assumed efficiency of future ZEVs.
In order to have a consistent basis for estimating vehicle totals, throughout the biennial review process staff assumed that the future vehicle fleet would be identical to the current (MOA) vehicles offered by manufacturers.
Using this methodology, future increases in vehicle efficiency will result in reduced numbers of vehicles required.
In order to provide a greater likelihood that the actual number of vehicles produced will hit the target established by the Board at the January 25 hearing (2 times the staff proposal), staff assumed that for 2008 and beyond the average full function vehicle has range and efficiency characteristics identical to today's RAV 4 EV.
For City EVs staff assumed that future vehicles have the same performance as the e-Com.
Introducing these revised assumptions reduces the
53
likelihood that future range or efficiency gains will result in a shortfall of vehicles as compared to the board's target.
These modified phase-in values result in estimated vehicle totals for 2012 and beyond that are roughly equal to 2 times the original staff proposal.
Staff notes that due to the effect of the efficiency multiplier, the relationship between the number of vehicles required and the "red line" (2 times the staff proposal) differs for a 100 percent full function vehicle scenario as compared to a 50/50 mix of full function and City EVs.
Staff has chosen factors that result in a full function total that is about 106 percent of the red line, and a 50/50 mix total that is about 93 percent of the red line.
Thus these two scenarios evenly "bracket" the red line target.
69.
Comment: We should include a factor now such that SUVs are included in the baseline for calculation of ZEV requirements, however the factor should be scaled such that the total number of ZEVs required would remain the same (AAM).
Agency Response: Staff has presented modified language to include LDT2 vehicles in the baseline used to calculate ZEV requirements, however staff has determined that it is more appropriate to phase in this requirement over several years starting in 2007.
This has been done for several reasons.
First, starting in 2007 allows manufacturers to plan for increased ZEV volume requirements and to integrate their LDT2 production into their planning process while accounting for increased ZEV requirements.
To apply a ZEV requirement immediately dependent on LDT production would unfairly impact some manufacturers over others because of their product mix.
Additionally, the phase in of the LDT2 volumes has provided a clear and measurable mechanism for attaining the Board's goal of doubling the ZEV requirement by 2012 with a smooth ramp-up starting in 2007.
(i) Warranty Issues cells, years, suggest how you
70.
Comment: The warranty on vehicles should all be the same, for fuel electric, or range-extended hybrids.
And the warranty should not start at 15 because some of the technologies haven't even been around for 15 years.
I that the warranty start as a three-year warranty, and then evaluate yearly to might increase it as time goes on.
(Frank)
Agency Response: The ZEV regulation requires warranties on PZEV components because the failure of emissions-related systems on these vehicles could rapidly offset the emissions reduction benefits of their SULEV or better performance.
While incorporating present-day battery technologies, vehicle manufacturers may choose to retain ownership of near-term extended-range hybrid EVs and lease them to customers instead of selling them.
Unless the vehicle is sold, the warranty would only be necessary for the duration of the lease, which is the same situation as with most nearterm battery EVs.
In the longer term, it may be possible for vehicle manufacturers to secure other entities that will assume responsibiltiy for the battery portion of the
54
warranty obligation.
In this eventuality, the auto manufacturer could sell extendedrange hybrid EVs with rented or leased batteries that are covered under a 15 year/ 150,000 mile warranty by the battery owner.
71.
Comment: The goal is to have equivalence in investment and running costs.
There is a possibility to resolve the cost problem for electric vehicles if we return the battery costs and the running costs.
We have done this in Switzerland by having a renting system for batteries, which made the cost structure exactly the same as for conventionally fueled vehicles.
Please try to do it also in California.
(Piffaretti) Agency Response: In California, most BEV customers lease their battery packs along with the rest of their vehicle while in Europe, customers frequently purchase their vehicle and lease their batteries.
In Europe, higher gasoline costs allow battery costs to be shifted to the customer fuel cost.
In any event, such a program would be initiated by the automaker and is not an appropriate subject of regulation.
72.
Comment: We are, in conjunction with partners in Europe, pursuing battery rental.
We see this as a vital addition that will remove the up-front burden costs from the auto manufacturers.
This will hopefully be the key to solving some of the cost problems for electric vehicles and the warranty issues for the batteries of electric vehicles.
With this system, we would not want special credits beyond three or four years that would ultimately diminish the volume of vehicles because this would all be covered between the battery rental company and the battery manufacturers.
(Production Electric Vehicle Drivers Coalition) Agency Response: ARB is hopeful that similar battery rental programs can begin in California.
ARB does not believe the proposed regulation hinders the formation of the partnerships necessary for such a battery rental program.
ARB incorporated the inservice/ under-warranty feature of the proposed regulation not only to encourage manufacturers of leased battery electric vehicles to extend their lease periods, but also to incentivize battery rental in California.
(j) Miscellaneous Issues
73.
Comment: Consider recasting the ZEV mandate in terms of a) the air pollution eliminated by a ZEV and b) the permanence of the solution to air pollution that is based on an entirely new technology rather than on old technologies and fuels.
The first steps are to break down the walls between vehicles so that there can be a free flow of ZEV technology across all modes and sizes and insist on achieving emission reductions equal to what would have been produced by the original ZEV mandate from the ZEV technology.
(Moore) Agency Response: The ZEV program is an integral part of California's mobile source emission control efforts, and is intended to encourage the development of advanced technologies that will secure increasing air quality benefits for California now and in the future.
It has led to many technological advances that have a permanent positive
55
impact on air quality in California.
These advanced technologies have not only impacted electric vehicles but have had positive impacts on conventional vehicles as well.
In addition, the ZEV program rewards vehicles based on their air quality benefits.
Therefore, the Board believes that the ZEV mandate is already working to achieve the goals suggested in this comment.
74.
Comment: Europe depends on the California program.
We would appreciate it if you would have a clear figure for 2016 that would be part of the staff proposal.
(Piffaretti) Agency Response: The ZEV program offers manufacturers a great deal meeting the ZEV requirement.
Due to this flexibility, manufacturers can vehicle types to meet their requirement.
Therefore, it is difficult to know numbers of vehicles that the different manufacturers will produce in the of flexibility for use a variety of the types and future.
75.
Comment: If each of the seven automakers produced a thousand ZEVs a year starting now, we could have 21,000 ZEVs by the end of 2003.
They don't need more research and development time.
They could simply produce more of the cars they made under the MOA.
All of the people on the waiting lists could stop waiting and drive a smog-free car.
The MOA ZEVs will work for most commuters.(Pororsky) Agency Response: Due to near-term costs and limited availability of EVs, the ARB adjusted the rate and timing of the ZEV introduction in the near-term while increasing the overall ZEV percentage requirement in the longer term.
The proposed schedule ramps up beginning in 2007 and results in a 16 percent overall requirement in 2018.
This ramp up will further encourage the commercialization of a number of emerging zero emission and near-zero emission technologies now under development.
The ARB is also encouraging the production of EVs in the near-term by providing ZEV phase-in multipliers for early introduction of EVs.
An EV placed in service in 2001-2002 receives 4 credits and an EV placed in 2003-2005 receive 1.25 credits.
This should encourage manufacturers to produce and place their EVs sooner rather than later and thus provide vehicles to consumers now on the waiting lists for electric vehicles.
76.
Comment: The use of gasoline should be banned from the ZEV program.
(Rhodes) Agency Response: The ARB has remained "fuel neutral" in developing regulations.
All regulations are based on emissions performance regardless of fuel used.
Vehicles using gasoline must meet a very strict set of emission standards to receive credit toward the ZEV program.
The ZEV regulation has spurred advances in motor vehicle technology that has significantly reduced emissions from all motor vehicles, including conventional gasoline-powered vehicles.
The gasoline vehicles included in the ZEV mandate must meet the PZEV or AT PZEV requirements.
Vehicles that meet these requirements have ZEV-like characteristics, such as zero evaporative emissions, and when they are mass marketed, they achieve significant emission reductions.
In
56
addition, these vehicles must achieve their ZEV-like emission characteristics throughout their lifetime.
To ensure that this is the case, manufacturers must provide an extended warranty on these vehicles for 15 years or 150,000 miles.
77.
Comment: Section 2A should be based on miles per minute or miles per unit time, rather than just percentage fill over ten minutes.
There should be another section 2 B that's based on a 60-mile range.
(Casner) Agency Response: Section 2B regarding fast fueling, does base credits on miles per unit time as the comment suggests.
78.
Comment: The mandate should ensure that those that do not have a charger in their garage will have easy access to one.
The regulations should require that one ZEV be placed for each diesel in 2003 and beyond.
(Pohorsky) Agency Response: ARB staff is working with the infrastructure stakeholders to assess infrastructure needs and to develop policies and incentives to encourage ZEV infrastructure development and maintenance.
In addition, ARB has regulations to address sources of diesel exhaust.
It is not feasible to use ZEVs to offset diesel vehicles.
They have different air quality impacts and require different strategies to achieve emission reductions.
79.
Comment: There should be an infrastructure multiplier on any fuel that's being used.
The way to figure that is an infrastructure factor should be the ZEV credit times the number of stations divided by the number of gas stations.
So this infrastructure credit will even the playing field for all technologies.
(Frank) Agency Response: As stated in the response to the previous comment, ARB staff is working with the infrastructure stakeholders to assess infrastructure needs and to develop policies and incentives to encourage ZEV infrastructure development and maintenance.
ZEV credits need to be based on vehicle technology and introduction timing.
Providing more credits for things like infrastructure would further reduce the number of ZEVs required by manufacturers.
80.
Comment: The ARB should pressure the automakers to pay a penalty for every SUV that achieves less than 20 miles per gallon and use that money to further ZEVs.
(Carter) Agency Response: The ARB does not have the legal authority to fine companies based on fuel economy.
Although the Board will not be assessing a penalty for the sale of SUVs, the Board is adding SUVs to the base against which the ZEV requirement is assessed.
The inclusion of LDT2 vehicles is phased in beginning in 2007 and concluding in 2012.
While these vehicles were traditionally used primarily for work purposes, it is now very common for pick-up trucks and SUVs to be used primarily for personal transportation, i.e. as passenger cars.
As such, it is appropriate for LDT2 vehicles to ultimately trigger the same ZEV obligations
57
as passenger cars ­ just as they will be subject to the same emission standards under the LEV II program.
Moreover, it is important to avoid situations in which a manufacturer increases its proportional production of LDT2 vehicles in order to reduce its potential ZEV obligations.
81.
Comment: Is it not the case that a larger impact is felt in the early years from fuel cell demonstration programs when fewer ZEV vehicles are required? I think there is a real deficiency in the way fuel cell vehicles are being incorporated into the mix of the ZEV program.
Unlike battery electric vehicles, no rigorous analysis has been performed to quantify the total emissions from fuel cell vehicles.
Overall vehicle efficiency must be measured well to wheels.
Not doing so unfairly provides excessive credits to expensive technologies while leaving affordable technologies under-valued.
Cleaner vehicles ought to have larger, not smaller, credit multipliers.
Additionally, vehicles that are affordable will contribute more to cleaning the air, as they are more likely to be purchased.
Several sliding scale credit multipliers seem to work against these common-sense principles.
I urge you to reconsider them.
( Navas) Agency Response: The ARB funded a report, Status report on the Fuel Cycle Energy Conversion Efficiency Analysis - May 25, 2000 that assessed the well to wheel impacts of a variety of fuels, including those fuels that will be used in fuel cell vehicles.
Based on this analysis, these fuels look promising for our future air quality goals.
In addition, the California Fuel Cell Partnership is further analyzing the different fuels that may be used by fuel cell vehicles.
As fuel cell vehicles are demonstrated further the ARB will continue to analyze and assess their air quality impacts.
Fuel cell vehicles may be an important part of the future in transportation and the ARB wants to encourage a variety of technologies and give manufacturers flexibility for meeting the ZEV requirements.
82.
Comment: Create categories for every vehicle type and every product that pollutes.
Make a ten-percent mandate for each one of those categories (Hekeroth) Agency Response: The ARB, federal government and local air pollution control districts in California have imposed regulations on most sources of air pollution where it was economically and technologically feasible to do so.
83.
Comment: Stop the biennial reviews and major changes, because it's stalling the whole process.
Every time there are changes the automakers or suppliers have to readjust their plans (Schoen) Agency Response: The Board agrees with this suggestion and the biennial reviews have been eliminated.
84.
Comment: Eliminate the exemption for small and intermediate automakers.
(Bierman) Agency Response: Small-volume manufacturers produce less than 4,500 vehicles per year and are not required to meet the percentage ZEV requirements.
Intermediate-
58
volume manufacturers produce between 4,501 and 60,000 vehicles per year and can meet up to 100 percent of their requirement with PZEVs.
The exemption from the ZEV requirements for small- and intermediate -volume manufacturers was part of the original ZEV requirement adopted in 1990.
Any change to this requirement at this time would have a significant economic impact on both small and intermediate manufacturers.
The small number of vehicles that both the small- and intermediate- volume manufacturers would have to produce would be too costly and not provide meaningful air quality benefits.
85.
Comment: Employ moving averages instead of freezing every 3 years.
(Bierman)
Agency Response: In calculating the number of vehicles to which the ZEV requirement is applied, language has been added to the 15-day changes made available October 31, 2001 to provide manufacturers with this flexibility.
Manufacturers may chose to use the three-year averaging of prior years or they may choose to use the same model year.
If a manufacturer chooses to use the same model year method it must be used each year of the three-year period.
Although, this doesn't offer a moving average, it does reflect a method that uses more current vehicle sales as the basis of determining ZEV requirements.
86.
Comment: The regulations should provide ZEV credit to automakers that provide gliders to small companies who then convert them to electric drive.
A glider is a car without an engine that can be converted to an electric vehicle by a conversion company.
(Bierman) Agency Response: Under the current ZEV regulation and credit scheme, there is no reason why the transfer of credits cannot take place between an automaker and a small conversion company.
For example, a conversion company could sell their ZEV credits to an automaker making their product more valuable.
87.
Comment: We need some way to give them credits for the externalities of improved public health.
The Mendrisio idea of basing credits in terms of CO2 production was very interesting.
(Thompson) Agency Response: The goal of the ZEV program is to reduce motor vehicle emissions to zero which in effect significantly improves public health.
88.
Comment: I propose that the efficiency credits could be taken from the CO2 emissions, what the car emits, instead of just on fuel consumption.
(Schoen) Agency Response: The primary goal of the program is to reduce ozone forming emissions.
While the regulation is designed to maximize ozone reductions, it also rewards reductions in carbon dioxide emissions.
It is important to consider the CO2 emissions upstream as well as from the vehicle itself.
Therefore, the ARB uses other factors for efficiency credits.
In addition, a vehicle whose operation results in reduced
59
CO2 emissions as compared to the average vehicle in its class may qualify for additional ZEV credit.
89.
Comment: Make changes to the ARB staff proposal to require that full performance ZEVs be available in the marketplace as rapidly as possible.
(Yolo-Solano AQMD) Agency Response: The credit system incorporated into the ZEV program is designed to encourage the development of advanced technologies and the early introduction of ZEVs.
A ZEV placed in service between 2001 and 2002 receives a 4-credit multiplier.
A ZEV placed in service between 2003 and 2005 receives a 1.5 credit multiplier.
This credit scheme should encourage manufacturers to make ZEVs available in the marketplace as rapidly as possible.
90.
Comment: There are no full performance ZEVs available now and yet there are people waiting for and wanting electric vehicles.
We need vehicles available in the marketplace.
(Yolo-Solano AQMD, City of San Francisco , City of Davis) Agency Response: As stated in the response to the previous comment, an EV placed in service in 2001-2002 receives a 4-credit multiplier and an EV placed in 2003-2005 receives a 1.25 credit multiplier.
This should encourage manufacturers to produce and place their EVs sooner rather than later and provide people on the EV waiting lists with a vehicle.
91.
Comment: The existing regulation does not address vehicle energy efficiency directly, but does so indirectly with the range multiplier.
Staff proposed that the Board define an efficiency multiplier that would replace the range multiplier on a phased-in basis beginning in 2005.
The Regulation Order specifies a 2005 start date.
If efficiency is a good thing, it is certainly a better thing earlier than later.
This multiplier should be fully available starting in 2003 for PZEVs and AT PZEVs.
(Toyota) Agency Response: This recommendation was incorporated in the October 31, 2001 staff modifications.
The effective date of the efficiency multiplier for PZEVs and AT PZEVs was moved up from 2005 to 2002.
92.
Comment: The proposed regulation contains no provision for expert public review of the potential of advanced technologies.
(Toyota) Agency Response: Resolution 01-1, adopted by the Board at its January 25, 2001 hearing, states "Be it further resolved that the staff shall no longer routinely report to the Board at least every two years regarding the status of the implementation of the LEV and ZEV programs; however, staff shall continue to monitor implementation progress and report to the Board when appropriate."
Thus staff has been directed to update the Board as necessary on technology developments.
Staff has used outside experts, such as the Battery Technical Advisory Panel and the Fuel Cell Technical Advisory Panel, in the past, and will retain the services of such experts as needed in the future.
60
93.
Comment: Additional credits should be provided for natural gas vehicles.
(Honda) Agency Response: This recommendation was incorporated in the October 31, 2001 staff modifications.
An additional credit of 0.1 was provided for vehicles that use gaseous fuel storage.
This credit applies to natural gas vehicles.
94.
Comment: [T]he ARB has the obligation to determine that any emission standards it seeks to adopt are "necessary" for the control of vehicle emissions.
The term "necessary" is commonly understood to mean "essential" or "indispensable" to the accomplishment of a particular objective.
Taking the December ARB Staff Report at face value, the contention that either the current mandate or the amended mandate is "essential" or "indispensable" for California to accomplish its air quality objectives is unpersuasive.
The estimates of the emission benefits from either version of the mandate are extremely modest and are out of line with the enormous costs of the mandate.
Any number of alternatives could be developed which would achieve these modest estimated benefits, and more, at considerably lower cost (e.g. the Fair Market Test, delaying the mandate but achieving the emission benefits using performance standards that do not require a specific technology).
(AAM) Agency Response: As discussed above, the ZEV program is an essential component of the Board's long-term vision of zero- and near-zero technologies applied wherever possible.
The Board's aggressive pursuit of this strategy is consistent with its responsibility to achieve the maximum degree of emission reduction possible from vehicle and other mobile sources in order to accomplish the attainment of state ambient air quality standards at the earliest practicable date.
ZEVs represent the cleanest, most advanced technologies available, and the commercialization of ZEVs through regulatory requirements and other incentives is critical to the long-term success of California's clean air program.
95.
Comment: Non-air quality rationales for implementation of the mandate--such as obtaining significant reductions in dependence on foreign oil and reducing global warming---are not quantified or supported by substantial evidence.
(AAM) Agency Response: In the August 7, 2000 Staff Report for the Zero Emission Vehicle Program Biennial Review, staff identified a number of ZEV program ancillary benefits above and beyond its direct effect on smog forming emissions.
Staff noted, however, that the Boards consideration of the ZEV regulation is firmly rooted in its air quality mandate and authority.
Thus no attempt was made to use such benefits as justification for ARB action.
Rather, such considerations were discussed to provide information for the Board regarding the multi-faceted effects of its policy choices.
With regard to the specific benefits cited, staff discussed the following: · The fuel distribution system in California is tightly regulated.
Nevertheless, given the enormous quantities of fuel involved (roughly 40 million gallons of gasoline sold per day
61
in California) it is inevitable that leakage occurs.
The impact of such leaks can be significant.
One example is the contamination of groundwater by leaking underground storage tanks.
Certainly the most well known recent case involves the contamination of drinking water supplies by MTBE.
It is important to bear in mind , however, that in addition to MTBE gasoline contains numerous other toxic compounds, including benzene, toluene, and 1,3 butadiene.
Therefore the removal of MTBE from gasoline will not eliminate the danger of water pollution from fuel leakage.
· In addition to the threat posed by leaking storage tanks, the fuel distribution system also introduces water pollution in the form of point source discharges from refineries.
According to figures reported by industry as part of the annual Toxic Release Inventory (TRI) program, there are 22 facilities in California that fall under Standard Industrial Classification Code 2911, petroleum refining.
For the 1998 reporting year, 10 of these 22 facilities reported discharges to surface water, totaling more than 7.3 million pounds.
Chemicals released included nitrate compounds, MTBE, and methanol.
In that same reporting year, 13 of the 22 facilities reported releases to publicly owned treatment works (wastewater treatment facilities).
Chemicals released included phenol, MTBE and methanol, and total releases were almost 1.5 million pounds.
· The fuel production and distribution system also results in the generation of hazardous waste.
According to manifest data from the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the 22 refineries noted above generated more than 103,000 tons of hazardous waste in 1998.
· Although not directly related to the fuel distribution system, motor oil from internal combustion engine vehicles is also a significant source of water pollution.
Motor oil contains polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs), which are a major water toxicity problem in urban areas.
Motor oil is released to the environment during the normal operation of internal combustion engine vehicles, and also when used motor oil is improperly disposed.
Electric vehicles do not need motor oil and therefore do not contribute to this problem.
· Reducing demand for gasoline can have important benefits for California.
First, a reduction in demand could help eliminate shortages of cleaner-burning California gasoline that have lead to rapid price increases.
Second, a successful effort to reduce gasoline demand also would reduce the need for additional refining, transportation and distribution facilities, thus reducing air and water pollution as noted above.
Gasoline demand can be reduced by increasing the efficiency with which gasoline is used, and by the use of alternative fuels.
Advanced vehicle design, lightweight components, aerodynamic advances and the use of electric drivetrains all result in increased vehicle efficiency.
EVs and hybrid electric vehicles typically take advantage of such measures and, as a result, achieve higher efficiencies.
Battery EVs, which use electricity as a fuel, provide significant alternative fuel benefits because electricity can be produced from a variety of non-petroleum energy resources.
Moreover, because both electricity and hydrogen can be produced from renewable resources such as solar, wind or hydropower, or biomass feedstocks, these technologies can help pave the way towards a sustainable energy future.
· To quantify the relative efficiencies of current and future technologies, the ARB and the Energy Commission contracted with A.D. Little to perform an analysis of the full fuel cycle energy efficiency of various vehicle technologies.
This work also served to
62
quantify the relative global greenhouse gas benefits of each technology by quantifying total carbon dioxide emissions.
Energy conversion efficiency of a fuel was determined for the fuel production and energy conversion portions of the fuel cycle, including fuel acquisition and refining, distribution, refueling, and in-vehicle consumption.
The A.D. Little study determined that, at the vehicle level, battery electric vehicles had the highest "miles per equivalent gallon" energy efficiency of all vehicle types analyzed, followed by hydrogen fuel cell and methanol fuel cell vehicles and hybrid electric vehicles.
On a total fuel-cycle energy use basis, diesel internal combustion engine vehicles and gasoline hybrid electric vehicles used the least energy per mile, followed by electric vehicles.
When compared to conventional vehicles, electric vehicles consume approximately 25 percent less energy on a full fuel cycle basis.
Electric vehicles have the lowest carbon dioxide emissions of the technologies evaluated.
96.
Comment: First, in order to achieve the full credits offered in this proposal, manufacturers must "sell" battery electric vehicles, not just "offer them for sale".
Toyota doubts the marketability of battery electric vehicles.
(Toyota) Agency Response: Under the modified regulation, ZEVs must be "placed in service" in order to earn the early introduction multiplier and the extended range multiplier.
This requirement was adopted in response to public comment in order to encourage manufacturers to actively market vehicles rather than produce them but leave them on dealer lots.
During the Biennial Review workshops and the September 2000 and January 2001 Board meetings staff received testimony and written submittals from individuals indicating that in their view they had to overcome unusual barriers in order to lease an EV. Examples included sales staff who are unfamiliar with the vehicles, long delays in getting information, ambiguous or contradictory information regarding "waiting lists" to obtain vehicles, and long delays in getting vehicles once orders had been placed.
Some EV drivers also stated they have more recently stopped encouraging potential customers to visit EV dealers, because test drive opportunities are difficult to arrange and the dealers are uncertain regarding when EVs would be available.
To mitigate these issues the regulation provides that certain enhanced credits are only available when a vehicle is placed in service.
97.
Comment: As Honda has discussed in prior submittals to the Board, California's definition of "passenger car which includes most mini EVs and NEVs, conflicts with the federal definition, which has specifically excluded those vehicles.
Honda believes the proposed amendments do not acknowledge this conflict and count mini EVs and NEVs as creditable ZEVs without addressing the issue of these vehicles' required crashworthiness.
(Honda) Agency Response: The crashworthiness of vehicles is overseen by the federal government.
Although Low Speed Vehicles (LSVs) are not considered "passenger cars" under federal law, they can legally be driven on roads with posted speed limits of under 35 mph.
Thus all vehicles included within the ZEV program are street legal under federal law and meet all federal safety standards.
63
More specifically, production City EVs sold in the United States in quantities greater than 2,000 will be required to meet all existing federal DOT/Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards (FMVSS) requirements for equipment and crash protection.
All are equipped with dual air bags, and many offer anti-lock braking systems.
Even City EVs sold in quantities less than 2,000 have to be reviewed by NHTSA and granted a waiver.
Neighborhood electric vehicles (NEVs) are separately regulated as "low speed vehicles" (LSVs).
Low speed vehicles have a curb weight of under 1800 lbs., are equipped with speed limiting devices that limit maximum speed to 25 mph, and are restricted to use on roads with posted speed limits of under 35 mph.
The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) has excluded LSVs from the category of "passenger car" and defined a new Federal Low-Speed Vehicle class to establish minimum safety and equipment standards for these vehicles (49 CFR Parts 531.3 and 571.500).
These regulations define a LSV as "a 4-wheeled vehicle, other than a truck, whose speed attainable in 1.6 km (1 mile) is more than 32 kph (20 mph) and not more than 40 kph (25 mph) on a paved level surface".
The California vehicle code was modified under Senate Bill 186 to accommodate this new federal classification, and these vehicles have been legal for use on public roads statewide since January 2000.
Under California law and ARB regulation, LSVs qualify as "passenger cars" even though they are subject to different crash test requirements.
Thus, federal and state law differ on this point.
Although these vehicles appear to be similar to golf carts, they offer substantially more performance, better safety features, and are much more road worthy.
LSVs are generally capable of much better acceleration than golf carts and can achieve 25 mph quite rapidly.
Golf cart performance is restricted in accordance to cooperative industry standards to 13-15 mph, due to safety and turf maintenance concerns on golf courses.
LSVs are usually equipped with higher-pressure road tires that might damage turf if used on a golf course, and LSVs must also be equipped with much better brakes than would be needed on a golf course.
At the present time, all LSVs on the market are purpose-built designs intended for use as LSVs and are not derivatives of existing golfcart designs.
98.
Comment: Battery electric vehicles and range extended HEVs already receive a range credit.
The phase-in/phase-out scheme proposed is both awkward and results in variable credits over time for the same vehicle.
Drop the efficiency credit for BEV and grid-HEV.
(Toyota) Agency Response: Efficiency is important for battery electric vehicles because it enables the vehicle to travel further on a given battery charge.
This also results in lower "upstream" emissions (due to power plant emissions) per mile traveled.
Therefore staff believes it is important to continue to offer incentives for increased vehicle efficiency.
In the October 31, 2001 modifications, however, staff included two changes that somewhat reduce the relative importance of efficiency within the credit calculation methodology:
64
· The baseline against which battery electric vehicles and grid HEVs vehicle efficiency is measured is increased in 2012 to 2 times the class average rather than 1.5 time the class average.
· The final phase-in factor for efficiency is reduced from 1.0 to 0.825.
99.
Comment: Staff's new proposal uses a 1.5 x EPA class average fuel economy baseline for earning the efficiency credit.
Although keying the baseline to size class is reasonable, the 1.5 threshold is too high.
A 1.25 threshold is more appropriate.
(Toyota) Agency Response: The October 31, 2001 staff modifications establish an "efficiency" method to determine the advanced componentry credit earned by a vehicle.
This method uses a baseline of 1.3 times the class average, similar to the recommended level.
The class average baseline for the overall efficiency multiplier was retained in order to ensure that vehicles earning an efficiency multiplier achieve meaningful performance gains.
Production vehicles available today, such as the Toyota Prius and Honda Insight, achieve efficiency gains well in excess of the baseline.
Staff expects that future hybrid vehicles will have similar performance levels.
100.
Comment : Retroactive application introduction of PZEVs] is sound policy.
It early.
Unfortunately, this improved credit placed EVs.
By the same logic, it is good The revised regulation with respect to the EVs should be corrected to be consistent of this efficiency multiplier [for early rewards those willing to enter the market multiplier is not retroactive to previously policy to reward the early introduction of EVs. credit weighting for the early introduction of with the PZEV policy.
(Toyota)
Agency Response: Under the December 8, 2000 staff proposal, the early introduction multiplier for ZEVs took effect in the 2001 model year and the early introduction multiplier for PZEVs took effect in the 2000 model year.
This distinction was made because the ZEV early introduction incentive was intended to encourage additional vehicle placements, using already developed technology, while the PZEV early introduction multiplier was intended to recognize that for most manufacturers, additional time was needed to develop the necessary technology.
Thus it seemed appropriate to limit the ZEV multiplier to newly placed vehicles, but allow the PZEV multiplier to reward manufacturers who were the first to market vehicles meeting the stringent PZEV requirements.
On January 19, 2001 staff released additional modifications.
One such modification, in response to public comment, would have made the ZEV early introduction multiplier retroactive to the 2000 model year in order to conform to the treatment of PZEVs.
This proposal was rejected by the Board, on the grounds that the extra incentives for ZEVs should be limited to newly introduced vehicles, as had been the original staff proposal.
65
101.
Comment: I strongly urge you not to include gas-electric hybrids as part of the ZEV program.
(Nelakuditi) Agency Response: In the regulation, gasoline-powered hybrid electric vehicles can no longer qualify for (gold) portion of the ZEV regulation, and only those that meet stringent PZEV requirements can qualify for PZEV or ATPZEV credit.
ARB feels that hybrid electric vehicles are important technologies as they promote the development and cost reduction of electric drive technologies that are used in pure ZEVs.
In addition, the ARB has a policy of being "fuel neutral" in developing regulations.
That is, all regulations are based on emissions performance and environmental impacts, regardless of the fuel or technology used.
102.
Comment: PZEVs should not be included as ZEV credit substitutes, unless they can be fully ILEV, meaning if you took out all of the emission controls they could actually be an ILEV and also be a SULEV (Korhtof) Agency Response: To receive PZEV credit, a vehicle must meet a series of very stringent emission related requirements including extended durability and on-board diagnostic requirements.
By requiring all PZEVs to be covered with 15 year/ 150,000 mile emission warranties, ARB believes much of the risk associated with malfunctioning non- ILEVs can be kept very low.
The only vehicles that qualify for the federal ILEV program are compressed gas fueled vehicles and pure ZEVs. 103.
Comment: Don't start with credits to build the number of vehicles the regulation will produce, instead, start with the total number of ZEVs you would like to see and work backwards and then arrange your credits.
If that number is 100,000, then the auto makers can decide how to apportion the numbers between fuel cells, electric vehicles, etc.
(Frank) Agency Response: The amendments reflect the Board's assessment of the state of battery and vehicle technology.
The actual number of ZEVs, AT PZEVs, and PZEVs required by the amended regulation represent what the Board believes is reasonable and possible in the given timeframe.
The amendments are crafted to provide incentives for a variety of technologies based on each technology's state of development and environmental benefits.
Manufacturers are provided substantial flexibility to build the most effective vehicle types to comply.
104.
Comment: Commit to a larger volume of vehicles and stick to the commitment.
Eliminate the PZEV option from the ZEV program.
Encourage companies to develop one or two models that all will sell.
Provide ZEV credits for very clean transit buses.
Promote the removal of gross polluters from the fleet right now and have the automakers use the windfall to offset the costs of ZEV introduction.
The mandate should be implemented on a target-oriented approach ­ via limited, high profile and high problem air basins.
We need to investigate the benefits of having large energy storage capability in stabilizing our power grid.
(Dunning)
66
Agency Response: The ZEV program is one part of a comprehensive motor vehicle control program that includes many of the elements mentioned by the commenter.
105.
Comment: Definition of ZEV should be changed to allow more ZEVs to quality.
(Bierman) Agency Response: Since the program's inception in 1990, a number of modifications have been made designed to increase the flexibility and provide additional options for automakers.
Three distinct categories, ZEV, AT PZEV, and PZEV now provide a range of compliance options for automakers.
The ARB believes that the definition is broad enough and does not require additional changes.
106.
Comment: A requirement should be included that ensures that vehicles will be available to the public, as well as to fleets.
(Casner) Agency Response: A mature, and leases to both the public automakers to place vehicles inappropriate to place such a successful, commercial market for ZEVs will include sales as well as fleets.
While the ARB has worked with with consumers in the past, and will continue to do so, it is requirement within the regulations.
107.
Comment: Take the long-term view and make the program a 20-year program.
To address the issue of using electric vehicles to provide benefits to the grid, form a multi-agency working group that would include the ARB, CEC, the Fuel Cell Alliance, the ISO, the PUC, the infrastructure Working Group and various stakeholders in the private sector.
(A Brooks) Agency Response: The ARB has taken the long-term view in its approach to the regulatory changes by including an increase in the percentage requirements through 2018.
The amendments also reflect the expected development of technologies such as fuel cell vehicles that are still several years away from commercial introduction.
To address the issue of using electric vehicles to provide benefits to the grid, the ARB has already funded research to evaluate this potential and will continue to work with appropriate stakeholders to see how to best develop this concept in the future.
(k) General Opposition to the ZEV Program
108.
Comment: We are concerned that the ZEV mandate will not do enough to further California's mission for clean air and better health, particularly for those in the most heavily populated, low-income communities.
We are also concerned that the ARB is in violation of the Environmental Justice Act by not reaching out to all communities during the regulation development process.
As a result, we request that you delay the vote before you for several months (3 to 4) and support a review of the program by the combined interests of the ARB, environmental justice groups and industry.
(Seven Assemblymembers)
67
Agency Response: This comment should be responded to in two parts.
The first part being the effectiveness of the ZEV mandate at furthering the mission of meeting air quality standards throughout California, particularly in disproportionately impacted communities and second, ARB's adherence to the Environmental Justice Act.
Part 1: The Board did not delay the decision on the ZEV regulation because staff is confident that the ZEV mandate furthers the mission of meeting air quality standards for all California citizens because it furthers advancement in automotive emission reduction technology.
The ZEV regulations have already resulted in the development of a variety of automotive emissions control advancements such as: vehicles meeting super-ultralow emission vehicle standards, retail available hybrid electric vehicles, electric vehicles in daily use by both consumers and fleets.
These vehicles are operated throughout California including the most highly impacted neighborhoods.
Often the most appropriate uses for electric vehicles are fleet applications, particularly postal delivery and electric or gas utility meter reading and maintenance.
These driving cycles take place in all neighborhoods in California and are marked by frequent starts, stops and idle; arguably a high emission driving cycle.
Using an electric vehicle can eliminate this locally high emission source from neighborhoods heavily impacted by mobile sources.
The argument is also made that because electric vehicles are currently expensive to own, lower income Californian's will not be able to benefit from driving these vehicles.
As was stated by an electric vehicle driver at the January 25th hearing, it is not the driver of the EV who benefits, but the person following the EV or the region through which the vehicle is driven that benefits from its zero emissions.
Additionally, as all of these zero and near zero emission vehicles age, their prices on the used car market will decrease making them affordable to people with lower incomes.
The inclusion of a 15year/150,000 mile warranty on the PZEV vehicles actually adds a financial advantage to such vehicles, establishing a used car market with reliable emissions performance.
Part 2: The Environmental Justice Act states: Section 2 part 3, "The California Environmental Protection Agency shall conduct its programs, policies and activities that substantially affect human health or the environment in the manner that ensures the fair treatment of people of all races, cultures and income levels including minority populations and low-income populations of the state."
Part 3(c) also reads, "...to ensure greater public participation in the Agency's development, adoption and implementation of environmental regulations and policies."
In preparing the staff proposal to modify the ZEV regulations, staff embarked on a thorough and coordinated effort to solicit input from stakeholders and interested parties.
Throughout the existence of the ZEV program, staff has consistently sought to involve stakeholders.
68
Since the ZEV program was adopted in 1990, the Board has been extremely committed with ensuring that the technology would be available to meet the ZEV requirements.
In addition, the Board has ensured that an extensive public process was in place to provide proper outreach and public awareness to all citizens.
A major component of this public process has been a series of public workshops and Board meetings, held in both southern and northern California, in which the Board has deliberated essentially all issues related to the ZEV program.
In conjunction with this effort, ARB staff has also developed and implemented new programs designed to demonstrate and educate the public about ZEV technology.
Educational and outreach programs include ARB's vehicle demonstration programs, that have resulted in providing opportunities to over 200 schools, cities, counties, parks, and other public agencies to get "hands-on" experience and exposure to ZEV technology.
In addition, ARB staff has participated in more than 100 community events, schools, conferences and other venues throughout the state to both demonstrate and educate the public about the technology.
This issue was raised at the Board's September 8, 2000 meeting, in which the Board, in affirming the ZEV program, also expressed the need to build upon and increase the public awareness and education efforts to date.
In response, the ARB plans to establish a statewide steering committee to make certain that the entire spectrum of stakeholders are involved, including members of lower income communities.
109.
Comment: We request that the ARB delay any vote on the proposal for 90 days to allow time for our input as stakeholders.
(Boyle Heights Mejoramiento, Sanchez, Mother's of East L.A. Santa Isabel) Agency Response: See response to comment 108, part 2.
110.
Comment : Delay the scheduled vote on the ZEV rule.
Some commentators just asked for a delay, others specified the length of delay (120 days), most asked for the delay to look at alternative strategies.
(City of Redono Beach, City of Santa Ana, League of California Cities, Gabriel Valley Council of Governments) Agency Response: See response to comment 108, part 1.
111.
Comment : The staff proposal is workable in the near term but more unpredictable in the long term.
Therefore, the Board should delay the requirements for 2006 and beyond.
(Ford) Agency Response: One of the comments received through the biennial review process has been that a lack of certainty about the status of the ZEV regulation in the near- and long-term has lead to a lack of investment and progress in the technology needed to meet the ZEV regulations.
Consequently, establishing a very short effective date (2003 to 2006) would create an even more uncertain future for the requirement, fueling the
69
tendency on the part of auto manufacturers to avoid making research and development commitments that could bring about break-through cost-effective ZEVs.
ARB has a consistent history of assessing progress and effectiveness of its regulations.
Should it become apparent as the regulation is implemented that the future year requirements are not workable, the Board would address these issues as they arrive and modify the regulation at that time.
112.
Comment: The staff proposal fails to address the issue of ZEV program expansion to other states.
The Board should implement the first 3 years as agreements with automakers or delay the decision to allow time for automakers to work with the Northeast states.
(Ford, Toyota, AAM, BMW) Agency Response: The ARB is working closely with the Northeast states who have adopted the California ZEV program pursuant to section 177 of the federal Clean Air Act to make sure their activities help build towards successful ZEV implementation rather than create barriers.
Our experience with the MOA process in connection with the 1996 postponement of the initial ZEV requirements suggests that it is far preferable for the ARB to act in the traditional regulatory sphere.
113.
Comment: Delay the ZEV requirements for better stakeholder participation.
(DaimlerChrysler, GM) Agency Response: The ZEV program has been reviewed on a biennial basis since 1994, and most recently was brought before the Board in September 2000 for a comprehensive report on technology progress, marketing efforts, and cost effectiveness.
Preparations for this review commenced up to one year prior to the Board hearing including three workshops, numerous individual meetings with stakeholder groups, outreach events and dissemination of various staff analyses and findings.
Stakeholder participation in the review process was very active.
So, when the Board directed staff at the September 2000 Board hearing to develop modifications to the regulation, the stakeholder population was already well informed of the issues that would be addressed in the regulatory process.
Additionally, staff held a public workshop and additional numerous meetings with affected and interested parties prior to the 45-day public notice release.
Staff continued to meet with and respond to comments received prior to the January 2001 hearing and in fact incorporated some suggestions into staff's proposal at the hearing (contained in the first 15-day comment package).
Given this substantial public involvement, the duration of the process (starting in fall 1999) and the closeness of the implementation date of the regulation (model year 2003), delay of the regulatory decision was not viewed as appropriate.
114.
Comment : Alternative technologies such as fuel cell vehicles hold greater technical promise than battery electric vehicles.
We believe that fuel cell technologies
70
hold the greatest promise of offering the substantial emission reductions sought by the ZEV regulations and proposed amendments.
Research and development of these technologies continues with significant commitment.
Unfortunately, the current ZEV regulations and proposed amendments seem to ignore the promise of these technologies in favor of mandating technology-limited battery electric vehicles in a specific timeframe which are not cost effective and not acceptable to the general public.
We recommend that the proposed amendments be modified to allow for the development and implementation of these promising technologies, as opposed to choosing one technology at the expense of other technologies which may achieve the goal of emission reduction more quickly, more effectively, and more economically.
(Honda) Agency Response: EVs are proven today as feasible.
Fuel cells have not been proven to be feasible, we should not therefore delay in the hope that fuel cells will be ready for market in some future year.
We must start now with EVs to obtain the emission reductions needed.
The numbers required are the seed for developing the market for zero emission vehicles.
115.
Comment : We request that the Board direct staff to develop several ZEV options for manufacturers on the two-percent side of the mandate.
This would allow each manufacturer to apply its resources to advance the true ZEV technologies it believes have the best prospects.
One option would be for a pure battery EV program.
Another option, a program for the fuel cell vehicles, developed around a set of performance based parameters and milestones.
Progress would be measured against these parameters and milestones and demonstrated to the public.
Environmental performance could be one of the parameters advanced during the development.
Achievement would be based on technology performance rather than the number of vehicles produced.
This is because technology performance is the real foundation for commercial readiness.
Keep the true ZEV component but make it forward looking to drive progress on fuel cell vehicles.
(GM) Agency Response: The modified regulation achieves this goal by providing manufacturers with flexibility to choose their compliance path through the ZEV credit system.
Adequate flexibility is provided within the regulation through incorporation of several elements: § Credit award systems that are performance based § Banking and trading of credits is allowed § High levels of credit are awarded for fuel cell technology in the early years of the program to encourage technology development At the same time, the Board recognized the need to maintain the timeline of implementation for this regulation to achieve air quality benefits in a timely manner.
116.
Comment : The Board should conduct a fair market test of the technology to determine whether a successful, sustainable market for battery electric vehicles exists.
To determine this, the mandate would be suspended and all large and intermediate size
71
manufacturers would participate in the placement of about 2,500 vehicles in Los Angeles for evaluation.
(DaimlerChrysler, GM, AAM, BMW) The Fair Market Test (FMT) offers two distinct advantages over this discouraging but very realistic ZEV mandate scenario.
First, the number of vehicles to be provided under the FMT, while large, is not as large as the number to be provided under any of the various ZEV mandate proposals.
The FMT should therefore lower manufacturers' compliance costs, thus freeing resources for more productive use in the development of more promising emissions-control technologies.
Second, the FMT offers a realistic prospect of helping ARB to build a political consensus to either retain the mandate (should the experiment succeed) or repeal it (if it fails).
The FMT, unlike the mandate, would bring vehicles in all market segments before t public in a context of a controlled experiment to evaluate their desirability.
The market testes have been designed by the manufacturers to be objective.
It is therefore possible that the FMT results would be accepted by even the ZEV mandate's most committed proponents.
(Austin) Agency Response: ARB staff evaluated the proposal and believe that it is based on a false premise - that high volume cost at this early stage of technology development is relevant to the long term cost of battery electric vehicles.
Industry has stated that volume should not be increased until several evolutions of technology occur.
Yet the fair market test proposes to determine the fate of ZEVs based on the cost of producing today's vehicles in volume production.
This approach does not allow or take into consideration cost reductions due to technology improvements.
Moreover, by its structure the fair market test would remove any incentive for manufacturers to pursue such technical improvements.
The proposed test would suspend not only the ZEV requirements for pure ZEVs, but also suspend the requirements for PZEVs and AT PZEVs.
There is no need for a market test of these technologies because they are being sold now.
As proposed, the test would severely limit the size and scope of the ZEV program, create additional uncertainty, fail to encourage further technical progress, and it limit the Board's authority.
117.
Comment : We recommend that staff develop a non-regulatory alternative.
The alternative would involve the concept of individual agreements between CARB and each manufacturer that would comprehend the essence of the staff proposal that includes improved air quality and technological innovation.
The alternative would permit each manufacturer to pursue its particular strength in advanced technologies without having to dilute and complicate that effort because of concerns about the actions of other states.
Other programs could be included in this individual agreement approach.
One program could involve something as simple as retrofitting diesel school buses in California with particulate traps, thereby providing immediate environmental benefits to hundreds of California communities.
Or the program could fund a program to buy back gross emitting vehicles in targeted California communities with the greatest need.
Still another program could involve a cooperative effort with the State to fund distribution of new gasoline storage cans.
(GM)
72
There are many mobile source control measures that would be much less expensive and more cost-effective than the ZEV mandate, with or without the changes recently proposed by the staff.
AIR examined one alternative to the ZEV mandate what would reduce emissions more than the ZEV mandate, and at a far lower cost.
In this alternative, the durability period ("useful life") over which certain vehicles are certified would be increased from either 100,000 miles or 120,000 miles, to 150,000 miles.
This would not preclude manufacturers from still offering battery electric vehicles and PZEVs for sale.
This alternative would necessitate reduced emissions when vehicles are very new, and a greater attention to emission component durability to ensure that the emission standards are met over a longer period of time.
The emission reduction benefits of the ZEV mandate are less than that achieved by the extended durability requirement.
Estimated on a vehicle lifetime basis, the cost effectiveness of this alternative would be approximately $2.64 per pound for LEV1 vehicles, $2.87 per pound for ULEV1s, $11.26 per pound for LEVIIs , and $12.44 per pound for ULEVIIs.
This compares to $132 to $142 for the ZEV mandate, as modified by ARB's recently proposed changes.
(Darlington) Agency Response: Responding first to the suggestion that the ZEV program be replaced with an agreement between ARB and each manufacturer to achieve the goals of the ZEV regulations, ARB's authority rests in the California Clean Air Act to establish and enforce emission standards for motor vehicles.
Replacing the ZEV regulations in the long term with agreements with auto manufacturers would create a questionably effective and unenforceable program which would not guarantee successful achievement of ARB's goals of air quality improvement over the long-term and technology advancement.
California strives to attain and maintain health-based air quality standards through a comprehensive strategy of near-term, on-going and long-term programs.
These include near-term programs to immediately reduce emissions and air pollution exposure through retrofit, re-power , replacement and incentive programs that strive to accelerate the turn-over of pollution sources to newer cleaner technologies.
Such programs are similar to what the comment suggests should be done as an alternative to the ZEV program.
The other end of California's program to attain and maintain air quality is based on regulations that set standards for future sources like new cars, trucks, buses, and gas cans.
These regulations are the basis for the long-term success of California's future air quality.
There is no doubt that near term programs like diesel school bus retrofit and replacement, retirement of gross polluting passenger cars and replacement of gasoline storage cans has significant impact on air quality.
ARB's Carl Moyer Memorial Air Quality Standards Attainment Program, the Lower-Emission School Bus Program and the Bureau of Automotive Repair's repair assistance and buy-back programs achieve significant gains in air quality improvement.
But, long term success depends on establishment of emission standards and requirements that improve the overall technology ­ in this case for passenger cars, even to the point of zero emissions.
It is
73
questionable, given California's vehicle population and vehicle miles traveled per year, whether air quality standards can be met without zero emission vehicles in our future vehicle fleet mix.
As such, it would be inappropriate to allow manufacturers to substitute near term emission reduction programs for the ZEV requirement which moves the vehicle fleet so significantly in the direction it needs to go in order to meet our goals for vehicle emissions.
118.
Comment: Rather than require auto manufacturers to invest in ZEV technology, it may be appropriate for them instead to pay in a fund to retrofit diesel school buses to reduce emissions.
This action would reach a different population than investment in ZEVs only.
(League of California Cities) Agency Response: See response to Comment 117.
119.
Comment: Consider alternatives that will establish a performance-based approach to attaining air quality goals.
(City of Santa Ana) Agency Response: The ZEV program as modified and adopted by the Board establishes performance based emission standards for several categories of vehicles (PZEV, AT PZEV and ZEV).
Within that framework, production requirements are only set for the ZEV portion of the regulation (two percent of sales).
Beyond the two percent requirement, much flexibility has been created for manufacturers to meet the regulation with technologies that suit their strengths.
Even within the two percent ZEV requirement, flexibility exists through the credit calculation process allowing manufacturers to build different types of vehicles depending on their particular ability and market interests.
120.
Comment: The ZEV program will divert resources from other alternatives and slow the pace of technology development.
This comment refers specifically to battery electric vehicles.
(Honda, AAM, BMW) Agency Response: From a policy standpoint, the Board has clearly articulated the need to maintain a core zero-emission requirement to provide an incentive for further development.
The tremendous progress that has been seen to date can at least in part be attributed to the existence of the ZEV requirement, and ARB staff believes that maintaining this requirement will accelerate the pace at which true zero technologies are commercialized.
At the same time, given the wide-open nature of ongoing technical advances, the amendments to the program provide increased flexibility for manufacturers to pursue specific strategies that in their view offer long-term promise.
The amendments provide incentives for ongoing technology advancement, across a wide variety of vehicle types (both ZEVs and PZEVs).
The reduced number of pure ZEVs required in the near term are designed to adequately explore many different possible market applications while allowing time for continued design and cost improvements.
74
121.
Comment: The ZEV regulations are not necessary and technically feasible.
(Honda) Agency Response: With respect to the environment, ZEVs are the "gold standard" for vehicular air pollution control as they reduce both criteria and toxic pollutant emissions to the maximum feasible extent.
High-efficiency ZEVs and AT PZEVs also cut emissions of carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
The ARB has concluded that there are no technological barriers to building battery powered ZEVs but that issues of cost and consumer acceptance remain.
With regard to near-zero emission vehicles, technology exists that allow vehicles to achieve the required level of performance.
While the amendments significantly improve the cost-effectiveness of the ZEV requirements, they still result in higher costs per ton of pollution reduced than any other ARB regulatory measure.
Nevertheless, the amended ZEV regulations remain an essential component of the State's long-term air quality strategy because of the promise and ultimate necessity of zero-emission technologies.
122.
Comment : Do not increase future ZEV requirements.
There is no justification to expand program in the future.
(Toyota, AAM, BMW) Agency Response: As noted in the response to Comments 120 and 121, ZEVs are necessary to achieve the State's public health protection goals.
Increasing the ZEV requirements in the long-term will further encourage the commercialization of a number of emerging zero emission and near zero emission technologies now under development.
123.
Comment: Manufacturers do not have sufficient time to take advantage of near term flexibility offered by the proposed regulations.
(DaimlerChrysler) Agency Response: The amendments are designed to provide incentives for a wide variety of vehicle types and ensure the near term production requirements better correspond to PZEV availability and the emerging market for ZEVs.
The reduction in near term production requirements address the Board's concerns regarding the cost impacts of the program and encourage the early introduction of vehicles.
In addition, the amendments also provide an additional "carry-back" year, so that automakers have two years to make up a PZEV shortfall rather than the one year allowed under the previous regulation.
124.
Comment: The ZEV mandate, as currently proposed, will not do enough to clean up the air or protect public health.
The 10 year-old mandate needs to be reviewed and updated to include new technologies such as fuel cells, compressed natural gas vehicles, hybrid electric vehicles, and new diesel emission control devices.
(San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments, City of Santa Ana) Agency Response: ZEVs represent the cleanest vehicle technologies available by reducing criteria and toxic pollutant emissions to the maximum feasible extent.
ZEVs eliminate catastrophic and deteriorating emissions issues in older gas-powered cars as
75
well as reduce emissions from "upstream" sources.
Clearly, these vehicles are necessary in large quantities if California is going to meet it air quality goals.
The program has been reviewed and modified as a result of the advances made in a variety of technologies including fuel-cells, natural gas, and hybrid electric vehicles.
The complexity of the regulation is largely a result of the different strategies and technologies being pursued by industry.
Significant emission benefits will be achieved in the future as these various technologies are produced in large quantities.
125.
Comment: The ZEV program will increase the demand for electricity and exacerbate the energy shortage situation.
(Brooks, Dunbar) On a per vehicle basis, the average ZEV will use about 19 kilowatt-hours per day in 2010, and about 15 kilowatt-hours per day in 2020.
Household energy consumption can be estimated from the California Energy Commission's estimate of total residential electricity usage, and the number of households.
Using the CEC's estimate of total residential electricity consumption, and the U.S. Census Bureau estimate of 12 million households in California, average per day electricity consumption is about 17 kilowatthours per day.
Thus, one ZEV consumes more electricity per day than one household .
(Darlington) Agency Response: In response to this issue, the ARB in cooperation with the California Energy Commission evaluated the impacts to our electricity supply from battery electric vehicles.
First, most vehicle recharging occurs during off-peak hours due to lower rates and convenience, and will not contribute to the shortages that have been prevalent during peak hours.
Second, the total number of electric vehicles and electricity demand from them is extremely small when compared to the overall system demand.
Vehicles on the road today account for about five one-thousandths of one percent of the total annual energy use.
New power plants are being built to alleviate the power shortage over the new decade.
Nonetheless, even in greater numbers reasonably expected by the regulations, total electrical use from battery electric vehicles would be approximately twelve on-hundredths of one percent of the projected demand in 2010.
As a result, the ARB believes that the use of battery electric vehicles will have no meaningful impact on California's energy situation.
126.
Comment: The ZEV program should be eliminated as it will cause a shift in energy industry and displacement of workers (Dunbar) Agency Response: As noted in the response to the comment above, the total amount of electricity needed for recharging electric vehicles represents an extremely small percentage of the overall California demand.
As such, the California Energy Commission has concluded that the commercialization of battery electric vehicles will have essentially no impact on issues related to energy supply or production.
127.
Comment: The ZEV program creates hazardous situations in accidents and disposal due to the use of batteries.
(Brooks)
76
Agency Response: The ARB has worked with the State Fire Marshal and other state and local emergency response officials and towing companies to create a comprehensive training program to ensure preparedness for incidents involving EVs.
In 1998, this effort resulted in the development of a training program consisting of material to train instructors, an instructor's manual and compact disc, and slide teaching materials and student manuals.
Train-the-trainer courses have been held throughout the state with a complete package of training materials distributed to every state Fire Marshal Office in the United States.
To staff's knowledge, no public safety issues have arisen regarding the safety of EVs or the actions of emergency response personnel in responding to an EV accident.
The MOA directed the ARB to work with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the Integrated Waste Management Board, and the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment to ensure the availability of sufficient battery recycling capacity.
In addition, ARB staff has followed battery recycling issues at the national level by participating on the Department of Energy's Advanced Battery Readiness Working Committee.
At this time, there do not appear to be any overwhelming obstacles to disposal and recycling of battery technologies expected in the 2003 timeframe.
Currently, there is one facility in the United States capable of recycling nickel-based batteries.
Another plant in Canada is now successfully recycling large military lithiumbased batteries.
While recycling technologies are being developed and are expected to be in place, it will be necessary to build new recycling plants for certain battery types, such as lithium-ion, to accommodate their use in large quantities.
Any new recycling facilities would be required to meet stringent air quality and environmental regulations that would minimize any adverse effects of the recycling processes.
128.
Comment: The program should be dropped, as there is no market for ZEVs due to cost and operational limitations.
(Surber, Burns, Toyota, Honda, AAM, BMW, Volkswagen) Agency Response: There is significant disagreement over the extent of market demand for electric vehicles.
While automakers and opponents assert that the lack of leases during the MOA period demonstrates that the market can only absorb a minimum number of vehicles per year, electric vehicle advocates and fleet operators point to current waiting lists as evidence of strong customer interest and pent-up demand.
The entire market is new and product availability has been constrained such that true consumer interest is extremely difficult to gauge.
In addition, the introduction of cityand neighborhood electric vehicles further clouds the market for electric vehicles.
Surveys and market studies indicate that pricing, range and recharge time are the most important factors affecting the EV market.
The ARB believes that a market exists for the relatively small number of vehicles required by the regulations and that the single greatest need is for near-term product availability followed by a smooth orderly ramp-up to larger commercialization.
77
(l)
Legal Issues
129.
Comment : In reaching a decision in this rulemaking the Board must consider all of the evidence before it, including the substantial submittal on January 23, 2001 by General Motors asserting that the ZEV mandate increases emissions because of the fleet turnover effect.
The ARB is required by the California Administrative Procedure Act (APA), its case law and the due process clause of the federal Constitution to consider the entire administrative record.
(GM) Agency Response: As reflected in the October 31 Staff Review of the NERA-Sierra Report and this FSOR, the ARB has seriously considered GM's submittals prior to taking final action to adopt amendments in this rulemaking.
More generally, we believe we have considered the entire rulemaking file for this rulemaking.
130.
Comment : While the Board possesses broad authority to regulate emissions, it has no power to adopt and enforce regulations that will increase, not decrease, emissions from the in-use fleet.
The paramount legislative purpose for ARB is to improve air quality.
See, e.g., Health and Safety Code sections 43000, 43010, and 43801.
To say that ARB is simultaneously empowered to prevent pollution and to enforce regulations like the ZEV mandate that would increase pollution would make no sense, and would violate the canon against self-contradictory statutory constructions.
The Board cannot exceed its legislative authority by trying to decide that some regulations that would increase emissions are acceptable or reasonable, without implicating Constitutional principles of separation of powers.
See Clean Air Constituency v. ARB, 11 Cal.3d 801, 816-17 (1974).
Since the new evidence presented by GM regarding the fleet turnover effect shows that the ZEV mandate will have the unintended effect of increasing rather than reducing emissions, it is beyond the ARB's authority.
(GM) Agency Response: As explained in this FSOR, we believe the record shows that the amended ZEV regulation will not increase emissions compared to having no ZEV requirements.
131.
Comment : The ARB should recognize its CEQA obligations with regard to the ZEV mandate.
The provisions of the ARB's alternative CEQA system certified by section 15251, title 14, CCR, which applies to the adoption or amendment of regulations used in the regulatory program to protect and enhance air quality, covers the ZEV regulation.
But the ARB is still required to produce the "functional equivalent" on an environmental impact report ("EIR").
None of the categorical exemptions in CEQA apply to the ZEV mandate, nor do any of the exceptions in Public Resources Code section 21080(b).
The ZEV mandate is also a "project" within the meaning of Public Resources Code section 21065 and section 15378, title 14, CCR.
The ARB must consider the potential adverse environmental impacts of continuing the ZEV mandate.
The ARB's own regulations commit it to respond in writing to "significant environmental issues" raised during the decision-making process.
Section 60007(a), title 17, CCR.
Previous analyses of the ZEV mandate do not limit the Board's current responsibility to
78
evaluate the mandate anew under CEQA.
Based on the "fleet turnover effect" evidence presented by GM, the ARB will be forced to recognize that the ZEV mandate causes "potentially significant effects on the environment."
Thus ARB must either abandon the project, accept one of GM's mitigation measures, prepare the functional equivalent of an EIR, and/or after preparing such a substitute EIR, determine that the mitigation measures proposed by GM are infeasible or that the Board's are equivalent or superior.
(GM) Agency Response: There is no doubt that this rulemaking falls within the ARB's functional equivalent program certified by the Resources Agency.
The Staff Report: Initial Statement of Reasons contained a chapter analyzing the environmental impacts of the proposed amendments pursuant to section 60005, title 17, CCR.
The originally proposed amendments made substantial changes to the ZEV regulation as last amended in the 1998-99 "LEV II" rulemaking.
The ZEV regulation's percentage ZEV requirements apply starting in the 2003 model year, but manufacturers have been taking various steps to comply ­ including generating early introduction credits ­ for some time.
Consistent with past ARB practices, the Staff Report compared the anticipated environmental impacts of the proposed amendments to the environmental conditions existing if no amendments were adopted and manufacturers were accordingly required to comply with the outstanding ZEV regulation.
The ZEV requirements were originally adopted in a 1990-1991 rulemaking, and then were amended in rulemakings conducted in 1992-1993, 1996, and 1998-1999.
In each rulemaking the Board had conducted environmental reviews of the amendments.
If a project such as a rulemaking is amending previously adopted regulations that were subject to environmental reviews, an agency may appropriately conduct its new environmental review solely on the impact of the amendments on the preexisting regulation.
See Black Property Owners Association v. City of Berkeley, 22 Cal.App.
974, 985-986 (1994), Benton v. Board of Supervisors, 226 Cal.App.
3d 1467, 1475-1482 (1991) and Temecula Band of Luisino Mission Indians v. Rancho California Water Dist., 43 Cal.App.
4th 425, 437-438 (1996).
The originally proposed amendments had the overall effect of significantly reducing the number of ZEVs and vehicles generating partial ZEV allowances (PZEVs) that needed to be marketed, particularly in the nearer term.
The Staff Report estimated that the proposed amendments would increase direct emissions of reactive organic gases plus oxides of nitrogen (ROG + NOx) by 0.14 tons per day in the South Coast Air Basin in 2010.
In 2020, the comparable figure was a net decrease of 0.08 tons per day of ROG + NOx.
In accordance with section 60007(a), title 13, CCR, the ARB has seriously considered, and addressed in writing, GM's assertions that the ZEV program, either before or after the amendments, will increase emissions because of the fleet turnover effect.
As discussed in detail elsewhere in this FSOR, we have concluded that GM's analysis is flawed and that the amended program will not increase emissions compared to not having a ZEV program.
79
132.
Comment : Any claimed secondary environmental or related benefits for the ZEV mandate would provide no lawful justification for the mandate.
Proponents of the ZEV mandate sometimes suggest that it is beneficial because it will reduce dependence on international sources of petroleum, or help reduce emissions of "greenhouse gases."
The U.S. Congress has decided that the issue of global climate change should be addressed, if at all, through action by the nation and international community as a whole.
Regulation of greenhouse gas emissions by California is preempted.
Likewise, state regulation of vehicle designs to reduce dependence on overseas sources of petroleum is preempted by both "field" preemption and "obstacle" preemption by the federal Motor Vehicle Information and Cost-Savings Act (MVICSA).
(GM) Agency Response: The motivating rationale for the amended ZEV regulation is the longterm reduction in criteria pollutants, not reductions in greenhouse gases or reductions in dependence on international sources of petroleum.
See also the response to Comment 70.
133.
Comment : Even if one credits the benefits claimed for the ZEV mandate as a means of controlling smog-forming emissions, the cost-effectiveness is vastly inferior to the alternative measure GM has proposed to extend the useful life of certain vehicle types.
In that respect, the mandate is thus not "necessary," "cost-effective," or a part of the "most cost-effective combination of controls" as required by the Health and Safety Code, even if one ignores GM's evidence on the fleet turnover effect.
(GM) Agency Response: The basis for the ARB's cost-effectiveness determination is set forth in Section II.B.3.
of this FSOR.
The reasons for not substituting GM's "extended useful life" alternative are set forth in Section I.
The Staff Report and this FSOR similarly demonstrate that the amendments are a necessary element of ARB's long-term program to attack air pollution.
B. RESPONSES TO COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING FIRST 15-DAY COMMENT PERIOD Comments submitted by General Motors regarding the effect of fleet turnover on vehicle emissions, taken from (1) report entitled Impacts of ZEV Sales Mandate on California Motor Vehicle Emissions : Responses to Comments of Air Resources Board Staff and Related Documents Provided as Part of the 15-Day Notice, National Economic Research Associates, Inc. and Sierra Research, Inc., and (2) related declarations.
On January 23, 2001, General Motors Corporation filed extensive written comments in the current ARB rulemaking, including a report entitled Impacts of Alternative ZEV Sales Mandates on California Motor Vehicle Emissions : A Comprehensive Study.
This report, prepared by National Economic Research Associates, Inc. and Sierra Research, Inc.
(NERA-Sierra Report 1), argued that the ZEV mandate would result in higher overall fleet emissions than would be expected under business as usual without a ZEV mandate.
Specifically, the report argued that the ZEV mandate would lead to higher
80
prices on new vehicles in California; this "ZEV tax" would lead to higher retention rates for older vehicles; the reduction in the scrappage of older vehicles, in turn, would result in an increase in overall fleet emissions, because older vehicles have much higher emissions on average than newer, cleaner vehicles.
On October 31, 2001 ARB staff released for public comment a review of the above referenced report, entitled ARB Staff Review of Report Entitled "Impacts of Alternative ZEV Sales Mandates on California Motor Vehicle Emissions : A Comprehensive Study" (ARB Staff Review).
The ARB Staff Review concluded that the NERA-Sierra Report 1 significantly overstated the impact of the California ZEV program on vehicle prices, vehicle sales, and fleet turnover-related changes to vehicle emissions.
The ARB Staff Review relied in part on a memo prepared at ARB's request by economists from the Institute for Economic and Environmental Studies, California State University Fullerton (Hall-Brajer memo).
This memo was also released for public comment on October 31, 2001.
On November 15, 2001 General Motors submitted as public comment a new report, also prepared by NERA-Sierra, entitled Impacts of ZEV Sales Mandate on California Motor Vehicle Emissions : Responses to Comments of Air Resources Board Staff and Related Documents Provided as Part of the 15-Day Notice (NERA-Sierra Report 2).
This report discusses the points raised in the ARB staff review and the Hall-Brajer memo.
The General Motors submittal also included several declarations that support and amplify points contained in the NERA-Sierra Report 2.
This section summarizes the comments provided in the November 15, 2001 General Motors submittal (NERA-Sierra Report 2) and provides staff's response.
Where appropriate additional comments from the related declarations are included within the NERA-Sierra Report 2 summary.
Such comments are individually identified.
The NERA-Sierra Report 2 is divided into two sections, which separately address the Hall-Brajer memo and the ARB staff review.
This summary and response to comments follows the organization of the NERA-Sierra Report 2 and discusses each issue in turn.
Constant Marginal Cost As Represented in Appendix D 134.
Comment : The Hall Brajer memo claims that the NERA-Sierra study represents marginal cost as a horizontal line in Appendix D, which means that any cost increase is passed entirely on to the consumer.
Contrary to the Hall-Brajer claim, the figure in Appendix D is not related to the model used in the NERA-Sierra study to develop empirical estimates of the effects of the ZEV tax.
The Appendix D figure demonstrates that increasing prices outside of California (or lowering them in California) relative to the pricing used in the NERA-Sierra analysis would result in lower manufacturer profits, and therefore that manufacturers would not adopt such pricing.
This is the only point that the figure was intended to illustrate, and the use of a horizontal marginal cost curve does not in any way affect this result.
In the
81
figure ­ which assumes linear demand and marginal revenue curves ­ the manufacturer does not pass on the entire cost increase to consumers.
Instead, the price faced by consumers only increases by half of the total increase in marginal cost, because manufacturers' marginal revenue curve is not the same as the demand curve.
Additional Comment from Declaration: Marginal Costs of Production: The change in California vehicle sales as a result of the ZEV mandate will be a tiny fraction of the relevant United States sales.
Even if the national marginal cost curve were not perfectly horizontal, it would be impossible to quantify any detectable change in marginal costs over the very small change in vehicle sales volumes on a national basis.
(Dr. Michael Whinihan) Agency Response: The results produced by the NERA-Sierra model, and the implications of the assumptions used, are discussed separately in the ARB review of NERA-Sierra Report 1.
The ARB review accepted the internal workings of the NERASierra model on its own terms, and only modified various input assumptions.
Thus the conclusions of the ARB staff review do not depend on the interpretation of the graph in Appendix D. With respect to the interpretation of the graph, the commenter is correct given the assumption that the manufacturer has some control over price and is not selling in a perfectly competitive market.
In contrast, if marginal cost slopes upward, less than onehalf of any cost increase is passed on to the consumer.
Use Of National Scrappage Rates in the Scrappage Model 135.
Comment .
The Hall-Brajer memo states that it is possible that Californians may scrap their cars sooner than the national average in which case fewer old cars might remain on the road than estimated in NERA-Sierra.
In fact, however, we understand that California vehicle owners retain their cars for longer than the national average.
Thus older California vehicles remain on the road longer than older vehicles in the rest of the country, if anything resulting in higher fleetwide emissions than would be predicted using national scrappage rates.
Agency Response.
The empirical analysis conducted by ARB staff relied on the scrappage data and assumptions used in the NERA-Sierra model.
Staff did not adopt any change based upon the point raised in the Hall-Brajer memo.
Therefore this point does not affect the conclusions reached in the ARB staff review.
Gasoline Prices in the Scrappage Model 136.
Comment .
The Hall-Brajer memo states that the NERA Sierra scrappage model uses a gasoline price of $1.26 per gallon, which is too low.
This leads to estimates of used vehicle retention rates that are too high.
82
The scrappage model relies on historical information from 1970-1998 to derive a statistical relationship between scrappage rates and the new vehicle price.
Among the historical information used to derive this relationship is the price of gasoline... .Nowhere does the scrappage model assume that the current price of gasoline is $1.26.
Agency Response.
The NERA-Sierra documentation is vague on the question of what is assumed about future fuel prices, and the only price for gasoline cited in relevant documents is $1.26 per gallon.
This comment clarifies their approach, but does not negate the importance of the historical pattern of fuel prices embedded in the model and the effect of that pattern when extrapolated to future sales.
Prices fell during much of the period from 1970 to 1998, but rose sharply in 2000 and 2001.
This had an impact on consumer choice, as was explained in the Hall-Bajer memo: "The U.S. Bureau of Economic Analysis (BEA, 2001) reports that sales of small cars have increased over the past year as sales of large and middle-sized cars have declined in the context of rising fuel prices.
It should also be noted that gasoline prices in California tend to stay above the national average, for a variety of reasons related to supply conditions and product specifications."
Consistency of Marginal Cost and Price Assumptions 137.
Comment .
The Hall-Brajer memo claims that the NERA-Sierra report is inconsistent regarding whether the ZEV tax would apply only to California covered vehicles or to all national sales, since they note that anecdotal reports have suggested that manufacturers have spread some incremental costs nationally.
The NERA-Sierra report is not inconsistent in its discussion of the possibility that small cost differences may not be reflected in regional price differences.
It is perfectly consistent to observe that pricing decisions in response to very small incremental cost increases may differ from pricing decisions in response to large cost increases.
There are likely to be fixed administrative costs associated with any decision to alter vehicle pricing in a particular region, and for very small incremental cost increases, it may not be cost-effective to change pricing.
The profit maximizing strategy may be to ignore relatively small cost differences because the administrative costs of implementing price changes may exceed the gains from the price differences.
Agency Response.
The comment makes reference to undefined "administrative costs" to support the assertion that manufacturers do not charge different prices in different regions when faced with a "relatively small" localized cost increase, but do not price nationally for larger price increases.
The process of making any pricing decision, even one as simple as raising the price everywhere by a constant amount, involves some amount of effort and expense.
The connections between these undefined "administrative costs," the size of the cost increase to be allocated, and NERA-Sierra's implied conclusion (that with a "large" cost increase, price increases won't be levied across different regions, while "relatively small" increases will be) is neither clearly explained nor convincing.
83
Relationship Between the California Market and Other Markets 138.
Comment .
The Hall-Brajer memo claims that the NERA-Sierra report's assertion that the California market is isolated from the rest of the market is not true.
The NERA-Sierra report points out that California ­ along with other states planning to adopt a ZEV mandate ­ is different from non-mandate states, because the mandate imposes incremental costs on the sale of covered vehicles in California.
In states without a ZEV mandate, there is no additional incremental cost imposed on the sale of vehicles.
This distinction is no less true because the same vehicles are sold in California as in the rest of the country.
This distinction is no less true because the same vehicles are sold in California as in the rest of the country.
Any covered vehicle that is sold in California incurs the obligation to produce and sell some fraction of a ZEV ­ or related vehicle ­ whether or not similar vehicles are sold outside the state.
When manufacturers produce vehicles intended for sale in California, they already know that when sold, the vehicles will incur the obligation to produce and sell a ZEV.
Consequently, manufacturers delivering vehicles for sale in California incur additional costs from the sale of those vehicles, even if the same vehicles are produced in Detroit, for example, and sold worldwide.
Agency Response.
The mandate imposes sales requirements.
It is up to the manufacturer to decide how to allocate the associated costs.
The comment regarding production of vehicles for sale in California might be a reasonable statement, given consideration of ZEV requirements when manufacturers decide future production of covered vehicles, but begs the question of how the costs will be allocated.
139.
Comment .
It is implausible to suggest that higher prices in California would lead to a wholesale migration of vehicle consumers to out-of-state dealers.
Agency Response.
This is a mischaracterization.
The actual statement is, "With more than 90 percent of all models meeting California emissions standards, it is clear that manufacturers and dealers face significant competitive pressure to not significantly raise prices in California.
This also implies that the maximum price increase that could be imposed would be the difference between the price of a vehicle delivered at a California dealer and one delivered from out-of-state."
There is no assumption here of "wholesale" out-of-state sales, but recognition that the possibility of out of state sales is another source of competitive pressure on the large manufacturers' pricing strategies in California, compared to the rest of the U.S. Further, reference is to a "vehicle delivered,' clearly recognizing that in versus out of state price is not the only consideration.
84
Industry Expert on Pricing 140.
Comment .
The assertion that the pricing assumed in the NERA-Sierra report is inconsistent with industry practice is based on a brief conversation with an unnamed "industry expert".
Review of the notes of that conversation ­ made possible by a Public Information Request ­ reveals that the "industry expert" was not properly briefed on the nature of the ZEV mandate.
The industry expert was apparently not presented with a situation similar to the ZEV mandate regulation, in which the "standard" independence of vehicle lines no longer holds.
Rather than being two separate and independent lines ­ as presented by the Hall-Brajer memo ­ the covered non-ZEVs and ZEVs are linked to each other.
It is of course true that under normal circumstances, the costs of one vehicle line play a limited role, if any, in the pricing of a different vehicle line.
However, in the case of the ZEV mandate, the regulation imposes a direct link between sales of one vehicle line and sales of another.
The direct link created by regulation results in a situation in which manufacturers are no longer able to maximize their profits by treating vehicle lines independently, as they would normally do under "standard" circumstances The Hall-Brajer analysis states that car makers plan out, well in advance, how many of each type of car they will produce.
Nothing in the NERA-Sierra report conflicts with the notion that manufacturers plan out their future production.
In fact it is the Hall-Brajer memo that is misleading when it suggests by virtue of the fact that ZEV production must be planned in advance, it is necessarily a sunk cost.
In addition to the cost of steel and parts and assembly, the marginal costs of covered vehicles include the marginal costs of the ZEV, PZEV, and AT PZEV obligations incurred by each covered vehicle.
These ZEV mandate costs are not fixed costs, because they are incurred every time an additional covered vehicle is offered for sale in California.
Additional sales are triggered, but the entire cost of those sales is not variable.
Agency Response: The industry expert was exactly that--an extremely knowledgeable person regarding all aspects of the auto industry.
Staff believes that this individual was fully aware of the context.
The California ZEV regulation is not the only regulation that imposes a direct link between one vehicle line and another.
Corporate Average Fuel Economy (CAFE) standards effectively do this.
No evidence has been presented that in such cases manufacturers allocate costs across product lines rather then treating them independently.
Many of the costs of manufacturing are fixed in capital-intensive industries.
Any variable costs of covered vehicles that are higher because of the link to the mandate would in fact not be sunk.
Many of the costs to meet the mandate, however, are fixed, including contractual arrangements with suppliers.
85
Consumer Response to Prices: Price Elasticity 141.
Comment .
The Hall-Brajer memo claims that the overall price elasticity of ­1.0 used in the NERA-Sierra analysis is too high.
The overall price elasticity used in the NERA-Sierra report represents
